THE  FUTURE  OF  COMPUTER

SCIENCE  RESEARCH  IN  THE  U.S.

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MAY  12,  2005

Serial No. 109–14

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

20–999PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
VACANCY

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

May  12,  2005

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Sherwood  L.  Boehlert,  Chairman,  Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Lincoln  Davis,  Member,  Committee  on  Science,
U.S. House of Representatives ............................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Jerry F. Costello, Member, Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Com-
mittee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ............................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Sheila  Jackson  Lee,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ............................................

Witnesses:

Dr. John H. Marburger, III, Director, Office of Science and Technology Policy,

The White Housest

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr. Anthony J. Tether, Director, Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency
Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Dr. William A. Wulf, President, National Academy of Engineering

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Dr.  F.  Thomson  Leighton,  Chief  Scientist  and  Co-founder,  Akamai  Tech-

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

nologies

Page
2
3

18
19

20
21

22

23

23

24

25
27
31

32
38
56

56
59
63
65

67
68
76
76

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr. John H. Marburger, III, Director, Office of Science and Technology Policy,
The White House ..................................................................................................
Dr. Anthony J. Tether, Director, Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency
Dr. William A. Wulf, President, National Academy of Engineering ...................

98
103
106

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Dr.  F.  Thomson  Leighton,  Chief  Scientist  and  Co-founder,  Akamai  Tech-
nologies .................................................................................................................

Page

114

IV

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Joint Statement of the Computing Research Community ....................................

120

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  FUTURE  OF  COMPUTER  SCIENCE

RESEARCH  IN  THE  U.S.

THURSDAY,  MAY  12,  2005

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:10  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Sherwood  L.
Boehlert [Chairman of the Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The Future of Computer

Science Research in the U.S.

THURSDAY, MAY 12, 2005

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Thursday,  May  12,  2005,  the  House  Science  Committee  will  hold  a  hearing
to examine the state of computer science research in the United States and the evo-
lution of federal support for this field. Specifically, the hearing will examine the con-
troversy surrounding the apparent shift away from basic research in overall federal
support  for  computer  science  and  the  impact  of  the  shift  on  federal  agencies,  aca-
demia and industry.
2. Witnesses
Dr.  John  H.  Marburger,  III  is  Director  of  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology
Policy (OSTP), the White House science office. Prior to joining OSTP, Dr. Marburger
served as President of the State University of New York at Stony Brook and as Di-
rector of the Brookhaven National Laboratory.
Dr. Anthony J. Tether is the Director of the Defense Advanced Research Projects
Agency (DARPA). Prior to his appointment as Director of DARPA in 2001, Dr. Teth-
er  served  as  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  The  Sequoia  Group  and  of  Dynamics  Tech-
nology Inc.
Dr.  William  A.  Wulf  is  President  of  the  National  Academy  of  Engineering.  He  is
on  leave  from  the  University  of  Virginia,  Charlottesville,  where  he  is  a  University
Professor  and  AT&T  Professor  of  Engineering  and  Applied  Sciences.  His  research
focuses on computer architecture and computer security. He served as Assistant Di-
rector  for  Computer  and  Information  Science  and  Engineering  at  the  National
Science Foundation from 1988 to 1990.
Dr.  Tom  Leighton  is  Chief  Scientist  and  co-founder  of  Akamai  Technologies.  His
expertise is in algorithms for network applications, which he used to develop a solu-
tion  to  freeing  up  Internet  congestion.  In  addition  to  his  position  at  Akamai,  he  is
a  Professor  of  Applied  Mathematics  at  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology.
He is currently a member of the President’s Information Technology Advisory Com-
mittee (PITAC) and served as Chairman of the Committee’s Subcommittee on Cyber
Security.

3. Brief Overview

• Federal support for information technology research has been a key to the de-
velopment  of  the  information  technology  industry.  The  2003  National  Acad-
emy of Sciences report Innovation in Information Technology lists 19 areas in
which federally sponsored fundamental research underpinned the innovations
that eventually became multi-billion-dollar information technology industries.
Examples  include  the  Internet  and  the  World  Wide  Web,  parallel  and  rela-
tional databases, data mining, and speech recognition.
• Academic  computer  science  research  has  direct  relevance  to  the  information
technology  industry.  University  research  in  computer  science  is  funded  by  a
number of agencies within the Federal Government, but the largest contribu-
tors  are  the  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency  (DARPA)  and  the
National  Science  Foundation  (NSF),  which  together  accounted  for  about  85
percent  of  the  roughly  $1.1  billion  of  federal  funding  for  research  performed
at  universities  and  colleges  in  mathematics  and  computer  sciences  in  fiscal
year 2004 (FY04).
• Recently,  many  computer  science  researchers  have  become  concerned  about
an  apparent  trend  at  DARPA  toward  reducing  the  percentage  of  DARPA’s

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

computer  science  research  portfolio  dedicated  to  long-term  fundamental  re-
search.  DARPA’s  withdrawal  may  have  contributed  to  increased  proposal
pressures on NSF, which has experienced a doubling of applications for fund-
ing  relating  to  computer  science  over  the  last  four  years,  causing  application
approval rates to plummet.

• DARPA  and  NSF  programs  are  complementary,  but  have  many  significant
differences.  While  both  agencies  award  grants  competitively,  DARPA  has  its
program  managers  select  the  awardees,  while  NSF  uses  a  peer-review  proc-
ess. Peer review allows a wider range of views to be considered, but also tends
to  be  more  conservative.  DARPA  awards  also  tend  to  be  targeted  to  a  more
specific end-product even though that product may be many years away. The
general  view  in  the  computer  science  field  is  that  both  agencies  need  to  sup-
port fundamental research to allow for a balanced national portfolio. A sense
of  the  relative  strengths  of  the  two  agencies  can  be  seen  in  the  development
of the Internet. DARPA-sponsored research led to the initial forerunner of the
Internet, known as ARPANET. NSF funding led to the expansion of networks
(initially  for  university  use)  and  to  the  development  of  the  World  Wide  Web.
• In  March  2005,  the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee
(PITAC)  released  a  report  entitled  Cyber  Security:  A  Crisis  of  Prioritization.
In it, the Committee describes the importance of federally supported research
in  cyber  security  and  recommends  additional  federal  investment  at  several
agencies (including NSF and DARPA) to develop the next generation of cyber
security technologies and increase the size of the cyber security research com-
munity.  The  PITAC  report  also  recommends  strengthening  cyber  security
technology  transfer  efforts  and  improving  interagency  coordination  of  cyber
security research programs.
• The  Science  Committee  has  been  a  leader  in  pushing  for  increased  research
in cyber security through, for example, passage in 2002 of the Cyber Security
Research and Development Act (P.L. 107–305), which authorized $903 million
over  five  years  for  cyber  security  research  and  fellowship  programs  at  NSF
and  at  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology.  In  FY05,  NSF
cyber  security  programs  are  funded  at  about  $82  million,  $46  million  below
the level authorized in the Act.

4. Overarching Questions

• What effects are shifts in federal support for computer science—e.g., shifts in
the  balance  between  short-  and  long-term  research,  shifts  in  the  roles  of  dif-
ferent  agencies—having  on  academic  and  industrial  computer  science  re-
search and development? What impacts will these changes have on the future
of  the  U.S.  information  technology  industry  and  on  innovation  in  this  field?
• Are  the  Federal  Government’s  current  priorities  related  to  computer  science
• What  should  the  Federal  Government  be  doing  to  implement  the  rec-
ommendations  of  the  recent  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory
Committee (PITAC) report on cyber security?

research appropriate? If not, how should they be changed?

5. Background
Federal Support for Information Technology Research

Many  of  the  technologies  that  enabled  electronic  commerce  to  take  off  in  the
1990s  are  based  on  research  initially  conducted  at  universities  and  funded  by
DARPA and NSF. The 2003 National Academy of Sciences (NAS) report Innovation
in  Information  Technology  lists  19  areas  in  which  federally  sponsored  fundamental
research  underpinned  the  innovations  that  eventually  became  multi-billion  dollar
information  technology  industries.1 Examples  relating  to  e-commerce  include  web
browsers, search engines, cryptography methods that allow secure credit card trans-
actions,  databases  to  manage  information  and  transactions,  and  the  protocols  and
hardware underlying the Internet itself. Often, the unanticipated results of such re-
search are as important as the anticipated results. For example, the early research
that  led  to  e-mail  and  instant  messaging  technologies  was  originally  done  in  the
1960s  as  part  of  a  project  examining  how  to  share  expensive  computing  resources
among multiple simultaneous and interacting users.

1 Computer Science and Telecommunications Board, National Academies, Innovation in Infor-

mation Technology, National Academy Press (2003), pages 6–7.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

These  innovations  have  helped  create  an  information  technology  sector  that  is
credited for nearly 30 percent of real growth in the U.S. gross domestic product from
1994  to  2000  and  that  currently  accounts  for  29  percent  of  all  U.S.  exports.2 The
military also depends heavily on the information technology sector’s commercial-off-
the-shelf products to meet its critical information technology needs.

Since  the  pace  of  change  in  information  technology  products  is  so  rapid,  compa-
nies’ main competitive advantage often comes from being first to market with a par-
ticular product or feature. If the U.S. research community isn’t producing the ideas,
or  if  the  ideas  are  classified,  it  is  less  likely  that  U.S.  companies  will  be  the  first
to benefit from the research results.

Academic  research  also  contributes  to  the  training  of  the  information  technology
workforce.  Research  grants  support  graduate  students,  and  undergraduate  and
graduate  computer  science  and  engineering  programs  at  universities  produce  the
software  developers  and  testers,  hardware  designers,  and  other  personnel  that
power the computing and communications industries and the industries that depend
on  information  technologies.  (For  example,  automotive  and  manufacturing  compa-
nies rely on modeling and simulation for product development and production man-
agement,  and  the  financial  services  sectors  utilize  information  technology  for  mod-
eling markets and securing financial transactions.)
Agencies That Support Academic Computer Science Research

University research in computer science is funded by a number of agencies within
the  Federal  Government  but  the  largest  contributors  are  DARPA  and  NSF,  which
together accounted for about 85 percent of the roughly $1.1 billion of federal funding
for  research  performed  at  universities  and  colleges  in  mathematics  and  computer
sciences  in  FY04.  Other  agencies  that  contribute  in  this  area  include  the  National
Institutes  of  Health,  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration,  the  De-
partment  of  Energy,  and  the  research  agencies  of  the  Armed  Forces.  Coordination
among  the  agencies  primarily  occurs  through  working  groups  organized  under  the
multi-agency National Information Technology Research and Development Program
(NITRD),  which  operates  under  the  auspices  of  the  White  House  Office  of  Science
and Technology Policy.

Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency

DARPA’s  mission  is  to  ensure  that  the  U.S.  military  remains,  over  the  long-run,
at the cutting edge of technology. DARPA conducts its mission by sponsoring revolu-
tionary, high-payoff research that bridges the gap between fundamental discoveries
and their military use. (The research it sponsors tends to be more revolutionary and
more targeted than the research funded by NSF.) DARPA does not conduct any re-
search itself; it sponsors research in academia and industry. DARPA’s programs are
organized  around  strategic  thrusts  in  areas  of  importance  to  national  security,  and
projects  are  sought  out  and  selected  by  program  managers.  These  program  man-
agers  usually  come  to  DARPA  on  leave  from  technical  positions  in  the  private  sec-
tor,  other  government  agencies,  or  academia  and  usually  stay  at  DARPA  for  about
four  to  six  years.  DARPA  program  managers  are  encouraged  to  pursue  high-risk
technical  ideas  and  have  the  authority  to  quickly  make  decisions  about  starting,
continuing, or stopping research projects.

DARPA  played  a  key  role  in  the  birth  and  maturation  of  computer  science  as  a
field and the development of many of the important sub-specialties. As described by
the  NAS  report,  DARPA  helped  start  many  of  today’s  university  computer  science
programs by funding large-scale university centers of excellence early in the history
of the computer science field.

DARPA  supported  research  that  produced  advances  in  areas  as  diverse  as  com-
puter graphics, artificial intelligence, networking, and computer architecture.3 A re-
cent  Defense  Science  Board  report  also  describes  the  unique  role  DARPA  has
played.  DARPA  program  managers  have  encouraged  simultaneous  yet  competing
work  by  industrial  and  university  researchers  on  the  technological  barriers  to  new
computing  capabilities  and  has  also  funded  university  researchers  to  produce  con-
vincing prototypes of revolutionary concepts.4

However, in the past five years, the computer science research community in both
academia  and  industry  has  raised  concerns  that  DARPA  has  been  narrowing  its
focus.  The  community  believes  DARPA  has  been  moving  away  from  investing  in

omy.html.

2 Data from the Information Technology Industry Council, http://www.itic.org/sections/Econ-

3 Computer Science and Telecommunications Board, National Academies, Innovation in Infor-

mation Technology, National Academy Press (2003), pages 23–25.

4 Report  of  the  Defense  Science  Board  Task  Force  on  High  Performance  Microchip  Supply,

February 2005, page 87.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

longer-term  basic  research  in  favor  of  increased  funding  for  development  of  specific
technologies  for  the  armed  forces’  more  immediate  defensive  and  offensive  needs.
They believe that this change in focus is evident in a number of ways—a reduction
of  funding  for  university  research  in  computer  science,  an  increase  in  classification
of research programs and restriction on participation of non-citizens, and reviews of
whether  to  continue  funding  individual  research  projects  at  12-  to  18-month  inter-
vals,  which  is  short  for  fundamental  research.5,6 These  concerns  recently  received
public airing in an article on the front page of the business section of the New York
Times (Attachment A) and an editorial in Science magazine (Attachment B).

The  way  DARPA  categorizes  its  research  makes  it  difficult  to  get  a  complete  pic-
ture  of  the  trends  in  its  computer  science  research.  DARPA’s  budget  requests,  rel-
evant  appropriations  language,  and  project  portfolio  management  are  organized  in
a  constantly  changing  array  of  ‘‘program  elements’’  rather  than  by  field.  However,
in  response  to  a  Congressional  request  for  historical  data  on  DARPA  funding  for
computer  science  and  the  amount  of  that  funding  given  to  universities,  DARPA  re-
viewed  individual  projects  from  the  recent  past  to  determine  which  could  be  classi-
fied  as  computer  science  research.  The  data  was  provided  for  FY01  through  FY04
(Table  1)  and  showed  that  while  overall  computer  science  funding  grew  slightly
(from  $546  million  in  FY01  to  $583  million  in  FY04),  funding  awarded  to  univer-
sities  for  computer  science  research  declined  each  year  in  that  period,  going  from
$214 million in FY01 to $123 million in FY04 (a drop of 43 percent).

Another  source  of  information  on  the  changing  role  of  DARPA  in  supporting  uni-
versity  computer  science  research  is  data  gathered  by  the  Computing  Research  As-
sociation. These data show that at leading university computer science departments,
both  the  dollar  amount  of  funding  received  from  DARPA,  and  the  percent  of  their
funding  from  DARPA  dropped  sharply  between  FY99  and  FY04.  The  percentage  of
their funding from DARPA in FY04 was roughly half of what it was in FY99.

DARPA has cited several factors that have contributed to this decline in its fund-
ing  for  university  computer  science  research.  First,  much  more  DARPA  computing
research  is  classified,  and  universities  generally  do  not  perform  classified  research.
The  impact  of  increased  classification  has  been  particularly  noticeable  in  the  area
of  information  assurance  (also  known  as  cyber  security)  for  which  the  unclassified
budget dropped by 50 percent between FY01 and FY04, leading to a drop in univer-
sity funding from $20 million to $4 million. Second is the congressional termination7
in FY04 of DARPA’s program on asymmetric threats, which included approximately
$11 million in university funding.

The third and perhaps most critical explanation for why DARPA’s funding for uni-
versity  computer  science  research  has  declined  is  that  work  in  many  ongoing  pro-
grams has progressed from the research phase to the product development and con-
struction  phase.  For  example,  DARPA  notes  that  work  on  high-performance  com-
puting has moved from research on how to design new computers to product devel-
opment, leading funding to shift from universities to industry. Similarly, work in in-
telligent software has gone beyond the fundamental research stage, leading DARPA
funding  in  that  area  for  universities  to  decline  from  about  $28  million  in  FY01  to

5 ‘‘An  Endless  Frontier  Postponed,’’  by  Edward  D.  Lazowska  and  David  A.  Patterson,  Science

Magazine, Volume 308, May 6, 2005, page 757.

6 Report  of  the  Defense  Science  Board  Task  Force  on  High  Performance  Microchip  Supply,

February 2005, page 88.

7 DARPA’s  work  on  asymmetric  threats  was  terminated  as  part  of  congressional  elimination
of DARPA’s larger Terrorism Information Awareness program (also known as Total Information
Awareness) in FY04 due to congressional concerns about the appropriateness of the overall pro-
gram goals.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

about  $8  million  in  FY04.  But  computer  scientists  argue  that,  while  work  has  pro-
gressed in these programs, there is basic research to be pursued in other, new areas.
Finally,  DARPA  may  be  feeling  increasing  pressure  from  the  Department  of  De-
fense  and  the  individual  armed  services  to  more  quickly  develop  new  technologies
that  can  be  deployed  to  meet  current  and  near-term  needs.  DARPA  has  always
played a critical role in the development of technologies for the armed forces. Exam-
ples  of  current  DARPA  programs  with  important  short-term  impacts  include  the
Marine  Airborne  Retransmission  System  program,  which  helps  extend  the  range  of
tactical  radios  and  is  expected  to  be  deployed  with  the  Marine  Corps  in  Iraq  very
soon, and work on operating systems for unmanned combat air vehicles.

DARPA  has  always  carried  out  a  mix  of  nearer-  and  longer-term  work  and  the
question is whether the current balance is appropriate. Academic and some industry
researchers fear that the balance is now shifting too much in the direction of nearer-
term  work,  which  will  deprive  the  U.S.  industry  (and  military)  of  ideas  that  could
be  helpful  in  the  future.  For  example,  research  is  needed  on  how  to  integrate
nanotechnology and biotechnology with information technology systems.

National Science Foundation

Like  DARPA,  NSF  performs  no  research  itself.  At  NSF,  projects  are  selected  for
funding  through  a  competitive,  peer  review  process,  in  which  NSF  brings  together
panels of experts in a given field to review proposals anonymously. Researchers can
send  project  proposals  to  NSF  either  in  response  to  agency-issued  requests  for  pro-
posals in specific areas or as unsolicited proposals.

Computer  science  research  at  NSF  is  conducted  almost  entirely  in  the  Computer
and  Information  Sciences  and  Engineering  Directorate  (CISE),  although  the  direc-
torate  funding  is  not  entirely  devoted  to  computer  science  research.  Relevant  CISE
activities include support for investigator-initiated research in all areas of computer
and  information  science  and  engineering;  development  and  maintenance  of  cutting-
edge  national  computing  and  information  infrastructure  for  research  and  education
in  many  fields;  and  support  for  the  education  and  training  of  the  next  generation
of computer scientists and engineers.

In  the  five  years  between  FY00  and  FY04,  the  number  of  proposals  received  at
CISE  annually  has  more  than  doubled  (Table  2).  While  funding  has  also  increased,
it has not kept pace with increasing proposal pressure and the rising costs of doing
research.  As  a  result,  the  success  rate  for  proposals  dropped  to  16  percent,  which
is  the  lowest  of  any  NSF  directorate.  During  the  same  time  period,  the  percentage
of  federal  funding  for  research  performed  at  universities  and  colleges  in  mathe-
matics  and  computer  sciences  that  was  provided  by  NSF  grew  from  55  percent  to
65 percent.8

A  number  of  factors  have  contributed  to  this  rise  in  proposal  pressure  and  the
drop in success rate. One is the growing number of computer science faculty looking
to the Federal Government for research support. From the 1999–2000 academic year
to the 2003–2004 academic year, the number of faculty in the top 24 U.S. computer

8 Federal  Funds  for  Research  and  Development:  Fiscal  Years  2002,  2003,  and  2004;  Federal
Funds  for  Research  and  Development:  Fiscal  Years  2001,  2002,  and  2003;  and  Federal  Funds
for Research and Development: Fiscal Years 2000, 2001, and 2002. All compiled by the NSF Divi-
sion of Science Resources Statistics.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

science  departments  increased  by  27  percent  (nearly  300  new  faculty),  and  similar
growth  patterns  were  seen  in  the  total  number  of  faculty  at  all  computer  science
departments.9 Another  factor  is  the  growth  of  interest  in  the  types  of  computer
science-related  programs  funded  by  CISE.  As  researchers  from  other  disciplines
have  discovered  the  value  of  information  technology  in  tackling  outstanding  ques-
tions  in  their  fields,  scientists  in  physics,  oceanography,  biology,  and  many  other
areas have begun to seek funding from CISE. Finally, while the number of proposals
was rising, CISE was also making a concerted effort to increase grant size in order
to  enhance  researchers’  productivity  and  improve  opportunities  for  training  stu-
dents.  While  this  strategy  was  consistent  with  recommendations  made  by  PITAC
and  overall  NSF  goals,  it  also  limited  CISE’s  ability  to  increase  the  number  of
grants awarded.

Given  the  multitude  of  factors  that  have  contributed  to  the  increase  in  proposals
submitted  to  CISE,  it  is  difficult  to  determine  how  much  of  this  change  is  due  to
researchers  shifting  their  focus  to  NSF  from  DARPA  because  of  the  increasing  dif-
ficulty of getting DARPA grants.

How DARPA and NSF Complement Each Other

Both DARPA and NSF have played a critical role in the development of computer
science.  NSF  programs  are  generally  driven  by  researchers’  proposals  and  peer  re-
view  while  DARPA’s  investments  are  generally  driven  by  the  priorities  set  out  by
program  managers  who  try  to  push  the  research  envelope  to  meet  particular  mili-
tary and national needs. NSF support is essential to the ongoing research and edu-
cation  work  of  a  broad  computer  science  community;  DARPA  work  is  essential  to
pulling that community into specific, newer areas. Both agencies have funded work
that has led to technological leaps in information technology.

The  Science  Committee  has  been  reviewing  the  relationship  between  the  two
agencies for some time. For example, on May 14, 2003, the Science Committee held
a  hearing  to  examine  federal  cyber  security  R&D  activities.  At  the  hearing,  Dr.
Tether, the Director of DARPA, in response to a question about whether the Federal
Government  was  giving  sufficient  priority  to  the  needs  of  cyber  security,  answered
that DARPA is ‘‘more idea limited right now than we are funding limited,’’ and indi-
cated that DARPA relied on NSF to supply ideas. That appeared to be a shift away
from  DARPA’s  historic  role,  in  which  it  funded  fundamental  research  to  foster  new
ideas  as  well  as  working  to  bring  ideas  to  the  development  stage.  Also  many  com-
puter scientists expressed surprise at the DARPA comment, arguing that numerous
ideas for research were going begging for money.
PITAC Report—Cyber Security: A Crisis of Prioritization

On  March  18,  2005,  the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee
(PITAC) released their report Cyber Security: A Crisis of Prioritization. (The Execu-
tive  Summary  of  the  report  is  Attachment  C.)  In  it,  the  Committee  argues  for  in-
creased  federal  funding  for  cyber  security  research  and  emphasizes  the  important
and  complementary  roles  multiple  agencies  play  in  ensuring  that  the  next  genera-
tion of cyber security technologies will be developed and implemented.

Specifically, the report presents four findings and recommendations. The first rec-
ommendation is that Congress and the Administration should substantially increase
funding for fundamental research in civilian cyber security at a number of agencies,
especially  NSF,  DARPA,  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS).  In  par-
ticular,  the  report  recommends  that  funding  for  cyber  security  research  at  NSF  be
increased by $90 million annually.

The second recommendation from the Committee is that the Federal Government
increase its support for recruitment and retention of cyber security researchers and
students at research universities, with a goal of at least doubling the size of the ci-
vilian cyber security fundamental research community by the end of the decade. In
particular,  the  report  recommends  increased,  stable  funding  for  research,  recruit-
ment of people from other fields into cyber security, and increased emphasis on the
importance of unclassified cyber security research.

The third recommendation from the Committee is that, because current cyber se-
curity technology transfer efforts are not adequate to move the results of federal re-
search investments into civilian sector best practices and products, the Federal Gov-
ernment  should  strengthen  its  cyber  security  technology  transfer  partnership  with
the private sector. Examples of what the Federal Government could do include: plac-
ing greater emphasis on the development of metrics, models, data sets, and testbeds
so that new products and best practices could be evaluated; and encouraging feder-

9 Annual  Taulbee  Surveys  from  the  Computing  Research  Association.  Available  on  line  at

http://www.cra.org/statistics/.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

ally supported graduate students and postdoctoral researchers to gain experience in
industry as researchers, interns, or consultants.

The  final  recommendation  from  the  Committee  is  that  the  Federal  Government
should improve coordination and oversight of federal cyber security R&D to increase
the focus and efficiency of the programs. Currently several interagency groups focus
on,  or  include  cyber  security  research  in  their  missions,  but  there  is  not  a  single
group with primary responsibility. The Committee recommends that the Interagency
Working  Group  on  Critical  Information  Infrastructure  Protection  become  the  focal
point  for  coordinating  federal  cyber  security  R&D  efforts.  One  task  for  a  strength-
ened version of this working group would be to systematically collect data on federal
cyber security R&D efforts.
6. Witness Questions

The  witnesses  were  asked  to  address  the  following  questions  in  their  testimony:

Questions for Dr. John Marburger:

• What  are  the  Administration’s  highest  priorities  in  computer  science  re-
search?  How  and  why  have  these  priorities—and  overall  federal  support  for
computer science research—changed in the last five years?

• What  are  the  relative  roles  of  the  National  Science  Foundation  and  the  De-
fense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency  in  supporting  computer  science  re-
search? How and why have these roles been changing?

• What  is  the  Administration’s  response  to  the  recent  President’s  Information

Technology Advisory Committee (PITAC) report on cyber security?

Questions for Dr. Anthony Tether:

• How  does  the  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency’s  (DARPA’s)  sup-

port for computer science research relate to its overall mission?

• What are DARPA’s highest priorities in computer science research?
• How  do  you  determine  the  balance  between  short-  and  long-term  research
programs?  How  does  DARPA  utilize  academic  and  industrial  researchers  for
computer  science  projects?  Has  the  balance  between  short-  and  long-term  re-
search  and  between  academic  and  industrial  researchers  within  DARPA’s
computer science research portfolio changed in the last five years? If so, why?
• What  is  DARPA’s  response  to  the  recent  President’s  Information  Technology

Advisory Committee (PITAC) report on cyber security?

Questions for Dr. Wm. Wulf:

• What effects are shifts in federal support for computer science—e.g., shifts in
the  balance  between  short-  and  long-term  research,  shifts  in  the  roles  of  dif-
ferent  agencies—having  on  academic  and  industrial  computer  science  re-
search? What effects are changes in that research likely to have on the future
of  the  U.S.  information  technology  industry  and  on  innovation  in  this  field?
• Are  the  Federal  Government’s  current  priorities  related  to  computer  science

research appropriate? If not, how should they be changed?

• What  are  your  views  on  the  recent  President’s  Information  Technology  Advi-
sory  Committee  (PITAC)  report  on  cyber  security?  What  should  the  Federal
Government  be  doing  to  implement  the  recommendations  of  this  report?
Should PITAC be renewed when its current term expires on June 1?

Questions for Dr. Tom Leighton:

• Please explain the findings and recommendations of the recent President’s In-
formation  Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC)  report  on  Cyber  Security:
A Crisis of Prioritization.

• What  role  does  cyber  security  research  conducted  at  universities  play  in  the
development of cyber security tools and the implementation of good cyber se-
curity practices by U.S. companies?

• How  have  the  composition  and  activities  of  the  cyber  security  research  com-
munity  changed  in  recent  years?  How  has  federal  support  for  cyber  security
research changed in recent years?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment A

10

PENTAGON REDIRECTS ITS RESEARCH DOLLARS

NEW YORK TIMES, APRIL 2, 2005, PAGE C1

BY JOHN MARKOFF

SAN  FRANCISCO,  April  1—The  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency  at
the  Pentagon—which  has  long  underwritten  open-ended  ‘‘blue  sky’’  research  by  the
Nation’s  best  computer  scientists—is  sharply  cutting  such  spending  at  universities,
researchers  say,  in  favor  of  financing  more  classified  work  and  narrowly  defined
projects that promise a more immediate payoff.

Hundreds  of  research  projects  supported  by  the  agency,  known  as  DARPA,  have
paid off handsomely in recent decades, leading not only to new weapons, but to com-
mercial technologies from the personal computer to the Internet. The agency has de-
voted hundreds of millions of dollars to basic software research, too, including work
that  led  to  such  recent  advances  as  the  Web  search  technologies  that  Google  and
others have introduced.

The shift away from basic research is alarming many leading computer scientists
and electrical engineers, who warn that there will be long-term consequences for the
Nation’s economy. They are accusing the Pentagon of reining in an agency that has
played  a  crucial  role  in  fostering  America’s  lead  in  computer  and  communications
technologies.

‘‘I’m  worried  and  depressed,’’  said  David  Patterson,  a  computer  scientist  at  the
University of California, Berkeley who is President of the Association of Computing
Machinery, an industry and academic trade group. ‘‘I think there will be great tech-
nologies that won’t be there down the road when we need them.’’

University  researchers,  usually  reluctant  to  speak  out,  have  started  quietly  chal-
lenging the agency’s new approach. They assert that DARPA has shifted a lot more
work in recent years to military contractors, adopted a focus on short-term projects
while  cutting  support  for  basic  research,  classified  formerly  open  projects  as  secret
and placed new restrictions on sharing information.

This  week,  in  responding  to  a  query  from  the  staff  of  the  Senate  Armed  Services
Committee,  DARPA  officials  acknowledged  for  the  first  time  a  shift  in  focus.  They
revealed  that  within  a  relatively  steady  budget  for  computer  science  research  that
rose  slightly  from  $546  million  in  2001  to  $583  million  last  year,  the  portion  going
to university researchers has fallen from $214 million to $123 million.

The  agency  cited  a  number  of  reasons  for  the  decline:  increased  reliance  on  cor-
porate  research;  a  need  for  more  classified  projects  since  9/11;  Congress’s  decision
to  end  controversial  projects  like  Total  Information  Awareness  because  of  privacy
fears;  and  the  shift  of  some  basic  research  to  advanced  weapons  systems  develop-
ment.

In  Silicon  Valley,  executives  are  also  starting  to  worry  about  the  consequences  of

DARPA’s stinting on basic research in computer science.

‘‘This  has  been  a  phenomenal  system  for  harnessing  intellectual  horsepower  for
the  country,’’  said  David  L.  Tennenhouse,  a  former  DARPA  official  who  is  now  Di-
rector of Research for Intel. ‘‘We should be careful how we tinker with it.’’

University  scientists  assert  that  the  changes  go  even  further  than  what  DARPA
has disclosed. As financing has dipped, the remaining research grants come with yet
more  restrictions,  they  say,  often  tightly  linked  to  specific  ‘‘deliverables’’  that  dis-
courage exploration and serendipitous discoveries.

Many  grants  also  limit  the  use  of  graduate  students  to  those  who  hold  American
citizenship,  a  rule  that  hits  hard  in  computer  science,  where  many  researchers  are
foreign.

The shift at DARPA has been noted not just by those researchers directly involved

in computing technologies, but by those in other fields supported by the agency.

‘‘I  can  see  they  are  after  deliverables,  but  the  unfortunate  thing  is  that  basic  re-
search gets squeezed out in the process,’’ said Wolfgang Porod, Director of the Cen-
ter for Nano Science and Technology at the University of Notre Dame.

The  concerns  are  highlighted  in  a  report  on  the  state  of  the  Nation’s  cyber  secu-
rity  that  was  released  with  little  fanfare  in  March  by  the  President’s  Information
Technology  Advisory  Committee.  DARPA  has  long  focused  on  long-term  basic  re-
search  projects  with  time  horizons  that  exceed  five  years,  the  report  notes,  but  by
last  year,  very  little  of  DARPA’s  financing  was  being  directed  toward  fundamental
research in the field.

‘‘Virtually every aspect of information technology upon which we rely today bears
the  stamp  of  federally  sponsored  university  research,’’  said  Ed  Lazowska,  a  com-
puter  scientist  at  the  University  of  Washington  and  co-chairman  of  the  advisory

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

panel.  ‘‘The  Federal  Government  is  walking  away  from  this  role,  killing  the  goose
that laid the golden egg.’’

As a result of the new restrictions, a number of computer scientists said they had
chosen not to work with DARPA any longer. Last year, the agency offered to support
research by Leonard Kleinrock, a computer scientist at the University of California,
Los  Angeles  who  was  one  of  the  small  group  of  researchers  who  developed  the
Arpanet, the 1960’s predecessor to today’s Internet.

Dr. Kleinrock said that he decided that he was not interested in the project when
he  learned  that  the  agency  was  insisting  that  he  employ  only  graduate  assistants
with American citizenship.

DARPA officials, who declined repeated requests for interviews, disputed the uni-
versity  researchers.  The  agency,  which  responded  only  in  writing  to  questions,  con-
tended  that  the  criticisms  leveled  by  the  advisory  committee  and  other  researchers
were  not  accurate  and  that  it  had  always  supported  a  mix  of  longer-  and  shorter-
term research.

‘‘The  key  is  a  focus  on  high-risk,  high-payoff  research,’’  Jan  Walker,  a  DARPA
spokeswoman, stated in an e-mail message. Given the threat from terrorism and the
demands  on  troops  in  Iraq,  she  wrote,  DARPA  is  rightly  devoting  more  attention
to ‘‘quick reaction’’ projects that draw on the fruits of earlier science and technology
to produce useful prototypes as soon as possible.

The Pentagon shift has put added pressure on the other federal agencies that sup-

port basic information technology research.

At  the  Directorate  for  Computer  and  Information  Science  and  Engineering  of  the
National  Science  Foundation,  the  number  of  research  proposals  has  soared  from
2,000 in 1999 to 6,500 last year. Peter A. Freeman, its director, said that the sharp
rise was partly attributable to declines in Pentagon support.

‘‘DARPA has moved away from direct funding to universities,’’ Mr. Freeman said.
‘‘Even  when  they  do  directly  fund,  some  of  the  conditions  and  constraints  seem  to
be  pretty  onerous.  There  is  no  question  that  the  community  doesn’t  like  what  the
head of DARPA has been doing, but he has his reasons and his prerogatives.’’

The transformation of DARPA has been led by Anthony J. Tether, a Stanford-edu-
cated electrical engineer who has had a long career moving between executive posi-
tions at military contractors and the Pentagon.

Last  year,  Dr.  Tether’s  new  approach  led  to  a  series  of  cutbacks  at  a  number  of
computer  science  departments.  Program  financing  for  a  DARPA  project  known  as
Network  Embedded  Sensor  Technology—intended  to  develop  networks  of  sensors
that  could  potentially  be  deployed  on  battlefields  to  locate  and  track  enemy  tanks
and  soldiers—has  been  cut  back  or  ended  on  as  many  as  five  university  campuses
and shifted instead to traditional military contractors.

‘‘The  network  has  now  become  as  vital  as  the  weapons  themselves,’’  Dr.  Tether
said  in  an  appearance  before  the  advisory  committee  last  year,  testifying  that  se-
crecy had become more essential for a significant part of the agency’s work.

That has created problems for university researchers. Several scientists have been
instructed, for example, to remove previously published results from Web sites. And
at  U.C.L.A.  and  Berkeley,  DARPA  officials  tried  to  classify  software  research  done
under a contract that specified that the results would be distributed under so-called
open-source licensing terms.

‘‘We  were  requested  to  remove  all  publicly  accessible  pointers  to  software  devel-
oped  under  the  program,’’  said  Deborah  Estrin,  Director  of  Embedded  Network
Sensing at U.C.L.A. ‘‘This is the first time in 15 years that I have no DARPA fund-
ing.’’

At Berkeley, Edward A. Lee, who was recently named Chairman of the Computer
Science  Department,  agreed  not  to  publish  a  final  report  at  DARPA’s  request,  even
though he told officials the data had already become widely available.

Despite  the  complaints,  some  pioneering  researchers  support  the  changes  being
driven  by  Dr.  Tether  and  say  they  are  necessary  to  prepare  the  Nation  for  a  long
battle against elusive enemies.

‘‘There are pressures and demands on DARPA to be relevant,’’ said Robert Kahn,
a  former  DARPA  administrator  who  is  now  President  of  the  Corporation  for  Na-
tional Research Initiatives in Reston, Va. ‘‘People think it should stay the same, but
times have changed.’’

Still, a number of top scientists argue that the Pentagon’s shift in priorities could
not have come at a worse time. Most American companies have largely ended basic
research and have begun to outsource product research and development extensively
even as investments in Asia and Europe are rising quickly.

And  many  computer  scientists  dispute  DARPA’s  reasoning  that  fighting  wars  de-
mands a shift away from basic research. During the Vietnam War, they say, DARPA
kept its commitment to open-ended computer research, supporting things like a lab-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

oratory in the hills behind Stanford University dedicated to the far-out idea of build-
ing computing machines to mimic human capabilities.

John  McCarthy  founded  the  Stanford  artificial  research  lab  in  1964,  helping  to
turn it into a wellspring for some of Silicon Valley’s most important companies, from
Xerox Parc to Apple to Intel.

‘‘American leadership in computer science and in applications has benefited more

from the longer-term work,’’ Mr. McCarthy said, ‘‘than from the deliverables.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment B

13

EDITORIAL: AN ENDLESS FRONTIER POSTPONED

SCIENCE MAGAZINE, VOLUME 308, MAY 6, 2005, PAGE 757

BY EDWARD D. LAZOWSKA AND DAVID A. PATTERSON

Next  month,  U.S.  scientists  Vinton  G.  Cerf  and  Robert  E.  Kahn  will  receive
computing’s  highest  prize,  the  A.M.  Turing  Award,  from  the  Association  for  Com-
puting  Machinery.  Their  Transmission  Control  Protocol  (TCP),  created  in  1973,  be-
came  the  language  of  the  Internet.  Twenty  years  later,  the  Mosaic  Web  browser
gave the Internet its public face. TCP and Mosaic illustrate the nature of computer
science  research,  combining  a  quest  for  fundamental  understanding  with  consider-
ations of use. They also illustrate the essential role of government-sponsored univer-
sity-based research in producing the ideas and people that drive innovation in infor-
mation technology (IT).

Recent  changes  in  the  U.S.  funding  landscape  have  put  this  innovation  pipeline
at risk. The Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA) funded TCP. The
shock of the Soviet satellite Sputnik in 1957 led to the creation of the agency, which
was  charged  with  preventing  future  technological  surprises.  From  its  inception,
DARPA  funded  long-term  non-classified  IT  research  in  academia,  even  during  sev-
eral  wars,  to  leverage  all  the  best  minds.  Much  of  this  research  was  dual-use,  with
the results ultimately advancing military systems and spurring the IT industry.

U.S. IT research grew largely under DARPA and the National Science Foundation
(NSF).  NSF  relied  on  peer  review,  whereas  DARPA  bet  on  vision  and  reputation,
complementary approaches that served the Nation well. Over the past four decades,
the  resulting  research  has  laid  the  foundation  for  the  modern  microprocessor,  the
Internet,  the  graphical  user  interface,  and  single-user  workstations.  It  has  also
launched new fields such as computational science. Virtually every aspect of IT that
we  rely  on  today  bears  the  stamp  of  federally  sponsored  research.  A  2003  National
Academies  study  provided  19  examples  where  such  work  ultimately  led  to  billion-
dollar  industries,  an  economic  benefit  that  reaffirms  science  advisor  Vannevar
Bush’s 1945 vision in Science: The Endless Frontier.

However,  in  the  past  three  years,  DARPA  funding  for  IT  research  at  universities
has dropped by nearly half. Policy changes at the agency, including increased classi-
fication  of  research  programs,  increased  restrictions  on  the  participation  of  nonciti-
zens,  and  ‘‘go/no-go’’  reviews  applied  to  research  at  12-  to  18-month  intervals,  dis-
courage  participation  by  university  researchers  and  signal  a  shift  from  pushing  the
leading  edge  to  ‘‘bridging  the  gap’’  between  fundamental  research  and  deployable
technologies.  In  essence,  NSF  is  now  relied  on  to  support  the  long-term  research
needed to advance the IT field.

Other agencies have not stepped in. The Defense Science Board noted in a recent
look  at  microchip  research  at  the  Department  of  Defense  (DOD):  ‘‘[DARPA’s]  with-
drawal  has  created  a  vacuum. . ..  The  problem,  for  DOD,  the  IT  industry,  and  the
Nation  as  a  whole,  is  that  no  effective  leadership  structure  has  been  substituted.’’
The Department of Homeland Security, according to a recent report from the Presi-
dent’s Information Technology Advisory Committee, spends less than two percent of
its  Science  and  Technology  budget  on  cyber  security,  and  only  a  small  fraction  of
that on research. NASA is downsizing computational science, and IT research budg-
ets  at  the  Department  of  Energy  and  the  National  Institutes  of  Health  are  slated
for cuts in the president’s fiscal year 2006 budget.

These changes, combined with the growth of the discipline, have placed a signifi-
cant  burden  on  NSF,  which  is  now  showing  the  strain.  Last  year,  NSF  supported
86 percent of federal obligations for fundamental research in IT at academic institu-
tions.  The  funding  rate  for  competitive  awards  in  the  IT  sector  fell  to  16  percent,
the  lowest  of  any  directorate.  Such  low  success  rates  are  harmful  to  the  discipline
and, ultimately, to the Nation.*

At  a  time  when  global  competitors  are  gaining  the  capacity  and  commitment  to
challenge  U.S.  high-tech  leadership,  this  changed  landscape  threatens  to  derail  the
extraordinarily  productive  interplay  of  academia,  government,  and  industry  in  IT.
Given the importance of IT in enabling the new economy and in opening new areas
of  scientific  discovery,  we  simply  cannot  afford  to  cede  leadership.  Where  will  the
next  generation  of  ground-breaking  innovations  in  IT  arise?  Where  will  the  Turing
Awardees  30  years  hence  reside?  Given  current  trends,  the  answers  to  both  ques-
tions will likely be, ‘‘not in the United States.’’

About  the  Authors:  Edward  D.  Lazowska  holds  the  Bill  &  Melinda  Gates  Chair
in Computer Science & Engineering at the University of Washington. David A. Pat-
terson holds the E.H. and M.E. Pardee Chair of Computer Science at the University

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

of  California,  Berkeley,  and  is  president  of  the  Association  for  Computing  Machin-
ery. Both are members of the National Academy of Engineering and the President’s
Information Technology Advisory Committee, and past chairs of the Computing Re-
search Association.

* The  House  Science  Committee  will  consider  these  issues  at  a  12  May  hearing
on ‘‘The Future of Computer Science Research in the U.S.’’ See http://www.cra.org/
research.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment C

15

CYBER SECURITY: A CRISIS OF PRIORITIZATION

REPORT TO THE PRESIDENT FROM THE PRESIDENT’S INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY

ADVISORY COMMITTEE
RELEASED MARCH 2005

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY

The information technology (IT) infrastructure of the United States, which is now
vital  for  communication,  commerce,  and  control  of  our  physical  infrastructure,  is
highly vulnerable to terrorist and criminal attacks. The private sector has an impor-
tant  role  in  securing  the  Nation’s  IT  infrastructure  by  deploying  sound  security
products and adopting good security practices. But the Federal Government also has
a  key  role  to  play  by  supporting  the  discovery  and  development  of  cyber  security
technologies  that  underpin  these  products  and  practices.  The  PITAC  finds  that  the
Federal Government needs to fundamentally improve its approach to cyber security
to fulfill its responsibilities in this regard.
Background

The Nation’s IT infrastructure has undergone a dramatic transformation over the
last decade. Explosive growth in the use of networks to connect various IT systems
has  made  it  relatively  easy  to  obtain  information,  to  communicate,  and  to  control
these systems across great distances. Because of the tremendous productivity gains
and  new  capabilities  enabled  by  these  networked  systems,  they  have  been  incor-
porated  into  a  vast  number  of  civilian  applications,  including  education,  commerce,
science  and  engineering,  and  entertainment.  They  have  also  been  incorporated  into
virtually  every  sector  of  the  Nation’s  critical  infrastructure—including  communica-
tions, utilities, finance, transportation, law enforcement, and defense. Indeed, these
sectors are now critically reliant on the underlying IT infrastructure.

At  the  same  time,  this  revolution  in  connectivity  has  also  increased  the  potential
of  those  who  would  do  harm,  giving  them  the  capability  to  do  so  from  afar  while
armed  with  only  a  computer  and  the  knowledge  needed  to  identify  and  exploit
vulnerabilities.  Today,  it  is  possible  for  a  malicious  agent  to  penetrate  millions  of
computers  around  the  world  in  a  matter  of  minutes,  exploiting  those  machines  to
attack the Nation’s critical infrastructure, penetrate sensitive systems, or steal valu-
able data. The growth in the number of attacks matches the tremendous growth in
connectivity, and dealing with these attacks now costs the Nation billions of dollars
annually. Moreover, we are rapidly losing ground to those who do harm, as is indi-
cated  by  the  steadily  mounting  numbers  of  compromised  networks  and  resulting  fi-
nancial losses.

Beyond economic repercussions, the risks to our nation’s security are clear. In ad-
dition to the potential for attacks on critical targets within our borders, our national
defense systems are at risk as well, because the military increasingly relies on ubiq-
uitous  communication  and  the  networks  that  support  it.  The  Global  Information
Grid  (GIG),  which  is  projected  to  cost  as  much  as  $100  billion  and  is  intended  to
improve military communications by linking weapons, intelligence, and military per-
sonnel  to  each  other,  represents  one  such  critical  network.  Since  military  networks
interconnect  with  those  in  the  civilian  sector  or  use  similar  hardware  or  software,
they  are  susceptible  to  any  vulnerability  in  these  other  networks  or  technologies.
Thus cyber security in the civilian and military sectors is intrinsically linked.

Although  the  large  costs  associated  with  cyber  insecurity  have  only  recently  be-
come  manifest,  the  Nation’s  cyber  security  problems  have  been  building  for  many
years  and  will  plague  us  for  many  years  to  come.  They  derive  from  a  decades-long
failure to develop the security protocols and practices needed to protect the Nation’s
IT infrastructure, and to adequately train and grow the numbers of experts needed
to  employ  those  mechanisms  effectively.  The  short-term  patches  and  fixes  that  are
deployed today can be useful in response to isolated vulnerabilities, but they do not
adequately  address  the  core  problems.  Rather,  fundamental,  long-term  research  is
required  to  develop  entirely  new  approaches  to  cyber  security.  It  is  imperative  that
we  take  action  before  the  situation  worsens  and  the  cost  of  inaction  becomes  even
greater.
Summary of Findings and Recommendations

The  PITAC’s  recommendations  on  cyber  security,  and  the  findings  upon  which

those recommendations are based, are summarized below.
Issue  1: Federal  Funding  Levels  for  Fundamental  Research  in  Civilian

Cyber Security

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

Long-term,  fundamental  research  in  cyber  security  requires  a  significant  invest-
ment by the Federal Government because market forces direct private sector invest-
ment away from research and toward the application of existing technologies to de-
velop marketable products. However, federal funding for cyber security research has
shifted from long-term, fundamental research toward shorter-term research and de-
velopment, and from civilian research toward military and intelligence applications.
Research  in  these  domains  is  often  classified  and  the  results  are  thus  unavailable
for  use  in  securing  civilian  IT  infrastructure  and  commercial  off-the-shelf  (COTS)
products  in  widespread  use  by  both  government  and  the  civilian  sector.  These
changes have been particularly dramatic at the Defense Advanced Research Projects
Agency  (DARPA)  and  the  National  Security  Agency  (NSA);  other  agencies,  such  as
the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security
(DHS),  have  not  stepped  in  to  fill  the  gaps  that  have  been  created.  As  a  result,  in-
vestment  in  fundamental  research  in  civilian  cyber  security  is  decreasing  at  the
time when it is most desperately needed.

The  PITAC  finds  that  the  Federal  R&D  budget  provides  inadequate  funding  for
fundamental research in civilian cyber security, and recommends that the NSF budg-
et  in  this  area  be  increased  by  $90  million  annually.  Funding  for  fundamental  re-
search in civilian cyber security should also be substantially increased at other agen-
cies,  most  notably  DHS  and  DARPA.  Funding  should  be  allocated  so  that  at  least
the ten specific areas listed in the ‘‘Cyber Security Research Priorities’’ section begin-
ning on page 37 of Chapter 4 are appropriately addressed. Further increases in fund-
ing may be necessary depending on the Nation’s future cyber security posture.
Issue 2: The Cyber Security Fundamental Research Community

Improving  the  Nation’s  cyber  security  posture  requires  highly  trained  people  to
develop,  deploy,  and  incorporate  new  cyber  security  products  and  practices.  The
number  of  such  highly  trained  people  in  the  U.S.  is  too  small  given  the  magnitude
of  the  challenge.  At  U.S.  academic  institutions  today,  the  PITAC  estimates,  there
are  fewer  than  250  active  cyber  security  or  cyber  assurance  specialists,  many  of
whom  lack  either  formal  training  or  extensive  professional  experience  in  the  field.
In  part,  this  situation  exists  because  cyber  security  has  historically  been  the  focus
of  a  small  segment  of  the  computer  science  and  engineering  research  community.
The  situation  has  been  exacerbated  by  the  insufficient  and  unstable  funding  levels
for long-term, civilian cyber security research, which universities depend upon to at-
tract and retain faculty.

The PITAC finds that the Nation’s cyber security research community is too small
to  adequately  support  the  cyber  security  research  and  education  programs  necessary
to  protect  the  United  States.  The  PITAC  recommends  that  the  Federal  Government
intensify its efforts to promote recruitment and retention of cyber security researchers
and students at research universities, with a goal of at least doubling the size of the
civilian cyber security fundamental research community by the end of the decade. In
particular, the Federal Government should increase and stabilize funding for funda-
mental research in civilian cyber security, and should support programs that enable
researchers to move into cyber security research from other fields.
Issue  3:  Translating  Research  into  Effective  Cyber  Security  for  the  Nation
Technology  transfer  enables  the  results  of  federally  supported  R&D  to  be  incor-
porated into products that are available for general use. There has been a long and
successful  history  of  federally  funded  IT  R&D  being  transferred  into  products  and
best practices that are widely adopted in the private sector, in many cases spawning
entirely  new  billion-dollar  industries.  Technology  transfer  has  been  particularly
challenging in the area of cyber security, however, because the value of a good cyber
security  product  to  the  consumer  lies  in  the  reduced  incidence  of  successful  at-
tacks—a factor difficult to quantify in the short-term as a return on investment.

The PITAC finds that current cyber security technology transfer efforts are not ade-
quate  to  successfully  transition  federal  research  investments  into  civilian  sector  best
practices and products. As a result, the PITAC recommends that the Federal Govern-
ment  strengthen  its  cyber  security  technology  transfer  partnership  with  the  private
sector. Specifically, the Federal Government should place greater emphasis on the de-
velopment  of  metrics,  models,  data  sets,  and  testbeds  so  that  new  products  and  best
practices  can  be  evaluated;  jointly  sponsor  with  the  private  sector  an  annual  inter-
agency conference at which new cyber security R&D results are showcased; fund tech-
nology  transfer  efforts  (in  cooperation  with  industry)  by  researchers  who  have  devel-
oped  promising  ideas  or  technologies;  and  encourage  federally  supported  graduate
students  and  postdoctoral  researchers  to  gain  experience  in  industry  as  researchers,
interns, or consultants.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

Issue 4: Coordination and Oversight for Federal Cyber Security R&D

One of the key problems with the Federal Government’s current approach to cyber
security  is  that  the  government-wide  coordination  of  cyber  security  R&D  is  ineffec-
tive.  Research  agendas  and  programs  are  not  systematically  coordinated  across
agencies  and,  as  a  result,  misconceptions  among  agencies  regarding  each  others’
programs  and  responsibilities  have  been  allowed  to  develop,  causing  important  pri-
orities to be overlooked. In the absence of coordination, individual agencies focus on
their  individual  missions  and  can  lose  sight  of  overarching  national  needs.  Initia-
tives  to  strengthen  and  enlarge  the  cyber  security  research  community  and  efforts
to  implement  the  results  of  R&D  would  be  more  effective  and  efficient  with  signifi-
cantly stronger coordination across the Federal Government.

The  PITAC  finds  that  the  overall  federal  cyber  security  R&D  effort  is  currently
unfocused and inefficient because of inadequate coordination and oversight. To rem-
edy this situation, PITAC recommends that the Interagency Working Group on Crit-
ical  Information  Infrastructure  Protection  (CIIP)  become  the  focal  point  for  coordi-
nating  federal  cyber  security  R&D  efforts.  This  working  group  should  be  strength-
ened  and  integrated  under  the  Networking  and  Information  Technology  Research
and Development (NITRD) Program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  I  want  to  welcome  everyone  here  this
morning  to  this  extraordinarily  important  hearing.  We  are  here  to
examine  the  state  of  federal  computer  science  funding.  That  may
sound like an arcane and even dreary subject, but what is at stake
is nothing less than our nation’s future prosperity and security.

That  is  not  an  exaggeration.  Information  technology  advances
are responsible for our productivity and economic health, and infor-
mation  technology  undergirds  and  facilitates  just  about  every  per-
sonal  and  commercial  activity  we  undertake  these  days.  Informa-
tion technology provides not just a web, it is the warp and woof of
our society.

And  it  is  too  easy  to  take  something  that  has  become  so  basic
and so omnipresent for granted. But we didn’t get to where we are
today by accident and indirection. We are the world leader in infor-
mation  technology,  in  part,  because  of  strategic  investments  the
Federal  Government  began  making  decades  ago.  And  we  will  only
remain  the  world  leader  if  we  continue  to  make  the  right  invest-
ments.

Let  me  say  parenthetically,  I  have  just  come  from  a  press  con-
ference with Chairman Wolf, one of the cardinals on the Appropria-
tions  Committee,  and  Dr.  Ehlers  of  our  own  committee,  and  John
Engler, former Secretary and Governor and now head of NAM [Na-
tional Association of Manufacturers], and a host of others to reveal
to the world that we are planning a conference on innovation later
this year, and there is $1 million in the appropriations bill that we
just  passed  last  week.  And  Chairman  Wolf,  as  he  opened  up  the
conference,  said  that  he  just  is  amazed  at  the  interest  in  the  sub-
ject  matter.  And  he  pointed  out  that  last  year,  he  was  invited  to
a  conference  on  innovation  and  technology  out  in  his  district,  and
it  was  the  night  of  the  World  Series,  and  he  said  that  he  didn’t
think there would be many people there, because of what was hap-
pening  up  in  Boston.  But  to  his  surprise,  there  was  an  overflow
crowd.  Then  he  introduced  me,  and  I  said,  ‘‘In  your  crowd,  we  are
all  Yankee  fans.’’  That  is  supposed  to  be  funny.  Everybody  else
laughed.

I think there is a broad consensus, at least in theory, about what
the Federal Government needs to be doing. We need to continue to
follow our recipe for success. That means we need a balanced port-
folio  that  includes  significant  funding  for  long-term,  fundamental
computer  science  research,  much  of  it  at  universities,  the  kind  of
research  that  has  brought  us  the  Internet  and  the  World  Wide
Web.

And  as  this  committee  has  said  repeatedly,  some  of  that  long-
term  research  needs  to  be  focused  on  cyber  security,  because  we
are not going to protect our information technology in today’s world
through a hodgepodge of patches and existing know-how.

I  don’t  think  anyone  disagrees  with  those  statements.  The  ques-
tion  is  whether  current  federal  funding  is  in  line  with  the  theo-
retical consensus. And despite some rather defensive testimony we
will  hear  today,  one  has  to  conclude  that  the  answer  to  that  ques-
tion is ‘‘no.’’

Current federal funding is not properly balanced. It does not ade-
quately  continue  our  historic  commitment  to  longer-range,  more

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

to 

address 

the 

larger 

research 

basic  research  in  computer  science,  and  it  does  not  focus  suffi-
ciently on cyber security.

We  cannot  have  a  situation  where  university  researchers  can
point  to  sharp  declines  in  DARPA  funding,  reviews  of  research  re-
sults that reflect telescoped time horizons, and increased classifica-
tion.  We  can  not  have  a  situation  where  the  rates  of  proposal  ap-
provals  at  the  National  Science  Foundation  drop  by  half  in  just  a
few years. We can’t have a situation where a Presidential Advisory
Council  declares  that  our  information  technology  infrastructure  is
‘‘highly  vulnerable’’  and  that  there  is  ‘‘relatively  little  support  for
fundamental 
security
vulnerabilities.’’  That  is  not  just  us  saying  that.  That  is  the  Presi-
dential Advisory Council. We can not have a situation where a Pen-
tagon  Advisory  Board  similarly  expresses  deep  concern  over  the
lack of long-term computing research.

This  is  not  a  matter  of  questioning  the  budget—the  policy  or
budget  of  any  single  agency.  This  is  a  matter  of  having  a  critical,
high-profile national need that is not being addressed by an overall
coordinated federal policy or by overall federal spending.

I  know  we  are  operating  in  a  time  of  major  fiscal  constraints.  I
know we have a war on. But I think Dr. Wulf makes an important
point in his testimony when he notes that if we had similarly nar-
rowed  our  focus  during  the  Vietnam  War,  we  probably  wouldn’t
have  the  Internet  or  the  other  computing  technology  we  take  for
granted  today.  And  incidentally,  the  technology  that  was  the  lead-
ing  reason  for  why  we  had  such  a  successful  ’90s,  year  after  year
of  record  growth  and  profits,  and  the  economy  was  stimulated  and
moving along and all based, essentially, on our investment in infor-
mation technology.

So I hope we can have a robust and open discussion today about
what specifically we can all do to ensure that we have a more bal-
anced,  better  focused  computer  science  portfolio  that  will,  among
other  things,  enhance  funding  of  cyber  security  research.  The  sta-
tus quo is simply unacceptable.

This  committee  has  long  been  a  leader  in  pushing  the  Federal
Government  to  move  ahead  in  computer  science,  whether  that
meant  helping  to  create  NSF’s  supercomputer  centers  or  passing
the Cyber Security Research and Development Act.

I  know  that  all  of  our  witnesses  today  care  about  these  issues
just  as  much  as  we  do,  and  indeed  spend  far  more  of  their  time
working on them. Together, we need to come up with a plan to get
us  back  on  a  path  that  has  brought  us  the  information  technology
on which we have become utterly reliant.

Mr. Davis.
[The prepared statement of Chairman Boehlert follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN SHERWOOD L. BOEHLERT

I  want  to  welcome  everyone  here  this  morning  to  this  extraordinarily  important
hearing.  We’re  here  to  examine  the  state  of  federal  computer  science  funding.  That
may  sound  like  an  arcane  and  even  dreary  subject,  but  what’s  at  stake  is  nothing
less than our nation’s future prosperity and security.

That’s  not  an  exaggeration.  Information  technology  advances  are  responsible  for
our  productivity  and  economic  health,  and  information  technology  undergirds  and
facilitates  just  about  every  personal  and  commercial  activity  we  undertake  these
days. Information technology provides not just a web, it is the warp and woof of our
society.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

And it is too easy to take something that has become so basic and so omnipresent
for  granted.  But  we  didn’t  get  to  where  we  are  today  by  accident  and  indirection.
We  are  the  world  leader  in  information  technology,  in  part,  because  of  strategic  in-
vestments the Federal Government began making decades ago. And we will only re-
main the world leader if we continue to make the right investments.

In theory at least, I think there’s a broad consensus about what the Federal Gov-
ernment  needs  to  be  doing.  We  need  to  continue  to  follow  our  recipe  for  success.
That means we need a balanced portfolio that includes significant funding for long-
term,  fundamental  computer  science  research,  much  of  it  at  universities—the  kind
of research that has brought us the Internet and the World Wide Web.

And as this committee has said repeatedly, some of that long-term research needs
to  be  focused  on  cyber  security  because  we’re  not  going  to  protect  our  information
technology  in  today’s  world  through  a  hodge-podge  of  patches  and  existing  know-
how.

I  don’t  think  anyone  disagrees  with  those  statements.  The  question  is  whether
current  federal  funding  is  in  line  with  the  theoretical  consensus.  And  despite  some
rather  defensive  testimony  we’ll  hear  today,  one  has  to  conclude  that  the  answer
is ‘‘no.’’

Current federal funding is not properly balanced. It does not adequately continue
our  historic  commitment  to  longer-range,  more  basic  research  in  computer  science,
and it does not focus sufficiently on cyber security.

We  cannot  have  a  situation  where  university  researchers  can  point  to  sharp  de-
clines in DARPA funding, reviews of research results that reflect telescoped time ho-
rizons,  and  increased  classification.  We  cannot  have  a  situation  where  proposal  ap-
proval  rates  at  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  drop  by  half  in  just  a  few
years.  We  cannot  have  a  situation  where  a  Presidential  advisory  council  declares
that our information technology infrastructure is ‘‘highly vulnerable’’ and that there
is  ‘‘relatively  little  support  for  fundamental  research  to  address  the  larger  security
vulnerabilities.’’ We cannot have a situation where a Pentagon advisory board simi-
larly expresses deep concern over the lack of long-term computing research.

This is not a matter of questioning the policy or budget of any single agency. This
is  a  matter  of  having  a  critical,  high-profile  national  need  that  is  not  being  ad-
dressed by an overall, coordinated federal policy or by overall federal spending.

I  know  we  are  operating  in  a  time  of  major  fiscal  constraints.  I  know  we  have
a  war  on.  But  I  think  Dr.  Wulf  makes  an  important  point  in  his  testimony  when
he  notes  that  if  we  had  similarly  narrowed  our  focus  during  the  Vietnam  War,  we
probably  wouldn’t  have  the  Internet  or  the  other  computing  technology  we  take  for
granted today.

So I hope we can have a robust and open discussion today about what specifically
we  can  all  do  to  ensure  that  we  have  a  more  balanced,  better  focused  computer
science portfolio that will, among other things, enhance funding of cyber security re-
search. The status quo is simply unacceptable.

This  committee  has  long  been  a  leader  in  pushing  the  Federal  Government  to
move ahead in computer science, whether that meant helping to create NSF’s super-
computer  centers  or  passing  the  Cyber  Security  Research  and  Development  Act.  I
know  that  all  our  witnesses  today  care  about  these  issues  just  as  much  as  we  do—
and indeed spend far more of their time working on them.

Together,  we  need  to  come  up  with  a  plan  to  get  us  back  on  a  path  that  has

brought us the information technology on which we have become utterly reliant.

Mr. Davis.
Mr.  DAVIS.  Chairman  Boehlert,  thanks  for  calling  the  hearings
today to review the state of computer science research in our coun-
try.  It  certainly  is  an  important  occasion  and  something  that  we
have  needed  for  some  time,  and  I  applaud  you  and  your  efforts  in
bringing together the panel that we have today that will be giving
testimony.

This subject, certainly, is an important one. I would like to point
at  a  chart  that  has  appeared  in  several  reports,  and  which  Dr.
Wulf includes in his testimony.

[Chart.]
This  chart  is  from  a  1995  National  Academy  of  Sciences  report
on  the  value  of  the  federal,  multi-agency  High  Performance  Com-
puting  and  Communications  programs,  which  this  committee
helped establish in 1991.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

This  chart  traces  the  intertwined  government  and  private  sector
research efforts that ultimately led to the development of the infor-
mation  technology  industry,  such  as  the  Internet,  graphic  user
interfaces,  and  relational  databases.  This  chart  reminds  us  that
computer  science  research  has  resulted  in  substantial  payoffs  for
our economy and our country.

Research  investments  require  patience  and  long-term  vision  in
order  to  gain  these  particular  payoffs.  The  chart  shows  that  it
takes  as  much  as  15  years  or  more  for  early  research  investments
to bear fruits and turn into a billion-dollar commercial market.

Years  ago,  this  Science  Committee  recognized  the  importance  of
sustained  and  coordinated  federal  support  for  research  to  advance
these technologies. This Science Committee also recognized the im-
portance  of  support  for  basic  research  in  computer  science  that
fuels these advances in technology.

Chairman  Boehlert,  I  am  pleased  that  this  hearing  has  been
called  to  inquire  about  the  current  state  of  the  health  for  federal
support  for  fundamental,  long-term  research  in  computer  science.
We  have  heard  the  concerns  from  the  research  community  that
agency roles in support of computing science research are changing
and  that  these  changes  have  led  to  declining  funding  for  funda-
mental, university-based research.

The changes appear to be driven by DARPA’s move toward more
applied,  results-driven  research.  We  will  have  the  opportunity  to
discuss  this  today  with  the  DARPA  Director,  and  I  would  like  to
welcome  Dr.  Tether  to  the  hearing  today.  I  look  forward  to  your
testimony, and for additional funding in the future.

Also today, we will look at cyber security research; research that

keeps the Internet and our computers safe.

The President’s Information Technology Advisory Committee has
recently released a critique of cyber security research. This critique
raises  a  number  of  concerns  and  makes  several  recommendations.
I  am  pleased  to  have  Dr.  Marburger  here  today  to  give  the  Ad-
ministration’s response to this report. I would also like to hear the
Administration’s  views  on  the  current  priorities,  agency  roles,  and
funding support levels for basic computer science research.

As stated earlier, the subject of this hearing demands our atten-
tion because of the impact of information technology on the Nation,
now and in the future.

We can’t afford to squander our technological edge in a field that

will only grow more in importance.

Mr. Chairman, I want to join you in welcoming our distinguished
guests,  and  I  certainly  look  forward  with  much  anticipation  to  the
discussion to follow.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Davis follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE LINCOLN DAVIS

Mr. Chairman, thank you for calling this hearing to review the state of computer

science research in the U.S.

This  subject  is  an  important  one.  I  would  like  to  point  out  a  chart  that  has  ap-
peared  in  several  reports,  and  which  Dr.  Wulf  includes  in  his  testimony.  The  chart
is  from  a  1995  National  Academy  of  Sciences  report  on  the  value  of  the  federal,
multi-agency  High-Performance  Computing  and  Communications  program,  which
this committee helped establish in 1991.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

This  chart  traces  the  intertwined  government  and  private  sector  research  efforts
that ultimately led to the development of the information technology industry—such
as the Internet, graphic user interfaces, and relational databases.

This chart reminds us that computer science research has resulted in substantial
payoffs  for  our  economy.  Research  investments  require  patience  and  long-term  vi-
sion  in  order  to  gain  these  payoffs.  The  chart  shows  that  it  can  take  15  years  or
more for early research investments to bear fruit and turn into a billion dollar com-
mercial market.

Years ago, the Science Committee recognized the importance of sustained and co-
ordinated  federal  support  for  research  to  advance  these  technologies.  The  Science
Committee also recognized the importance of support for basic research in computer
science that fuels these advances in technology.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  pleased  that  this  hearing  has  been  called  to  inquire  about
the  current  state  of  health  for  federal  support  for  fundamental,  long-term  research
in computer science.

We  have  heard  concerns  from  the  research  community  that  agency  roles  in  sup-
port of computer science research are changing, and that these changes have led to
declining funding for fundamental, university-based research.

The  changes  appear  to  be  driven  by  DARPA’s  move  toward  more  ‘‘applied,’’  re-
sults-driven  research.  We  will  have  the  opportunity  to  discuss  this  today  with  the
DARPA Director, and I would like to welcome Dr. Tether to the hearing.

Also today, we will look at cyber security research. Research that keeps the Inter-

net and our computers safe.

The President’s Information Technology Advisory Committee has recently released
a critique of cyber security research. That critique raises a number of concerns and
makes several recommendations.

I  am  pleased  to  have  Dr.  Marburger  here  today  to  give  the  Administration’s  re-
sponse  to  this  report.  I  would  also  like  to  hear  the  Administration’s  views  on  the
current  priorities,  agency  roles,  and  funding  support  levels  for  basic  computer
science research.

As I said earlier, the subject of this hearing demands our attention because of the

impact of information technology on the Nation, now and in the future.

We cannot afford to squander our technological edge in a field that will only grow

in importance.

I look forward to our discussion.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  join  you  in  welcoming  our  distinguished  witnesses,  and

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much, Mr. Davis.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Costello follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE JERRY F. COSTELLO

Good morning. I want to thank the witnesses for appearing before our committee
to  review  the  current  state  and  future  prospects  for  computer  science  research  in
the  U.S.,  with  a  focus  on  federal  agency  roles  and  responsibilities.  In  addition,  to-
day’s hearing will examine the findings and recommendations of the President’s In-
formation  Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC)  report  on  cyber  security  re-
search.

Basic research in computer science has changed. As a result, opportunities for ad-
vancements in information technologies have been delayed, due to a drop in funding.
I  am  concerned  that  the  long-term  impact  of  inadequate  support  for  such  research
could  harm  the  economy  and  have  adverse  consequences  for  national  defense.  De-
fense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency  (DARPA)  has  been  the  lead  sponsor  of
basic  research  in  computer  science  to  assess  advances  in  information  technology.
Over  the  past  few  years,  DARPA  appears  to  have  shifted  its  primary  focus  and  ob-
jective.  Between  fiscal  year  2001  and  fiscal  year  2004,  DARPA  support  for  univer-
sity-based, non-classified research dropped by over 40 percent, from $214 million to
$123  million.  This  had  a  significant  impact  on  the  university  research  community.
Consequently,  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  was  deferred  to  as  the  prin-
cipal  federal  sponsor  of  basic  research  in  computer  science.  Although  NSF  received
a large increase in research funding requests, its success rate began to decline from
31  percent  in  1999  to  16  percent  in  2004.  I  am  interested  in  learning  what  efforts
are being made by the Administration to adjust and rebalance research support for
non-classified,  long-term  computer  science  research  as  DARPA  moves  toward  sup-
port for classified, near-term research.

Secondly, the Committee will review the findings and recommendations of the re-
cent  PITAC  cyber  security  report.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  report  finds  a
serious  under-investment  in  cyber  security  research.  The  recommended  funding  in-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

crease was for $90 million per year at NSF and significant increases for non-classi-
fied research at DARPA and DHS. Additionally, the report suggested that the focus
on  short-term,  military  classified,  and  academic  research  are  below  critical  mass.
Therefore, it is important to determine if increased funding for academic cyber secu-
rity research would automatically increase the size and vitality of the research com-
munity.

I  welcome  the  panel  of  witnesses  and  look  forward  to  hearing  their  testimony

today.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

Thank you Chairman Boehlert and Ranking Member Gordon for calling this very
important hearing. I also wish to thank our expert witnesses for agreeing to testify
today.

The purpose of the hearing is to review the current state and future prospects for
computer  science  research  in  the  U.S.,  with  a  focus  on  federal  agency  roles  and  re-
sponsibilities.

We  all  agree  that  a  skilled  workforce  is  the  essential  fuel  to  propel  the  economy
and  ensure  a  high  quality  of  life.  The  success  of  our  nation’s  economy  depends  on
us producing a scientifically literate workforce.

Unfortunately, the budget submitted to us from the administration could possibly
put  us  at  risk  of  reversing  all  the  wonderful  computer  science  research  programs
that drove the our economy to the greatness we witnessed in the 1990’s.

In  the  past,  the  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency  has  poured  billions
of  dollars  into  universities  to  pay  for  fundamental  research  of  what  would  become
the building blocks of computing, Internet and countless other high-tech endeavors.
But  while  DARPA  spending  on  basic  computer  science  research  has  risen  from
$546  million  in  fiscal  2001  to  $583  million,  the  cut  of  it  going  toward  to  academic
institutions  has  fallen  from  $214  million  to  $123  million  during  the  same  period.
Researchers say the shift already is affecting other research agencies such as the

NSF, which has seen its own budget increases slow down in recent years.

DARPA’s  funding  shift  comes  at  a  time  when  foreign  governments  are  boosting
their  basic  research  efforts  and  as  U.S.  companies  have  cut  back  theirs.  In  fact,
many  U.S.  companies  partner  with  universities,  which  in  part  rely  on  government
funding  and  which  produce  the  scientists  who  eventually  might  create  new  compa-
nies or work in a corporate lab.

We  cannot  hope  to  educate  tomorrow’s  employees  and  managers  without  more
basic  research  into  what  works  in  the  classroom.  Our  technology-based  society  is
under  constant  change  and  additional  research  will  help  us  master  these  changes.
That being said, I hope our witnesses can help us today by providing light on how
we  can  maintain  our  status  in  the  worldwide  technology  industry  with  our  govern-
ment support or lack there of computer science research.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr.  Chairman  and  Mr.  Ranking  Member,  thank  you  for  hosting  this  important

hearing.

I  represent  the  third  district  of  Missouri,  home  to  both  Washington  University  of
St. Louis and the University of Missouri at St. Louis. Both of these institutions are
a  great  resource  to  our  country,  excelling  in  computer  science  research,  and  have
received  millions  of  dollars  worth  of  funding  through  NSF’s  computer  science
awards.  I  am  proud  of  the  work  being  done  within  my  congressional  district  and
beyond.

NSF  and  DARPA  house  enormously  important  programs.  In  fact,  they  have  been
the driving force behind the Federal Government’s role and our nation’s role in the
computer  science  field.  If  we  wish  to  maintain  our  global  role  in  this  field  we  need
to assess whether or not our priorities and allocated resources for NSF and DARPA
are appropriate.

I welcome our witnesses to our committee today and look forward to hearing their

testimony. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Jackson Lee follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE SHEILA JACKSON LEE

24

Chairman Boehlert, Ranking Member Gordon,
I  want  to  thank  you  for  organizing  this  important  hearing  to  discuss  the  future
of computer science research in the United States. Unfortunately, it seems we once
again  have  to  discuss  a  vital  area  in  science  that  is  receiving  less  federal  funding
than it needs. Computer Sciences must be made central to research at academic in-
stitutions for the long term well-being of our nation.

Mr. Chairman, I could understand that maybe thirty years ago we would not com-
prehend the need to fund computer science research. It’s been a recent phenomenon
in  computer  science  when  the  home  computer  and  the  Internet  came  to  change  the
face of our nation and indeed the world. It seems now that almost every child born
learns  to  type  on  a  keyboard  and  surf  the  web  before  they  even  learn  how  to  ride
a  bicycle.  Such  is  the  new  age  we  live  in,  computers  are  not  only  essential  to  our
livelihoods,  but  in  fact  they  have  become  completely  ingrained  in  our  day-to-day
tasks.  For  example,  it  is  not  impossible  now  to  buy  a  car  that  not  only  has  a  com-
puterized  system  in  it,  but  one  that  can  give  you  pinpoint  directions,  play  music
beamed  from  a  satellite  and  give  you  updated  stock  quotes  and  sports  scores.  The
point  is  that  maybe  thirty  years  ago  we  could  plead  ignorance  to  the  possibilities
of  computer  science;  perhaps  it  all  seemed  a  bit  far  fetched.  But  the  fact  today  is
that  we  can  not  plead  ignorance  to  the  power  of  computer  science  and  our  depend-
ence  on  this  research  is  only  going  to  grow  larger  not  smaller  as  time  goes  on  and
I  believe  our  nation  would  be  at  a  great  disadvantage  to  fall  behind  in  this  vital
research.

I  am  troubled  to  learn  that  the  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency
(DARPA)  is  now  scaling  back  its  computer  science  research  from  long-term,  non-
classified  research  to  classified  research  to  meet  near-term  defense  requirements.
Between FY 2001 and FY 2004, DARPA support for university-based, non-classified
research dropped by over 40 percent, from $214 million to $123 million. Meanwhile,
it  seems  the  entire  burden  of  computer  science  research  is  being  put  on  NSF.  In
fact,  last  year  NSF  supported  86  percent  of  federal  obligations  for  fundamental  re-
search  in  IT  at  academic  institutions.  At  the  same  time  that  NSF  has  seen  a  large
increase  in  research  funding  requests,  it  has  also  seen  an  accompanying  decline  in
proposal success rate from 31 percent to 16 percent. For cyber security research pro-
posals, the success rate for FY 2004 was a measly eight percent. The United States
of America cannot stand for mediocrity in the critical area of computer science.

Computer science research is not only essential for our economic and technological
development,  but  it  is  indeed  essential  for  our  national  security.  The  amount  of  in-
formation  that  travels  through  the  Internet  and  cyberspace  on  a  daily  basis  is  as-
tounding.  Because  so  much  information  travels  through  cyberspace  it  increases  our
vulnerability.  As  I  said,  our  dependence  on  computers  is  only  going  to  grow  larger
as time goes on; therefore we need to work now to close all the security gaps before
our  reliance  on  technology  can  be  used  against  us.  Less  than  two  months  ago,  the
President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC)  released  their  re-
port  Cyber  Security:  A  Crisis  of  Prioritization.  Among  the  recommendations  they
made is that Congress and the Administration should substantially increase funding
for  fundamental  research  in  civilian  cyber  security  at  a  number  of  agencies,  espe-
cially  NSF,  DARPA,  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS).  In  par-
ticular,  the  report  recommends  that  funding  for  cyber  security  research  at  NSF  be
increased by $90 million annually. I have been in full support of these cyber security
initiatives, both here in the Science Committee as well as in the Homeland Security
Committee,  where  I  am  a  Member.  This  kind  of  Homeland  Security  can  not  wait
another  day;  any  delay  we  take  now  will  be  a  huge  risk  for  our  security  in  the  fu-
ture.

While I am unsatisfied by the status of computer science research being conducted
on  the  federal  level,  I  am  also  disturbed  by  the  lack  of  female  and  minority  rep-
resentation in the field of computer science. The statistics show that women and mi-
norities are not being proportionally represented in academia when it comes to com-
puter  science.  In  2003,  women  represented  barely  over  20  percent  of  the  computer
science  doctoral  degrees  granted.  The  same  statistics  show  that  in  2003  the  White
population made up about 70 percent of the doctoral degrees granted to U.S. citizens
and permanent residents. At the same time, Asian/Pacific Islanders made up about
20 percent of the doctoral degrees granted, but Blacks, Hispanics and American In-
dian/Native  Alaskans  made  up  less  than  five  percent  of  the  doctoral  degrees  grant-
ed.  These  statistics  are  very  discouraging  and  show  that  we  are  not  reaching  out
to  our  entire  population.  Indeed,  the  problem  starts  in  the  classroom,  where  many
under-privileged  youth  do  not  have  nearly  the  same  access  to  computers  and  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

Internet. If they don’t have this background at an early age, its not surprising that
they don’t pursue the field in higher education and later in life.

We  simply  can  not  allow  our  nation  to  fall  behind  in  computer  science.  We  must
utilize  our  entire  population  including  women,  minorities  and  the  under-privileged.
Our  discoveries  of  the  last  few  decades  have  changed  the  face  of  the  world,  but  we
must continue down this path if we are to prosper for the future.

Thank you.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  And  what  a  distinguished  panel  it  is,  all
veterans,  appearing  before  this  committee.  So  you  know  how  we
work, we are not going to be arbitrary with the clock, but when you
see the red light go on, if you would begin to summarize where you
are, and then that will allow us more time for questions.

We  have  before  us  Dr.  John  H.  Marburger,  III,  Director  of  the
Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  The  White  House.  Dr.
Marburger, it is good to have you here. Dr. Anthony J. Tether, Di-
rector,  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency.  Dr.  Tether—
and incidentally, you should know that within the past two weeks,
I  have  had  occasion  on  two  separate—in  two  separate  instances  to
speak with Secretary Rumsfeld and General Myers, and in both in-
stances, I expressed to him my apprehensive and concern about the
BRAC  list  tomorrow.  The  rumor  mill  suggests  that  there  might  be
undue  cuts  in  the  laboratory  complexes  under  DOD,  and  that
would  be  very  shortsighted  indeed.  I  hope  you  guys  share  my  con-
cern about that. And hope the rumor mill is wrong. And invariably,
it is wrong, but let us hope it springs eternal.

We have Dr. William Wulf, President, National Academy of Engi-
neering who is so helpful as a resource to this committee. And Dr.
Wulf, it is good to see you back.

And Dr. Tom Leighton, Chief Scientist and Co-founder of Akamai

Technologies.

Gentlemen, it is a pleasure to have you here.
Dr. Marburger, you are first up.

STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN H. MARBURGER, III, DIRECTOR, OF-
FICE  OF  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY  POLICY,  THE  WHITE
HOUSE
Dr.  MARBURGER.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  am
pleased  to  have  this  opportunity  to  talk  about  federal  support  for
computer  science  research  in  the  United  States,  and  I  want  to
begin  by  saying  that  federally-sponsored  R&D  in  networking  and
information  technologies  is  an  Administration  priority.  These  tech-
nologies support advances in every area of science and engineering
and generate further new capabilities that fuel our economy.

The Administration recognizes the importance of these fields and
highlights  the  multi-agency  Networking  and  Information  Tech-
nology  Research  and  Development  Program,  which  I  am  going  to
refer to as NITRD in my oral testimony, as an R&D priority in the
President’s budget.

The 9/11 terrorist attacks and the war against terrorism have in-
fluenced  our  current  thinking  about  these  fields.  Networking  and
information  technology  R&D  investments  for  national  defense,  na-
tional  security,  and  homeland  security  have  received  high  priority
in  Administration  actions.  So  this  work  is  classified,  for  obvious
reasons.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

These new demands, however, have not affected our commitment
to  the  central  role  of  the  NITRD  program  in  filling  the  pipeline  of
skilled  people  and  innovative  ideas  we  need  for  national  security,
economic competitiveness, and scientific leadership in the future.

The 2006 budget proposal of $2.2 billion for the NITRD program
raises the Administration’s cumulative five-year investment in this
activity  over  the  $10  billion  mark  to  $10.4  billion.  Despite  signifi-
cant  program  redirections,  the  NITRD  budget  basically  holds
steady in the President’s fiscal year 2006 budget.

This  Administration  supports  breadth  and  diversity  in  the
NITRD  programs,  which  we  view  as  an  important  strength.  Espe-
cially  at  a  time  of  budget  constraints,  NITRD’s  multi-agency  col-
laborative  approach  strongly  supports  spending  efficiency  by
leveraging  each  agency’s  expertise,  minimizing  duplicative  efforts
and enabling results that no single agency could achieve.

As  this  committee  knows,  we  did  act  to  address  concern  about
one  NITRD  program  area.  My  office  chartered  the  High  End  Com-
puting  Revitalization  Task  Force  in  2003  to  provide  a  new  vision
for  this  increasingly  important  sector  of  information  technology.
The  Task  Force  produced  an  excellent  report,  and  the  Administra-
tion strongly encourages this long-term revitalization effort.

The  report  defined  a  roadmap  that  identifies  key  research  chal-
lenges  in  hardware,  software,  and  systems  technologies.  Federal
supercomputing  capabilities  clearly  are  critical  to  our  national  de-
fense and national security missions as well as for leading-edge sci-
entific research and more broadly for economic innovation and U.S.
leadership in science and technology.

One of the first developments to emerge from the Task Force ac-
tivity  is  a  new  multi-agency  program,  the  High  End  Computing
University  Research  Activity,  supported  by  DARPA,  DOE,  NSA,
and NSF that funds university-based R&D in high-end applications
and  system  software.  This  program  was  launched  quickly  in  fiscal
year  2004,  resulting  in  34  grants  with  total  funding  of  $27.3  mil-
lion over three years.

Information security and assurance and the management of large
data  flows  are  two  important  priorities  for  this  program  and  are
further  described  in  my  written  testimony.  I  won’t  say  more  about
them here.

But  regarding  these  priorities,  in  March  2004,  my  office  asked
the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Council  to  under-
take an examination of the federal role in cyber security R&D and
PITAC,  which  is  the  acronym  for  that  council,  responded  with  a
useful report.

We  began  to  respond  to  the  report’s  findings  and  recommenda-
tions  as  soon  as  we  heard  about  them;  we  did  not  wait  until  the
report  appeared.  As  soon  as  we  were  aware  of  some  of  their  con-
cerns, we did begin to act. We agree with PITAC that improved co-
ordination of federal cyber security R&D activities can increase the
efficiency  and  effectiveness  of  the  government’s  investment  in  this
area.  My  office  is  facilitating  the  report’s  recommendation  to  inte-
grate  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council’s  Interagency
Working  Group  on  Critical  Information  Infrastructure  Protection
R&D with the NITRD program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

And also before PITAC’s final report was released, that program,
Critical Information Infrastructure Protection, had begun the proc-
ess  of  defining  our  top  cyber  security  R&D  needs  and  mapping
these  against  current  activities.  We  take  very  seriously  the
vulnerabilities  in  critical  U.S.  infrastructures  pointed  to  by  the  re-
port and continue to evaluate PITAC’s recommendations regarding
other  steps  that  can  be  taken  to  enhance  the  effectiveness  of  fed-
eral efforts in cyber security.

For  several  years,  the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  agency
with the broadest science portfolio, has been the lead agency in the
NITRD  program.  My  written  testimony  includes  much  more  detail
on  their  programs,  but  over  the  past  five  years,  NSF’s  NITRD
budget has risen nearly 25 percent, from $643 million in fiscal year
2002 to $803 million in fiscal year 2006.

Over  the  same  period,  DARPA’s  much  smaller  NITRD  program
budget  has  declined  33  percent  from  $263  million  in  2002  to  $176
million  in  2006,  reflecting  their  priority  changes.  Dr.  Tether  will
provide  more  detail  on  these  changes  in  his  testimony,  but  I  want
to  emphasize  that  computer  science  has  developed  very  signifi-
cantly  since  DARPA  provided  early  stimulation  to  this  field.  And
its  current  breadth  justifies  a  new  pattern  of  funding  within  DOD
and among agencies in general.

In  this  connection,  the  President’s  fiscal  year  2006  budget  re-
quest  tasks  the  National  Coordination  Office  for  NITRD  and  the
NITRD agencies to commission a study by the National Academies
that  identifies  important  scientific  questions  and  technical  prob-
lems  for  which  an  extraordinary  advancement  in  our  under-
standing  is  difficult  or  impossible  without  leading-edge  computing
capabilities.

I want to thank the Committee for its attention to this important

subject, and I will be happy to answer additional questions.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Marburger follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN H. MARBURGER, III

Chairman Boehlert, Ranking Minority Member Gordon, and Members of the Com-
mittee.  I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  critical  role  of  com-
puter  science  research  in  the  Federal  Government’s  research  and  development
(R&D)  investment  portfolio.  As  ever,  I  much  appreciate  the  effective  ongoing  inter-
actions  between  our  office  and  your  committee,  which  I  believe  ultimately  benefit
the Nation’s science and technology enterprise.

Federal R&D in networking and information technologies has been and continues
to  be  one  of  the  Administration’s  highest  R&D  priorities.  It  is  our  view  that  these
technologies  provide  a  foundation  for  advances  in  virtually  every  other  area  of
science  and  technology  and  generate  myriad  new  capabilities  and  tools  that  grow
our  economy  and  make  it  more  productive.  Because  of  their  unique  role—as  uni-
versal  enablers  for  advanced  science,  engineering,  and  technology—networking  and
information  technologies  constitute  a  strategic  component  of  the  Nation’s  21st  cen-
tury  infrastructure.  The  Administration  clearly  recognizes  that,  and  highlights  this
area as an R&D priority in the President’s budget.

Before  I  address  your  specific  questions,  I  would  like  to  lay  out  what  I  believe  is
the  broad  context  for  our  discussion.  When  I  appeared  before  you  in  February  to
testify about the President’s FY 2006 R&D budget, I acknowledged that it was sub-
ject to considerable pressure, making it the tightest proposal in nearly two decades.
The President is committed to winning the war against terrorism, while moderating
the growth in overall spending and cutting the deficit in half as a share of the GDP
by 2009. These important goals obviously affect budget choices. So I was pleased to
report  to  you  that,  despite  these  pressures,  overall  funding  for  Federal  R&D  in-
creases to a record $132 billion in the President’s FY 2006 budget—the highest level

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

of  government  support  for  R&D  in  the  world  and  a  45  percent  increase  over  FY
2001’s total of $91 billion.

Let  me  also  note  here  my  belief  that  the  overall  health  of  U.S.  science  and  tech-
nology today is strong. We are spending three times as much as Japan on R&D and
half again as much as all the European nations combined. Our FY 2006 R&D budg-
et is three-quarters of a billion dollars higher than our FY 2005 request.

This  basically  strong  and  stable  environment  for  U.S.  R&D  does  not  obviate  the
need to assure that we are spending federal research dollars wisely and effectively.
That  entails  planning  to  establish  priorities  and  shifting  funds  in  an  orderly  way
toward  the  high-priority  programs.  Well-designed  budgets  will  therefore  inevitably
have reductions as well as increases within large clusters of programs such as those
in  the  R&D  portfolio.  These  considerations  are  especially  important  during  a  time
of significant fiscal constraints.

Now let me turn to your questions.
The  first  question  asks  about  Administration  priorities  and  how  they  have
changed in the last five years. Clearly, the Administration’s priorities in networking
and  information  technology  R&D  were  dramatically  affected  by  9/11  and  the  war
against terrorism. Networking and information technology R&D investments for na-
tional  defense,  national  security,  and  homeland  security  purposes  received  highest
priority. Some of this work is classified for obvious reasons.

The 2006 budget proposal of $2.2 billion for the multi-agency Networking and In-
formation  Technology  Research  and  Development  (NITRD)  Program—the  Federal
Government’s primary vehicle for long-term, fundamental R&D in networking, com-
puting  systems,  software,  and  related  information  technologies—puts  the  Adminis-
tration’s cumulative five-year investment in the NITRD activity over the $10-billion
mark, to $10.4 billion. Despite significant program re-directions, the NITRD budget
basically holds steady in the President’s FY 2006 Budget.

As our NITRD budgets make clear, this Administration supports the breadth and
diversity  of  the  NITRD  program’s  research  interests.  We  view  the  scope  of  NITRD
activities  as  one  of  the  program’s  great  strengths—encompassing  work  to  advance
high-performance  computing  and  high-speed  networking  architectures  for  leading-
edge  research,  to  improve  the  quality  and  cost-effectiveness  of  software,  to  increase
the  security  and  reliability  of  computing  and  networking  infrastructure,  and  to  un-
derstand the implications of new technologies for education, workforce development,
and  social  structures.  Especially  at  a  time  of  budget  constraints,  NITRD’s  multi-
agency  collaborative  approach  strongly  supports  spending  efficiency,  by  leveraging
each  agency’s  expertise,  minimizing  duplicative  efforts,  and  enabling  results—such
as prototype all-optical networks—that no single agency could achieve.

We  consider  all  the  NITRD  activities  to  be  of  high  priority,  for  precisely  the  rea-
son that there is no other broad-based, fundamental IT R&D effort of the kind any-
where in this country. NITRD is a national resource.

We did, as you know, act to address concern about one NITRD domain. When my
office  chartered  the  High  End  Computing  Revitalization  Task  Force  (HECRTF)  in
2003,  it  was  in  the  recognition  that  the  Federal  R&D  effort  in  high-end  computing
for  vital  federal  missions  was  in  need  of  a  new  vision  and  fresh  approaches.  The
Task  Force  produced  a  first-rate  report,  which  I  was  delighted  to  present  to  your
committee on May 10, 2004. The Administration strongly encourages this long-term
revitalization effort guided by a roadmap that points to the key research challenges
in  hardware,  software,  and  systems  technologies.  Federal  supercomputing  capabili-
ties  clearly  are  critical  for  our  national  defense  and  national  security  missions,  as
well  as  for  leading-edge  scientific  research,  and  more  broadly  for  economic  innova-
tion and U.S. leadership in science and technology.

It  is  relevant  to  your  inquiries  that  one  of  the  first  developments  to  emerge  from
the  Task  Force  activity  is  a  new  multi-agency  program,  the  High  End  Computing
University  Research  Activity  (HEC–URA)  supported  by  the  Defense  Advanced  Re-
search  Projects  Agency  (DARPA),  the  Department  of  Energy  (DOE),  the  National
Security Agency (NSA), and the National Science Foundation (NSF), that funds uni-
versity-based R&D in high-end applications and system software. This program was
launched quickly in FY 2004, resulting in 34 grants with total funding of $27.3 mil-
lion over three years.

The  high-end  computing  plan  also  extends  access  to  the  Nation’s  fastest,  most
powerful  computing  platforms  to  the  national  research  community.  The  2005  and
2006 budgets fund investments by the National Aeronautics and Space Administra-
tion  (NASA)  and  the  DOE  Office  of  Science  in  advanced  supercomputing  systems
whose management will include time allocations for outside researchers selected on
a competitive basis. The concept of ‘‘national user facilities,’’ being tested with these
first two platforms, will itself have a galvanizing positive effect on the U.S. research
community.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

Another  indication  of  the  Administration’s  interest  in  the  HEC  area  is  that  we
have  re-chartered  NITRD’s  HEC  Coordinating  Group  as  an  Interagency  Working
Group  (IWG),  calling  for  agency  membership  at  a  higher  level  of  membership  with
increased agency commitment.

Two  important  priorities  for  NITRD  are  information  security  and  assurance  and

the management of enormous data flows.

First,  assuring  the  security,  safety,  and  highly  dependable  performance  of  sys-
tems,  networks,  and  software  in  critical  applications  and  infrastructures  is  one  of
the  most  significant  and  difficult  challenges  in  information  technology  R&D.  The
technical  complexity  of  these  systems  continues  to  grow  rapidly  in  two  directions—
ever-larger  systems  of  systems  involving  thousands  of  processors  and  ever-smaller
embedded  systems  and  networks  of  embedded  systems.  NITRD  agencies  are  doing
critical  work  toward  next-generation  software,  system,  and  network  engineering
that incorporates high assurance levels from the ground up, and even ‘‘self-healing’’
capabilities.

We currently rely on systems that are fragile, attackable, failure-prone, and often
impossible to troubleshoot. The risks of such problems in safety- and life-critical ap-
plications  are  clear.  This  is  an  extremely  valuable  NITRD  focus,  carried  out  across
several  of  its  major  research  areas  (Large  Scale  Networking,  High  Confidence  Soft-
ware  and  Systems,  Human-Computer  Interaction  and  Information  Management,
and Software Design and Productivity).

Second,  advanced  technologies  are  required  for  dealing  with  the  overwhelming
volume  of  information  currently  being  generated.  This  NITRD  research  tackles  the
subjects  of  how  technologies  can  help  us  capture  and  process  information  (such  as
multi-modal  language  translation  and  video,  sound,  and  signal  recognition),  and
how  technologies  can  help  us  integrate  and  make  sense  of  vast  amounts  of  hetero-
geneous data in multiple formats (complex data sets). These capabilities are critical
not only in military and national security environments but increasingly so in civil-
ian  applications  such  as  health  care,  emergency  response,  education,  and  research
across the spectrum including in the private sector.

To  summarize,  the  Administration’s  overall  R&D  investments  clearly  have  been
affected by the Nation’s move to a war footing after 9/11. Needs in the national de-
fense,  national  security,  and  homeland  security  arenas  have  been  immediate  and
great.  However,  these  new  demands  have  not  affected  our  commitment  to  the  cen-
tral role of the NITRD Program in filling the pipeline of skilled people and innova-
tive  ideas  we  need  for  national  security,  economic  competitiveness,  and  scientific
leadership in the years to come.

The  second  question  asked  about  the  relative  roles  of  NSF  and  DARPA  and

changes to these roles.

NSF has for several years been the lead agency in the NITRD Program. Over the
last five years, NSF’s NITRD budget has risen nearly 25 percent, from $643 million
in  FY  2002  to  $803  million  in  FY  2006.  Over  the  same  period,  DARPA’s  NITRD
budget  has  declined  33  percent,  from  $263  million  in  FY  2002  to  $176  million  in
FY  2006,  reflecting  priority  changes.  Dr.  Tether  will  comment  in  his  testimony  on
the specifics involved.

As  the  only  federal  research  agency  with  a  broad  mission  to  advance  both  re-
search and education across the physical and social sciences, mathematics, engineer-
ing,  and  technology,  NSF  plays  a  unique  and  invaluable  role  in  the  overall  Federal
R&D portfolio, and certainly in its NITRD activities. The National Science Founda-
tion funds high-risk, long-term, basic research, and it is the only agency supporting
that kind of R&D in all the core areas of the NITRD program. The agency identifies
the  most  promising  award  candidates  through  a  peer-based  merit  review  process
and  makes  awards  to  single  investigators,  teams,  and  center-scale  projects.  These
grants permit investigators to explore promising new research opportunities as they
arise,  provide  funding  for  projects  exploring  large-scale,  experimental  systems,  and
help educate future generations of computer scientists and provide workforce prepa-
ration for others.

In  the  national  IT  R&D  community,  NSF  plays  a  powerful  leadership  role,  con-
stantly  working  to  identify  emerging  research  needs  and  innovative  directions
across  the  spectrum  of  networking  and  computing  R&D  and  then  developing  pro-
grams  to  encourage  fresh  thinking  among  researchers  and  students  at  colleges  and
universities. The NSF leadership has compiled a remarkable track record of timely,
successful  initiatives  to  maintain  leadership  in  information  technology.  Specific  ex-
amples of initiatives follow:

The  five-year  Information  Technology  Research  (ITR)  program,  whose  concluding
grants  were  awarded  in  FY  2004,  was  a  foundation-wide  initiative  explicitly  de-
signed  to  promote  multi-disciplinary  research  by  expanding  computer  science  R&D
into new areas. The program’s novel requirements—that proposing teams cross dis-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

ciplinary boundaries and include computer scientists in proposals addressing multi-
disciplinary  problems—produced  good  results,  not  only  for  multi-disciplinary  in-
quiry—an  increasingly  important  aspect  of  research  problem  solving—but  for  inte-
gration  of  computer  science  applications  into  all  NSF’s  science  and  engineering  di-
rectorates.

A recent committee of visitors convened to review ITR found that the program en-
abled  many  ‘‘best-of-breed  ideas’’  and  resulted  in  significant  community  building
across disciplines.

Beginning in FY 2004, NSF established a cross-cutting emphasis to encourage the
study of the vulnerabilities of networked computing systems. Although this has been
a  longstanding  concern  of  the  NITRD  agencies,  NSF’s  Cyber  Trust  program  crys-
tallized  the  need  for  new  approaches  to  cyber  security,  and  also  began  addressing
the  national  shortage  of  IT  specialists  with  cyber  security  training.  With  the  addi-
tion  of  the  Cyber  Trust  program,  funding  for  cyber  security  research  at  NSF  has
risen  from  $57  million  in  FY  2004  to  $70  million  in  the  President’s  2006  budget.
In  FY  2005,  NSF  is  also  launching  a  new  Science  and  Technology  Center  devoted
to cyber security R&D, which I describe below.

NSF  is  also  playing  a  key  role  in  the  NITRD  high  confidence  software  and  sys-
tems work that I cited earlier. NSF’s Science of Design theme is supporting develop-
ment  of  a  rigorous  scientific  base  for  greatly  improved  methods  and  tools  for  build-
ing  software-intensive  systems;  this  effort  is  funded  at  $10  million  in  2005  and
2006.  And  in  2006,  NSF  plans  to  work  with  other  NITRD  agencies  in  a  project  to
develop a prototype real-time embedded operating system.

In its five-year Network Middleware Initiative (NMI), NSF is spurring innovation
in  another  core  computer  science  area—the  evolving  layer  of  services  that  resides
between the network and more traditional applications and enables networked com-
puting systems to interact transparently with the network and other networked re-
sources.  Middleware  is  a  critical  component  of  scientific  computing  that  NSF  has
stepped in to improve.

In 2006, NSF will begin a new $10-million program—Broadening Participation in
Computing—to  increase  the  number  of  domestic  students  receiving  degrees  in  com-
puter science.

It is clear that NSF is steadfastly and imaginatively pursuing its mission in infor-

mation technology.

The  third  question  concerned  the  Administration  response  to  the  President’s  In-

formation Technology Advisory Committee (PITAC) report on cyber security.

In March 2004, my office asked PITAC to undertake an examination of the federal
role in cyber security R&D so that we could better understand what steps are need-
ed  to  advance  the  Administration’s  priority  goals  of  strengthening  national  and
homeland  security.  During  PITAC’s  study,  we  asked  for  and  received  support  from
the Office of Management and Budget in identifying federal agencies’ cyber security-
related R&D investments, which remain very difficult to pinpoint because cyber se-
curity  activities  are  not  always  clearly  delineated  or  called  out  within  broader  pro-
grams,  and,  when  they  can  be  identified,  it  can  still  be  difficult  to  estimate  the  ex-
tent to which the activities are related to IT and security and research.

OSTP much appreciates the PITAC’s review of this extremely important topic. As
I  told  PITAC  members  at  their  April  14  meeting,  we  began  to  respond  to  the  re-
port’s findings and recommendations long before the published report appeared.

We  agree  with  the  PITAC  that  improved  coordination  of  federal  cyber  security
R&D  activities  is  key  to  increasing  the  efficiency  and  effectiveness  of  the  govern-
ment’s investments in this area. I am pleased to report that my office is facilitating
one  of  the  report’s  principal  recommendations:  integration  of  the  National  Science
and Technology Council’s (NSTC’s) Interagency Working Group on Critical Informa-
tion Infrastructure Protection (CIIP) R&D with the NITRD Program. Under the new
structure, the CIIP IWG will have a broader charter integrating it with NITRD and
providing for dual reporting to the NSTC’s Subcommittees on Infrastructure and on
Networking  and  Information  Technology  R&D.  The  results  will  be  better  coordina-
tion  among  researchers  from  diverse  Federal  IT  security  communities,  higher  visi-
bility  for  this  vital  area  of  Federal  R&D,  and  an  improved  capacity  to  gauge  the
progress  we  are  making  toward  new  security  technologies  for  our  computing  and
networking infrastructures.

Also,  before  PITAC’s  final  report  was  released,  the  CIIP  had  begun  the  process
of  defining  our  top  cyber  security  R&D  needs  and  mapping  those  against  current
activities.  This  is  crucial  if  we  are  to  better  address  the  critically  important  issue
of defining priorities.

I  wish  to  call  your  attention  to  a  recent  NSF  announcement  to  establish  in  FY
2005  a  new  Science  and  Technology  Center  devoted  to  cyber  security  R&D.  Led  by
the  University  of  California,  Berkeley,  the  multi-institutional  collaborative  effort

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

will  investigate  key  issues  of  computer  trustworthiness  in  an  era  of  increasing  at-
tacks at all levels on computer systems and information-based technologies.

My office continues to evaluate PITAC’s findings and recommendations regarding
other specific steps that can be taken to enhance the effectiveness of federal efforts
in cyber security. Certainly, the vulnerabilities in critical U.S. infrastructures point-
ed to by the report need to be taken very seriously.

The  future  of  computer  science  R&D  will  be  determined  in  part  by  our  ability  to
demonstrate its significance convincingly over time. I believe we need better metrics
of our R&D accomplishments and new models for analyzing funding for science and
technology  in  general.  Our  current  indicators  are  based  on  a  data  taxonomy  that
is  decades  old  and  does  not  really  represent  the  way  R&D  is  actually  conducted
today.

In  the  NITRD  area,  we  are  making  a  start  at  improving  these  measures.  The
President’s FY 2006 Budget tasks the National Coordination Office for IT R&D and
the  NITRD  agencies  to  commission  a  study  by  the  National  Academies  that  identi-
fies  and  categorizes  important  scientific  questions  and  technological  problems  for
which an extraordinary advancement in our understanding is difficult or impossible
without leading-edge computing capabilities.

Thank  you  for  your  attention  to  this  important  subject.  I  would  be  happy  to  an-

swer additional questions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR JOHN H. MARBURGER, III

John  H.  Marburger,  III,  Science  Adviser  to  the  President  and  Director  of  the  Of-
fice  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  was  born  on  Staten  Island,  N.Y.,  grew  up  in
Maryland  near  Washington  D.C.  and  attended  Princeton  University  (B.A.,  Physics
1962)  and  Stanford  University  (Ph.D.,  Applied  Physics  1967).  Before  his  appoint-
ment  in  the  Executive  Office  of  the  President,  he  served  as  Director  of  Brookhaven
National  Laboratory  from  1998,  and  as  the  third  President  of  the  State  University
of New York at Stony Brook (1980–1994). He came to Long Island in 1980 from the
University  of  Southern  California  where  he  had  been  a  Professor  of  Physics  and
Electrical  Engineering,  serving  as  Physics  Department  Chairman  and  Dean  of  the
College  of  Letters,  Arts  and  Sciences  in  the  1970’s.  In  the  fall  of  1994  he  returned
to  the  faculty  at  Stony  Brook,  teaching  and  doing  research  in  optical  science  as  a
University Professor. Three years later he became President of Brookhaven Science
Associates,  a  partnership  between  the  university  and  Battelle  Memorial  Institute
that competed for and won the contract to operate Brookhaven National Laboratory.
While at the University of Southern California, Marburger contributed to the rap-
idly growing field of nonlinear optics, a subject created by the invention of the laser
in  1960.  He  developed  theory  for  various  laser  phenomena  and  was  a  co-founder  of
the  University  of  Southern  California’s  Center  for  Laser  Studies.  His  teaching  ac-
tivities included ‘‘Frontiers of Electronics,’’ a series of educational programs on CBS
television.

Marburger’s presidency at Stony Brook coincided with the opening and growth of
University  Hospital  and  the  development  of  the  biological  sciences  as  a  major
strength  of  the  university.  During  the  1980’s  federally  sponsored  scientific  research
at  Stony  Brook  grew  to  exceed  that  of  any  other  public  university  in  the  north-
eastern United States.

During his presidency, Marburger served on numerous boards and committees, in-
cluding  chairmanship  of  the  Governor’s  Commission  on  the  Shoreham  Nuclear
Power  facility,  and  chairmanship  of  the  80  campus  ‘‘Universities  Research  Associa-
tion’’  which  operates  Fermi  National  Accelerator  Laboratory  near  Chicago.  He
served  as  a  trustee  of  Princeton  University  and  many  other  organizations.  He  also
chaired the highly successful 1991/92 Long Island United Way campaign.

As a public spirited scientist-administrator, Marburger has served local, State and
Federal governments in a variety of capacities. He is credited with bringing an open,
reasoned approach to contentious issues where science intersects with the needs and
concerns  of  society.  His  strong  leadership  of  Brookhaven  National  Laboratory  fol-
lowing a series of environmental and management crises is widely acknowledged to
have  won  back  the  confidence  and  support  of  the  community  while  preserving  the
Laboratory’s record of outstanding science.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much, Dr. Marburger.
Dr. Tether.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

STATEMENT OF DR. ANTHONY J. TETHER, DIRECTOR,
DEFENSE ADVANCED RESEARCH PROJECTS AGENCY

Dr.  TETHER.  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Davis,  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee,  first  of  all,  I  would  like  to  say  that  we  at  DARPA  support
the  strong  funding  of  all  disciplines  and  at  all  levels:  under-
graduate, high school, and graduate.

Now why do we do that?
Well, at DARPA, our role is really in the multi-disciplinary area.
We  are  a  projects  agency,  and  we  execute  projects,  which  require
multiple disciplines in order to be successful.

I  would  like  to  have  you  bear  with  me  for  a  second,  because  I
couldn’t figure out how to really go through this without using pic-
tures,  and  so  I  have  slides.  Yeah,  we  are  from  DARPA.  We  don’t
know how to talk without slides.

[Slide.]
So  what  I  would  like  to  do  is  spend  a  few  moments,  with  your
indulgence,  explaining  how  DARPA  operates.  Now  this  is  not  just
my  impression  of  how  DARPA  operates.  When  I  first  came  to
DARPA, I met with the second DARPA Director, Austin ‘‘Cy’’ Betts,
down  at  Southwest  in  Texas.  Charles  Herzfeld  was  the  fourth  Di-
rector.  I  have  met  with  George  Heilmeier,  Bob  Cooper,  Craig
Fields,  Larry  Lynn,  Frank  Fernandez,  and  Johnny  Foster,  who
really  wasn’t  a  DARPA  Director,  but  we  all  felt  he  was  anyway.
And  I  meet  with  these  people  constantly,  and  we  go  over  what
DARPA  is  doing,  looking  at  it  from  the  historical  perspective  and
what we are doing now.

So what I am about to give you is something that if they all were
here  in  this  room,  they  would  all  agree,  ‘‘Yes,  this  describes
DARPA.’’

Next slide.
[Slide.]
Most  of  all,  the  DARPA  organization  is  an  organization  that  is
very  similar  to  the  NSF  in  the  following  sense,  not  in  the  offices,
because  they  are  all  program  or  problem-oriented  rather  than  dis-
cipline-oriented,  but  in  that  the  people  are  only  there  three  to  five
years.  And  so  we  bring  them  in  from  industry,  from  universities,
keep them three to five years, and they go back out to industry and
universities.  These  are  not  detailees.  These  are  people  who  had  to
give  up  a  job  to  come  to  DARPA  and  then  leave  again.  And  that
is the same thing that happens, quite frankly, at NSF.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
How do we fit? This is really the burning question.
I don’t want you to get hung up too much on near, mid, and far.
That  is  a  notion  of  the  time  distance  an  idea  is  from  becoming  an
acquisition program or a product. If you look at the service science
and  technology,  it  turns  out  to  be  on  the  near  end.  Now  this  is
great  science  and  technology.  This  is  science  and  technology  that
makes  radars  more  sensitive,  jet  engines  more  efficient  and  so
forth and so on, but it is all about things we know about.

Then  there  are  these  people  here  on  the  far  side.  These  are  the
people  who  will  come  to  you  and  say,  ‘‘Look,  I  can  create  a  whole
new  capability  by  putting  two  systems  together.’’  The  problem  is,
one  system  may  be  an  Air  Force  system  and  the  other  may  be  an

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

that gap.

Army  system.  And  for  that  to  get  funded,  this  process  is  difficult,
at  best.  Or  these  are  the  people  who  come  to  you  and  say,  ‘‘Look,
I  can  create  whole  new  materials.  I  can  move  atoms  around.  I  can
create  materials  that  we  have  never  thought  of  before.’’  Or,  ‘‘I  can
make titanium be $1 a pound.’’ For these people to get funded, they
almost have to be like an electron and tunnel their way across.

DARPA  was  created  by  President  Eisenhower  in  1958  to  bridge

Next slide.
[Slide.]
DARPA  was  created  on  the  onset  of  Sputnik  when  President  Ei-
senhower  had  his  9/11  Commission  and  the  forensics  said  there
was  no  reason  why  the  Russians  beat  us  into  space.  The  problem
was  that  the  people  over  here  didn’t  quite  have  high  enough  on
their  priority  list  the  problem  of  getting  a  satellite  in  space,  but
there  were  plenty  of  people  out  here  in  the  far  side  who  said,  ‘‘We
could  have  done  it.  You  just  had  to  give  us  the  money.’’  And
DARPA  was  created,  not  necessarily  to  create  the  far  side,  but  to
mine  that  far  side  worldwide  to—no  matter  where  the  ideas  were
coming from, to be that agency which looked at these ideas, decided
was  it  time,  was  it  time  to  take  them  from  the  basic  fundamental
research to a product.

And  that  is  what  we  have  done,  and  we  have  done  that  extraor-

dinarily well for nearly 50 years.

Now  somebody  in  this  room  may  be  thinking,  ‘‘Well,  that  was  a
great  story,  you  know,  but  have  you  guys  ever  really  done  any-
thing?’’

Next slide.
[Slide.]
This  is  just  an  example  of  the  things  that  DARPA  has  brought
this  country  over  the  last  50  years  by  finding  somebody  on  the  far
side,  sometimes  bringing  that  person  into  DARPA  as  a  program
manager, giving them a pot full of money with the express purpose
of  taking  that  idea  or  concept  to  the  near  side  and  get  out.  That
is what we do, and we have done that from Saturn. President Ken-
nedy  would  not  have  been  as  bullish  when  we  said  we  are  going
to  the  Moon  in  1969  if  he  didn’t  already  know  that  the  Saturn
Rocket  was  there  to  have  that  possibility.  That  was  DARPA’s  fifth
project when it started.

Mundane things during the Vietnam War like the M–16 rifle was
a DARPA program all of the way to Global Hawk, Predator. These
are  all  DARPA  programs  that  were  brought  to  you  by  doing  a
multi-disciplinary  approach  to  problems  requiring  these  disciplines
that have to be funded.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
By the way, here is the budget. This Administration has treated
DARPA  extraordinarily  well.  And  Dr.  Marburger  will  confirm  that
R&D has gone up over the last four years extraordinarily well, and
they have treated us really well.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
Where is it going?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

Well,  in  the  Department  of  Defense,  we  have  something  called
the  QDR  [Quadrennial  Defense  Review].  This  is  the  QDR  from
2001.  We  are  redoing  it  again.  We  are  going  through  that  process
again.

But next slide.
[Slide.]
This  shows  you  where  our  money  has  gone.  Leveraging  informa-
tion  technology  is  dramatically  increasing.  Space  has  dramatically
increased,  and  this  category  called  ‘‘other’’  is  where  our  6.1  basic
research  budget  is.  DARPA  has  really  a  very  small  6.1  budget,
about  $150  million,  because  we  use  that  money  to  be  able  to  go  to
the  meetings  to  find  those  ideas  to  see  if  they  are  ready.  In  other
words, we are not necessarily the agency that ever really has high-
ly-funded  basic  research,  but  we  are  the  agency  that  goes  to  take
that basic research to the next stage.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
I  have  heard,  reading  it  in  the  papers,  that  we  are  no  longer
doing  ‘‘blue  sky  research,’’  so  I  thought  I  would  give  you  some  ex-
amples.

Electronics.  An  atomic  clock,  I  don’t  know  if  you  have  ever  seen
one,  but  it  is  big.  We  are  taking  that  atomic  clock  and  putting  it
on  a  chip.  Now  why  are  we  interested  in  doing  that?  Most  of  our
network  systems  today  all  need  a  common  time  sync,  and  they  all
use  GPS.  So  if  somebody  jams  GPS,  we  are  out  of  business  in  the
military.  We  can’t  afford  that.  So  we  are  basically  creating  an
atomic clock standard, which will be in your radio.

Diodes,  laser  diodes,  70  percent  efficiency.  This  is  a  big  deal  for
anybody  who  knows  what  it  takes  to  make  a  high-powered  laser
where  the  problem  is  getting  the  heat  out  to  make  things  small.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
Materials.  Morphing  aircraft.  Titanium.  We  have  a  process  we
are working on right now where we believe we are going to get tita-
nium  down  to  less  than  $2  a  pound.  If  we  can  do  that,  that  will
dramatically  change  the  way  we  do  business,  not  only  in  the
United States but in the world if we can get titanium down to the
cost of aluminum.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
Bio. We have learned how to, using the mind, control an arm.
Mr. ROHRABACHER. How much is titanium now?
Dr. TETHER. It is anywhere from $16 to $30 a pound.
We  have  learned  how  to  use  the  thoughts  of  the  mind  to  control
an  arm.  We  have  a  process  right  now  where  we  are  going  to  build
a  prosthetic  that  is  controlled  by  the  mind.  Now  this  is  a  lot  of
technology  in  that  arm.  It  is  a  real,  true,  multi-disciplinary  ap-
proach. Materials, computer science, all of it is in that arm, but the
enabling  things,  we  found  out  how  to  basically  take  the  thoughts
of the mind and moving an arm and have that happen.

Last slide.
[Slide.]
Computer  science.  $584  million.  You  heard  about  the  High  Per-
formance Computing Program, but if you really look at it, the only

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

one  that  is  doing  anything  is  the  DARPA  program  that  is  really
building  a  computer.  And  we  will  have  a  new  high-productivity
computer  system  that  will  give  us,  again,  a  competitive  advantage
in the world in about 2009 or 2010.

Computer  science,  in  general.  We  are  now  focusing  in  computer
science  at  what  would  be  called  cognitive  processing,  making  a
computer  learn  you  as  opposed  to  you  having  to  learn  the  com-
puter. Now why is that a big deal? First of all, for the Department
of  Defense,  it  is  a  big  deal,  because  we  can  reduce  people.  Now
when  Bill  Gates  a  couple  years  ago  was  out  on  the  stump  trying
to  gin  up  support  for  computer  science  and  kids  were  asking  him
questions,  and  they  said,  ‘‘What’s  in  it?’’  What  is  the  next  biggest
thing  that  we  could  be  in  this  business?  He  said  that  if  we  can
show how to have a computer that learns, that will be worth more
than 10 Microsofts. So here we are, developing in computer science
an area which is important to the DOD. And if we can do it, it will
be  an  economy  that  we  haven’t  really  heard  of  before.  So  we  are
actually  in  an  area  that  is  new.  The  people  who  were  in  computer
science  in  the  ’90s  have  not  followed  that  trend.  Well,  we  are  hav-
ing  people  working  in  this  program  that  are  really  the  new  people
just coming out of schools.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
Okay. Upcoming key events. For those of you that really want to
hear about DARPA, we have a symposium in August. It is in Ana-
heim.  It  is  open  to  the  world,  foreigners.  Why  Anaheim?  It  is
Disneyland.  Where  else  would  you  have  a  DARPA  conference,
right?

Also, we have this thing called the Grand Challenge.
Next slide.
[Slide.]
What is that about?
It is a winner takes-all. The Congress gave us the ability to have
prizes.  An  event  that  is  going  to  occur  on  October  8,  $2  million  in
cash.  Winner  takes-all  for  an  autonomous  vehicle  to  go  a  hundred
or so miles and do it in less than 10 hours.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
What is involved?
Look  at  this,  195  teams  from  36  states,  three  high  schools,  35
universities. Why did we pick this one? Everybody owns a car. Ev-
erybody can buy a computer. You can go buy the sensors. The only
thing left is you, your intellect. This is the ultimate in a multi-dis-
ciplinary approach, but the neat thing here is that we are exciting
kids, people who would never work on the DOD problem are work-
ing on the DOD problem.
Who are we reaching?
Next slide.
[Slide.]
These  kids,  this  is  what  it  is  all  about.  This  is  what  I  worry
about  constantly.  Are  we  keeping  the  feed  stock?  I  really  worry
about this more than I worry about ‘‘Is some professor being fund-
ed?’’  We  have  to  make  sure  that  kids  really  want  to  be  interested
in engineering in order to pursue that career.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Is  that  a  question  to  the  Chair?  The  an-

swer is no.

36

science?

Dr. TETHER. What? We are not interested?
Chairman BOEHLERT. We are not doing enough.
Dr. TETHER. We are not doing enough. And the Grand Challenge
was  really  set  up  to  really  put  excitement  back  into  the  United
States, like it did back in the space race to the moon. And we have
done that in a very micro way with this effort here.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
You  know,  I  have  heard,  ‘‘My  God,  you  are  really  concentrating
on Iraq and therefore you are not doing research anymore.’’ Yes, we
are  putting  things  in  Iraq  today,  which  are  saving  people’s  lives.
This gun truck is a very simple thing made out of armor. Actually,
we are finding out how it has saved people’s lives. It is in Iraq now
working. All I want to say is that the technology, the heavy lifting
to  have  this  over  in  Iraq  was  all  paid  for  in  the  ’90s.  This  is  what
DARPA  typically  does.  We  are  way  out  ahead  of  the  curve.  When
Iraq  occurred  and  we  started  to  put  things  into  Iraq,  we  wanted
to  get  what  we  had  before  and  basically—the  amount  of  money
being  used  to  get  these  in  Iraq  today  is  small  compared  to  what
it cost to develop in the ’90s.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
All right. Let us get down to it.
What  happened  to  university  funding,  especially  computer

Next slide.
[Slide.]
Well, when I heard all of the fuss, I thought, ‘‘Well, maybe there
is  something  going  on.’’  I  knew  that  we  at  DARPA  were  not  doing
anything  deliberate.  I  mean,  it  wasn’t  like  we  were  throwing  out
proposals  or  refusing  to  fund  people,  but  there  was  such  a  noise
that I figured something must be going on.

So  I  went  and  gathered  some  data,  and  this  is  the  data  of  se-
lected  universities.  I  left  their  names  off  for  privacy  reasons.  This
is  one  particular  university  that  really  has  been  on  a  downward
trend since 1999. By the way, this black line is when I showed up.
This  blue  line,  these  two  dates  here,  these  two  costs  should  be
averaged,  because  this  is  a  program  that  was  one  particular  con-
tract that was funded late in the fiscal year. So if you look at these
lines here, you find that from a university viewpoint, funding from
DARPA  has  been  either  constant  or  actually  going  up  a  little  bit.
Now this is everything to universities.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
This is all in my testimony, but this is our average funds to uni-
versity performers. This is just 2002 to 2004. This is your basic re-
search column. This amount has actually doubled over the last five
years. But notice that we at DARPA are funding universities to the
tune  of  $450  million  a  year.  I  mean,  this  doesn’t  sound  to  me  like
an organization that is not friendly to universities. We are putting
in 20 percent of our budget. On top of that, I said, ‘‘Well, they say
we  are  making  them  go  to  industry;’’  in  other  words,  instead  of  a

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

prime  becoming  a  subcontractor.  So  I  had  our  comptroller,  who  by
now  was  nuts  in  trying  to  get  me  this  data,  go  look  at  fiscal  year
2003. And it is true, $75 million went to universities through subs.
So  you  could  add  $75  million  to  that  and  say  that  DARPA  funds
universities about $525 million a year.

Now  computer  science.  Well,  this  is  from  1994,  and  it  is  in  2004
constant dollars. And it is a very interesting up and down. I really
haven’t figured out why we have these peaks and valleys, but they
are  really  only  spread  over  10  or  15  percent.  Look  at  the  scale  on
the  map.  But  in  general,  the  funding  at  DARPA  in  computer
science  has  been  upward  with  its  ups  and  downs,  but  it  has  been
upward.  (On  the  other  hand,  it  is  true  that  the  funding  to  univer-
sities  in  this  time  period  has  shifted.  However,  we  don’t  fund
things by disciplines, so in order to figure out how much is funded
to  computer  science,  we  have  to  almost  go  program  by  program,
and  we  have  about  500  of  them.  And  again,  my  comptroller,  who
by now is ready to quit, went and calculated those numbers.)

But this is—doesn’t sound like a place that is anti-university and
most  certainly  not  a  place  that  is  anti-computer  science.  But  the
issue is the university funding.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
Well,  where  did  the  money  go?  I  mean,  I  was  as  curious  as  all
of you. So I went to the websites of the universities. My God. They
aren’t  funding  disciplines  anymore.  Every  website  at  every  univer-
sity you go to is multi-disciplinary something or another. They are
building multi-disciplinary buildings for bio info. And what is hap-
pening, that I can tell, is that the universities have discovered that
multi-disciplinary efforts are the wave of the future. We agree. We
absolutely  agree,  because  that  is  the  approach  we  have  had  over
50  years.  The  problems  have  changed,  the  thrusts  have  changed
over  50  years,  but  our  approach  always  has  been  a  multi-discipli-
nary approach.

Finally, we believe that individual disciplines need to be funded.
Healthy funding of individual disciplines is required to assure that
we  can  do  multi-disciplinary  work.  We  can’t  have  a  case  where  we
are  going  to  fund  a  multi-disciplinary  team  and  somebody  says,
‘‘Well,  the  physics  guy  is  not  available.  Well,  go  get  the  zoologist.’’
You really need to have the disciplines to do that.

One  vehicle  is  block  funding  as  a  vehicle.  I  am  treading  on  dan-
gerous  political  grounds  with  that  statement,  but  all  disciplines,
however, not just computer science, in order to make sure they are
healthy,  you  might  want  to  say  we  are  going  to  fund  them  specifi-
cally.

But  DOD  is  doing  its  part.  I  want  you  to  understand  that  we  at
DOD understand this problem, and we are worried about it. We are
really  worried  about  it,  not  from  a  single  discipline  viewpoint.  We
are worried about it from the feed stock of where the kids are com-
ing  into  high  school  going  into  universities  to  keep  that  going.  So
we  are  doing  our  part.  We  have  the  National  Defense  Graduate
Fellowship,  the  SMART  program,  which  Congress  established  in
2005.  We  have  two  interns  coming  to  DARPA.  We  have  Multi-dis-
ciplinary  University  Research  Initiatives,  or  MURIs.  And  we  have
something called a Focus Research Center in both microelectronics

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

and  nanotechnology,  and  we  are  talking  about  opening  up  one  in
cognitive.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
This  is  what  a  focus  center  program  is.  It  is  a  joint  program  be-
tween industry and the government. We put $10 million in. Indus-
try puts $10 million in. That $20 million goes to these universities.
It  is  run  by  universities  to  work  on  a  rather  focused  problem.  It
is  where  we  get  our  far  side  to  figure  out  what  to  do  next,  and  in
fact, from this, we have had our microelectronics program basically
generating  what  we  want.  We  are  going  to  open  up  one  in
nanotechnology,  and  quite  frankly,  we  are  going  to  try  to  open  up
one  in  computer  science,  also  in  cognitive.  I  am  going  to  approach
Microsoft to see if they would like to join up with us, because I do
believe,  as  Microsoft  believes,  that  the  computer  science  of  today
and  the  future  is  not  the  computer  science  of  the  ’90s,  but  is  in  a
new area called cognitive.

Next slide.
[Slide.]
Thank you very much for your time.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Tether follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ANTHONY J. TETHER

Mr. Chairman, Members, and staff. I am Tony Tether, the Director of the Defense
Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA). I am pleased to be here today to talk
about research at DARPA.
DARPA Funding for ‘‘Blue Sky’’ Research

Last month, an article appeared in the New York Times (April 2, 2005), ‘‘Pentagon
Redirects  Its  Research  Dollars.’’  The  general  message  in  the  article  is  that  DARPA
has  decided  to  shift  away  from  basic  research  in  favor  of  financing  more  classified
work and narrowly defined projects that promise a more immediate payoff.

That simply is not correct.
There  has  been  no  decision  to  divert  resources,  as  the  article  implies.  DARPA’s
commitment  to  seek  new  ideas,  to  include  ideas  that  support  research  by  bringing
together new communities of research scientists, is the same as it has been, dating
back  to  the  Agency’s  inception  in  1958.  You  can  see  from  my  biography  that  I  was
at DARPA nearly 25 years ago, so I speak from years of personal experience.

Rather than go through a blow-by-blow rebuttal of the article, I am providing the
Committee with my answers to specific questions from the Times reporter (Appendix
A) and my response to a question from the Senate Armed Services Committee staff
(Appendix  B)  which  was  used  in  the  article.  I  urge  you  to  read  this  information  in
order  to  better  assess  the  claims  made  in  the  New  York  Times  article  itself,  which
is included in Appendix C for your convenience.

A  mistaken  impression  that  readers  may  get  from  the  New  York  Times  article  is
that  DARPA  is  carelessly  eliminating  universities  from  research  funding  by  requir-
ing  increased  security  classification.  The  case  cited  by  the  article  is  DARPA’s  Net-
work  Embedded  Systems  Technology  (NEST)  program.  NEST  is  developing  tech-
nology  for  networks  of  small,  low-power  sensor  nodes  that  can  operate  under  ex-
treme resource constraints of power, timing, memory, communication, and computa-
tion, while simultaneously being highly scalable and robust.

As  you  will  see  from  Appendix  A,  NEST  started  in  2001  and  was  originally
planned to end this fiscal year. DARPA extended the program for one year to focus
on military applications of the technology. Contrary to the article, NEST funding to
universities for research actually increased during the life of the program. From fis-
cal  year  FY  2001  through  FY  2005,  NEST  program  funding  for  university  research
increased  from  the  original  plan  of  $18.8  million  to  $26.1  million—an  increase  of
$7.3 million, or nearly 40 percent.

In addition, the article implies that DARPA is moving away from long-range ‘‘blue
sky’’  research.  Let  me  assure  you  that  also  is  not  the  case.  Appendix  D  is  a  list  of
representative  DARPA  research  programs  that  show  DARPA  is,  indeed,  funding
radical ideas that involve long-range research.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

When  I  first  heard  about  the  university  funding  concerns  several  months  ago,  I
decided  to  investigate  the  claim.  One  of  the  first  things  I  did  was  to  determine
whether a trend existed in DARPA’s university funding over the past several years.
Figure 1, entitled ‘‘DARPA funding at selected universities, FY 1999 to FY 2004,’’
shows the results from that investigation. For privacy reasons, I have not identified
the universities, but I will provide the Committee the information on request.

The  graph  shows  that  funding  at  individual  universities  varies  over  time;  from
year to year, funding typically goes up and down at any given school. However, with
one notable exception,1 funding varies around a roughly constant level.2

The  black  vertical  line  in  Figure  1  marks  the  period  when  I  returned  to  DARPA
as  Director.  Analyzing  the  data,  I  could  not  find  any  correlation  between  funding
levels and trends since my return to the Agency. Even the university with the large
decrease was on this path long before I became Director.

Figures 1 leads to an interesting observation.
The  major  complaint  about  reduced  university  funding  seems  to  be  coming  from
one  discipline—computer  science.  But  if  DARPA’s  overall  funding  of  universities  is
more  or  less  constant,  then  other  disciplines  must  be  the  recipients  of  DARPA’s  re-
search funding.
past five years at the expense of computer science?″

The key question becomes, ‘‘What other discipline has grown significantly over the

As  part  of  my  investigation,  I  reviewed  several  dozen  university  websites  to  see

Every  university  website  I  visited  advertised  that  they  had  created  centers  for
multi-disciplinary  research  and  professed  that  these  centers  were  the  harbinger  of
the future. What must be happening is that, while computer science is always part
of  the  multi-disciplinary  efforts,  its  past  dominance  and,  hence,  respective  share
must be decreasing in relationship to the other disciplines involved in the effort.

if I could determine the new discipline that was on the rise.

The answer is surprising on the one hand and obvious on the other: no single dis-

cipline has been taking over.

1 After  I  saw  the  dramatic  decrease  in  the  university  plotted  as  the  red  line,  I  contacted  the
president  of  the  university.  We  are  trying  to  figure  out  what  is  going  on,  and  we  plan  to  meet
in June.

2 The  peculiar  funding  profile  for  the  university  plotted  as  the  purple  line,  with  a  dramatic
increase in FY 2003 followed by a sharp decrease in FY 2004, is the result of the timing of one
contract; the funding for those two years should be averaged.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

In this same vein, last month Dr. Arden Bement, Director of the National Science
Foundation,  remarked  that,  ‘‘Evolving  in  concert  with  the  new  [scientific]  tools  are
different  ways  of  working  within  science,  such  as  collaboration  across  large,  multi-
disciplinary,  often  international  teams.  These  new  modes  of  working  are  essential
to  meeting  the  grand  scientific  challenges  of  our  era—those  overarching  goals  that
require a concerted, large-scale effort.’’ 3

Multi-disciplinary  research  is  the  foundation  for  creating  the  innovations  of  the

I agree.
In fact, DARPA has been leading that trend for almost 50 years. And we are con-

future.

tinuing that tradition.

Let me give you some examples:
Material Science: In the early 1960s, universities had departments in metallurgy,
chemistry,  physics,  mining,  and  engineering,  but  there  was  no  ‘‘material  science’’
discipline  to  solve  the  burgeoning  problems  of  space  vehicles,  ballistic  missile  nose
cones, and hypervelocity impact.

We  needed  advanced  materials  like  plastics,  composites,  thermoelectrics,  semi-
conductors,  ceramic  windows  for  high  power  microwave  devices,  lightweight  armor,
and  other  materials  for  space  applications.  All  this  required  multi-disciplinary  lab-
oratories  to  provide  the  science,  technology,  and  the  cadre  of  ‘‘material  scientists’’
to develop the materials the Nation would need for its Defense technologies. DARPA
funded  the  formation  and  growth  of  the  Interdisciplinary  Materials  Laboratories
through  the  1960s.  By  1989,  there  were  about  100  materials  science  departments
in  U.S.  universities—much  of  this  stemming  from  DARPA’s  funding  of  multi-dis-
ciplinary university activities.

Computer  Science:  In  the  1960s,  there  was  no  ‘‘computer  science’’  discipline  per
se.  DARPA  funded  electrical  engineering  and  mathematics  ideas,  along  with  ideas
from other areas, combined them, and began to focus on the problems and opportu-
nities  of  human-machine  interface  and  networks.  This  effort  led  to  the  personal
computer  and  the  Internet.  Today,  the  multi-disciplinary  outcome  is  what  we  call
‘‘computer science.’’ A recent survey of 335,000 computer science publications4 shows
that  DARPA  is  second  only  to  the  National  Science  Foundation  in  funding  this
multi-disciplinary group of researchers.

More  recently,  DARPA’s  High  Performance  Computing  Systems  (HPCS)  program
is  aimed  at  filling  the  gap  between  today’s  late-80s  high  performance  computing
technology  and  the  quantum/bio-computing  systems  of  the  future.  HPCS  involves
new materials, new microelectronics architectures, and revolutionary software engi-
neering-it is a quintessential multi-disciplinary computer program.

Stealth:  In  the  1970s,  DARPA  wanted  to  make  an  aircraft  invisible  to  radar.  To
achieve stealthy aircraft such as today’s F–117 and B2, DARPA assembled research
teams  in  radar  absorbent  materials,  infrared  shielding,  heat  dissipation,  reduced
visual signature technology, low-probability-of-intercept radar, active signature can-
cellation,  inlet  shielding,  exhaust  cooling  and  shaping,  and  windshield  coatings.
Physicists,  aeronautical  engineers,  material  scientists,  and  electrical,  thermal  and
structural  engineers  were  brought  together  to  solve  the  problem.  To  achieve  this,
DARPA  did  not  post  specific  requirements  for  academic  disciplines  to  be  gathered
to solve stealth. Instead, we focused on the problem of how to build an airplane not
only according to the Navier-Stokes equation, but also according to Maxwell’s equa-
tions,  and  then  brought  together  the  necessary  disciplines  to  solve  the  tough  tech-
nical challenges.

Analog,  Optical,  and  Radio  Frequency  Electronics:  In  the  1980s  and  1990s,
DARPA  pioneered  advances  in  digital  silicon  microelectronics  and  analog  gallium
arsenide  microwave  circuits  critical  to  military  information  superiority.  Since  2000,
DARPA has opened a new range of capabilities by leading the development of Inte-
grated  Microsystems-complete  ‘‘platforms  on  a  chip’’  with  the  ability  to  sense,  proc-
ess,  and  act  on  data.  DARPA  programs  have  driven  combinations  of  electronics,
photonics,  microelectromechanical  systems  (MEMS),  algorithms,  and  architectures
to give the DOD an unparalleled ability to sense, process, and act on data.

Bio:Info:Micro: A few years ago, we saw opportunity in the convergence of biology,
information technology, and microsystems. That led to our current work to combine
neuroscience, biology, computers, actuators, sensors, and power systems in a multi-
disciplinary  program  to  revolutionize  prosthetics.  Our  goal  is  to  dramatically  im-

3 Dr. Arden L. Bement, Jr., ‘‘The Shifting Plate Tectonics of Science,’’ American Ceramic Soci-

ety, Frontiers of Science and Society Rustum Roy Lecture, Baltimore, MD, April 10, 2005

4 Giles,  L.  and  Councill,  I.,  ‘‘Who  gets  acknowledged:  Measuring  scientific  contributions
through automatic acknowledgement indexing,’’ Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences
101, 51 (2004)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

prove the quality of life for amputees and allow them to return to a normal life with
no  limits  whatsoever  by  developing  limb  prostheses  that  are  fully  functional,
neurologically controlled limb replacements that have normal sensory abilities.

As I mentioned earlier, Appendix D shows a sample of more than 75 DARPA pro-
grams we’re working on today. If you look over that list, you can’t help but see the
tremendous  amount  of  multi-disciplinary  work  being  done  to  solve  Defense  tech-
nology problems.

Developing  completely  new  multi-disciplinary  research  is  at  the  heart  of  many

DARPA success stories that are reported often in the press.

DARPA’s focus on national security problems and opportunities naturally leads to
multi-disciplinary  research  because  most  problems  or  opportunities  do  not  come
neatly packaged in disciplines.

We  do  not  emphasize  advancing  progress  in  established  disciplines.  Instead,  we
bring  together  teams  from  diverse  institutions  and  disciplines  to  solve  a  particular
problem.

This  does  lead  to  significant  changes  in  the  disciplines  and  institutions  that  are
involved  with  DARPA  at  any  given  time,  but  it  also  results  in  a  great  deal  of
progress.

It is also highly likely that the funding varies considerably for specific established
academic  disciplines—but  these  funding  variations,  like  in  computer  science,  are
hard  to  track  since  DARPA  does  not  specifically  fund  disciplines,  as  explained  ear-
lier.

Thus,  our  funding  of  people,  disciplines,  universities,  and  institutions  increases
and  decreases  as  a  result  of  the  constantly  changing  mix  of  problems  that  DARPA
is working to solve. The mix does change, but the overall effort is robust.

This  change,  while  occasionally  discomforting,  is  very  healthy.  It  is  exactly  how
problems are solved and ensures DARPA remains open to entirely new ideas. Many,
perhaps most, of our solutions are multi-disciplinary and, as you saw above, we even
occasionally foster entirely new disciplines this way.

More  often  than  not,  revolutionary  technological  progress—which  is  distinct  from
scientific progress—is not a product of continuing, secure funding of established dis-
ciplines.  Crucial  steady  progress  is  made  within  disciplines,  but  many  would  agree
that  truly  major  technical  revolutions  often  occur  outside  or  in  between  disciplines.
Real technology breakthroughs come from the multi-disciplinary problem-solving ap-
proach that DARPA has been relying on for decades.

DARPA’s  focus  is  to  agilely  pursue  national  security  problems  and  opportunities.

Funding for the Future

As I think about the issues this committee is dealing with, I have an observation

to make.

First,  the  major  complaints  about  decreased  funding  seem  to  be  coming  from  one

specific discipline—computer science.

The complaints, I also note, never clearly identify the specific research that is not
being done, the problems that are not being solved, or the progress that is impeded
as  a  result  of  decreased  funding  in  the  discipline.  The  message  of  the  complaints
seems  to  be  that  the  computer  science  community  did  good  work  in  the  past  and,
therefore,  is  entitled  to  be  funded  at  the  levels  to  which  it  has  become  accustomed.
I want to strongly emphasize that I do believe individual research disciplines are
important.  They  provide  the  scientific  foundation  for  multi-disciplinary  research,
and they need to be funded at healthy levels to keep the pipeline full and allow for
multi-disciplinary work to occur.

However, it may be appropriate to have funding for specific established disciplines
such  as  computer  science,  and  this  committee  may  reach  that  decision.  However
once such funding is started, it would be reasonable to expect that other disciplines
such as chemistry, physics, and math would expect similar consideration.

But rigidly funding specific, established disciplines would severely limit the flexi-
bility  DARPA  needs  to  be  successful.  DARPA  needs  the  ability  to  promote  multi-
disciplinary  work  to  solve  important  national  security  problems,  to  include  forming
completely new disciplines.

We at DARPA are always interested in hearing about good ideas that we can ac-
celerate  into  use  for  our  national  security  no  matter  where  they  come  from.  This
is  inherently  multi-disciplinary  work,  just  as  the  universities  are  emphasizing,  and
we believe it is to the great benefit of our military and nation.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix A

42

Q and A’s Asked by New York Times Reporter Regarding

University Interactions with DARPA

1. Is  it  true  that  there  has  been  a  shift  in  DARPA  funding  away  from  universities

during the past two to three years? How significant has the shift been?

A:  The  claim  that  DARPA  funding  has  shifted  away  from  universities  is  incorrect.
However, University funding requires an understanding of how the DOD budgets.
There are several Budget Activities ranging from 6.1 to 6.7. Science and Technology
(S&T) funding is defined as the 6.1 through 6.3 Budget Activities.

The  6.1  Budget  Activity  is  termed  Basic  Research  and  is  defined  as  systematic
study  directed  toward  greater  knowledge  or  understanding  of  the  fundamental  as-
pects  of  phenomena  and  of  observable  facts  without  specific  applications  in  mind.
The  activity  in  this  account  is  almost  always  unclassified  and  ITAR  (International
Traffic in Arms Regulations, i.e., export control) restrictions do not apply since spe-
cific applications are not in mind. Hence these funds are ideally suited to the oper-
ations of universities.

The  6.2  Budget  Activity  is  termed  Applied  Research  and  is  defined  as  systematic
study to understand the means to meet a recognized and specific need. The activity
in this account tends to require classification and/or be subject to ITAR restrictions
far  more  often  than  6.1  research.  Hence,  not  all  the  programs  under  this  account
are suitable for universities, or even possible for universities that refuse to do classi-
fied  research.  However  universities  do  submit  proposals  for  programs  funded  from
this  account,  and  receive  the  largest  absolute  value  of  their  funding  from  DARPA
from this account. That said, as programs in this account progress, they may require
classification  and/or  have  ITAR  restrictions,  meaning  that  normal  university  oper-
ating practices make participation in the program less desirable and feasible.

The  6.3  Budget  Activity  is  termed  Advanced  Technology  Development  and  in-
cludes  development  of  subsystems  and  components  and  efforts  to  integrate  them
into  system  prototypes  for  field  experiments  and/or  tests  in  a  simulated  environ-
ment.  This  type  of  work  is  rarely  a  good  fit  with  universities.  Universities  do  pro-
pose to efforts in this account but the efforts are typically incidental, specific inves-
tigations and do not last the duration of the effort.

There  has  NOT  been  a  shift  away  from  universities.  The  DARPA  6.1  Basic  Re-
search account has increased since 1999 both in absolute terms and as a percentage
of  the  DARPA  budget.  And,  since  1999,  the  percentage  of  that  6.1  funding  going  to
universities has also increased.

DARPA  6.1  funding  has  averaged  8.7  percent  of  DOD’s  total  6.1  investment  over
the  last  10  years.  DARPA’s  share  of  the  total  6.1  funding  increased  noticeably  over
the  past  several  years.  Our  6.1  program  was  13.4  percent  of  the  DOD  6.1  program
in  2004  and  11.2  percent  of  the  6.1  total  in  FY  2005—well  above  the  10-year  aver-
age.

Within  DARPA’s  budget,  the  percentage  devoted  to  6.1  averaged  approximately
4.4 percent over the past 10 years. In this area too, the percentage has been on the
rise over this timeframe, and the 6.1 percentage has increased to 5.8 percent of the
overall DARPA budget.

In absolute terms, the 6.1 budget has more than tripled, from $54.9 million in FY

1999 to $169.9 million in FY 2005.

The percentage of the DARPA university 6.1 budget in FY 1996–2000 was 52 per-
cent,  while  the  FY  2001–2004  percentage  was  59  percent  (where  FY  2004  stands
today). This is in line with the findings of the National Academy of Sciences’ Assess-
ment of Department of Defense Basic Research study published in 2005 that 60 per-
cent of DOD’s overall 6.1 program went to universities.
2. What  is  the  reason  for  the  shift?  What  are  the  DARPA  priorities  and  have  they

changed significantly?

A: The only shift since 1999 in our basic research has been towards MORE funding
and MORE funding at universities.

DARPA  currently  has  eight  strategic  thrusts  (see  list  below)  chosen  based  on  a
strategic assessment of national security threats and technological opportunities fac-
ing the U.S.:

• Detection, precision identification, tracking, and destruction of elusive targets
• Location and characterization of underground structures

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

• Networked manned and unmanned systems
• Robust, secure self-forming tactical networks
• Cognitive computing
• Assured use of space
• Bio-revolution
• Urban area operations

In  addition  to  these  eight  strategic  thrusts,  DARPA’s  research  also  emphasizes
core  technology  areas  that  are  independent  of  current  strategic  circumstances,  but
important to future technical opportunities and successes.

These  core  technology  foundations  are  the  investments  in  fundamentally  new
technologies,  particularly  at  the  component  level,  that  historically  have  been  the
technological  feedstock  enabling  quantum  leaps  in  U.S.  military  capabilities.  Core
investment  areas  include:  materials,  microsystems,  information  technology  and
other technologies and sciences, including in recent years biology and mathematics.
Many  of  DARPA’s  university  performers  are  funded  to  develop  breakthroughs  in
the  core  technology  investment  areas.  However,  many  universities  are  also  funded
to achieve technological breakthroughs in the eight strategic thrust areas.

Details on these thrusts are provided in the DARPA document ‘‘Bridging the Gap’’

which can be downloaded from our website www.darpa.mil.
3. Does DARPA publicly break out the university component of its funding?
A: Yes, the following provides average funding for the past three fiscal years:

Universities  receive  a  significant  percentage  of  dollars  from  DARPA.  In  fact,  the
table  shows  that  universities  receive  nearly  four  times  more  of  their  dollars  from
DARPA’s  6.2  and  6.3  accounts,  even  though  the  research  funded  in  these  accounts
is less suited to universities’ operational practices.
4. A  number  of  university  researchers  have  told  me  that  the  DARPA  Network  Em-
bedded  Systems  Technology  (NEST)  research  has  largely  been  removed  from  uni-
versities  and  classified.  Is  that  true?  Is  that  because  there  is  an  operational  need
for the technology?

A:  Yes,  there  is  an  operational  need  for  the  technology  and  this  is  a  specific  case
where the original 6.2 effort was successful to the point that further efforts became
classified.

DARPA’s NEST program started in 2001, and was scheduled to end in FY05 (this
year).  DARPA  is  extending  the  program  for  an  additional  year  to  focus  on  military
applications  of  the  technology.  In  order  to  protect  the  U.S.  advantage  in  this  tech-
nology, it is necessary to classify and protect aspects of the technology.

Previous  NEST  university  performer  work  is  all  unclassified,  and  university  re-
searchers  can  publish  information  on  their  concept,  findings,  algorithms,  and  other
basic research academic material. Under the terms of their NEST contracts, univer-
sity  researchers  provide  their  source  code  to  the  Government  as  a  deliverable.  DoD
does  plan  to  protect  the  source  code  and  military  applications  of  the  technology  ap-
propriately.

DARPA expects to involve the defense contractor community in the next phase of
the NEST program. It is also expected that many of the university researchers will
become subcontractors to the defense contractors.

In addition, all of the current NEST university efforts are continuing. Some indi-
vidual  university  NEST  activities  were  reduced,  but  other  university  NEST  activi-
ties  were  increased.  Overall,  there  was  increased  funding  for  universities  in  NEST
over what was originally planned.
5. There was a specific effort to remove the NEST Tiny OS research at the University
of California at Berkeley. Do you know why DARPA attempted to classify that re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

search? Is it true that there was a prior contract that stipulated that the research
results would be available as open source?

A:  TinyOS  research  is  not  classified.  In  fact,  all  basic  level  fundamental  research
in  sensor  network  systems  is  unclassified.  The  DARPA  NEST  program  is  funding
University  of  California  at  Berkeley  to  continue  their  research  work  through  FY05.
However, DOD does plan to protect the source code and military applications of the
technology  by  taking  the  deliverable  software  from  all  such  researchers  to  further
develop it with other defense contractors.
6. Was research being done by Jack Stankovic at the University of Virginia on sensor

networks classified?

A:  All  university  research  on  the  NEST  program,  including  that  of  Professor
Stankovic,  was  unclassified.  University  researchers,  including  Professor  Stankovic,
will continue to be funded for unclassified basic research in FY 2005 as well. In ad-
dition,  the  program  plans  to  support  classified  work  to  be  done  by  defense  contrac-
tors.
7. A November 2004 report by the President’s Information Technology Advisory Com-
mittee  states  that  DARPA  has  departed  from  its  historical  support  of  longer-term
research. Is this accurate?

A: This is not accurate, DARPA has always supported a mix of longer- and shorter-
term research.

DARPA  mines  fundamental  discoveries  and  accelerates  their  development  and
lowers their risks until they prove their promise and can be adopted by the Services.
The key is a focus on high-risk, high-payoff research.

DARPA  has  two  fundamental  types  of  technical  offices.  Technology  offices  focus
on new knowledge and component technologies that might have significant national
security  applications,  which  often  involved  longer-term  research.  System  offices
focus on technology development programs leading to products that more closely re-
semble a specific military end-product.

During  periods  of  active  conflict,  DARPA  adds  an  additional  type  of  activity—
quick  reaction  projects  that  take  the  fruits  of  previous  science  and  technology  in-
vestment  and  very  quickly  move  the  technology  into  a  prototype,  fieldable  system
and  into  the  hands  of  deployed  forces.  There  have  been  many  published  articles  on
some of these technologies.

Quick  reaction  projects  are  done  in  addition  to  DARPA’s  usual  activities,  not  in-

stead of.

The  PITAC  report  addresses  specifically  cyber  security  research  for  commercial
applications  and  seems  to  think  that  if  research  is  classified,  it  is  by  definition
short-term.

DARPA  expects  that  its  information  assurance  research  will  have  a  broad,  bene-
ficial impact on the commercial world, as commercial networks move toward the mo-
bile, ad hoc, peer-to-peer features common to today’s military networks.

Recall  that  the  Internet,  which  came  from  DARPA  research,  progressed  in  the
1970s  for  DOD  reasons,  not  commercial  reasons.  There  are  many  other  commercial
products available today to protect the Nation’s computer networks that are the re-
sult  of  DARPA  research  on  information  assurance  for  military  networks  having  a
fixed infrastructure similar to those encountered in the civilian community.

Network  centric  warfare  involves  networks  that  must  assemble  and  reassemble
on-the-fly  on  an  ad  hoc  basis  without  having  a  fixed  or  set  infrastructure  in-place.
The  military  must  achieve  what  has  been  called  ‘‘critical  infrastructure  protection’’
without  infrastructure.  In  the  most  advanced  cases,  these  are  peer-to-peer  or
‘‘infrastructureless’’  networks.  There  is  no  fixed,  in-place  network  equipment—the
whole network architecture is fluid and reassembles dynamically.

In  the  long-term,  commercial  networks  will  acquire  some  of  these  features.  Why?
Because  the  cost  of  these  networks  will  be  considerably  less  than  today’s  networks,
in which fixed assets such as towers, etc., have to be built and maintained.
8. The  report  also  states  that  DARPA  programs  are  increasingly  classified,  thereby

excluding most academic institutions. Is that accurate?

A: DARPA follows Executive Branch guidelines when classifying its programs—clas-
sification  is  only  used  to  protect  information  that,  if  subjected  to  unauthorized  dis-
closure, could reasonably be expected to cause damage to the national security.

It  is  true  that  some  universities  are  not  able  to  perform  classified  or  ITAR  re-
search.  But  many  DARPA  programs  are  not  classified  and  university  researchers
are often involved in them. 6.1 programs are defined as programs without a specific
application in mind and are very seldom classified or have ITAR restrictions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

DARPA’s  programs  are  developing  technologies  to  benefit  the  warfighter.  DOD
has  an  ongoing  effort  to  streamline  and  shorten  the  amount  of  time  necessary  for
advanced technology to be incorporated into new weapons systems and become oper-
ational. DARPA’s role is to transition technology into military applications and dem-
onstrations.

It  should  not  be  a  surprise  that,  as  the  programs  mature,  they  move  from  re-
search  that  is  unclassified  to  research  that  is  either  classified  and/or  ITAR  re-
stricted.  In  addition,  as  technology  development  moves  along  this  continuum,  it
tends  to  increasingly  involve  industry  performers  who  can  actually  produce  the
product.

This progression, which results in either classification as the application becomes
focused,  or  ITAR  restrictions  at  the  component  level,  or  the  increasing  involvement
of industry, seems to account for the decrease in university performers in DARPA’s
6.2 and 6.3 research. However as the answer to an earlier question showed, Univer-
sities receive nearly four times more resources from the 6.2 and 6.3 accounts as they
do from 6.1
9. The  report  also  asserts  that  DARPA’s  new  mission  is  to  incorporate  pre-existing
technology  into  products  for  the  military  rather  than  funding  basic  research.  Is
that accurate?

A: This is not true, there has been NO change in DARPA’s core mission.

Our  mission,  established  in  1958  in  response  to  Sputnik,  is  to  prevent  techno-
logical  surprise  for  the  U.S.  and  create  technological  surprise  for  our  adversaries.
Our  focus  is  and  has  always  been  solely  on  research  and  development  for  national
security, and therefore portions of DARPA’s research have always been classified or
subject to ITAR restrictions.

Please  read  the  answers  to  the  previous  questions  and  download  ‘‘Bridging  the

Gap’’ from our website to find out what we are doing.
10. Reporter  would  like  an  interview  w/Dr.  Tether  or  other  DARPA  official  to  dis-

cuss these questions.

A: DARPA will provide written answers in lieu of an interview.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix B

46

Senate Armed Services Committee Staff Request for DARPA
Investment  in  Computer  Science  and  Opportunities  for
University Participation

Introduction:

DARPA  was  requested  by  the  SASC  staff  to  provide  an  historical  estimate  of
DARPA  funding  for  Computer  Science  (CS),  and  the  amount  of  that  funding  given
to Universities.

The following material provides data to answer the questions.
For the purposes of this discussion, Computer Science (CS) is defined as:

The  systematic  study  of  computing  systems  and  computation.  The  body  of
knowledge  resulting  from  this  discipline  contains  theories  for  understanding
computing  systems  and  methods;  design  methodology,  algorithms,  and  tools;
methods  for  the  testing  of  concepts;  methods  of  analysis  and  verification;  and,
knowledge representation and implementation.

However  it  is  doubtful  that  any  accurate  assessment  whether  or  not  DARPA  in-

terest in Computer Science has increased or decreased can be made.

Why is this true?
First  of  all,  DARPA  does  not  directly  seek  efforts  in  Computer  Science;  that  is,
DARPA does not publish Broad Agency Announcements (BAA’s) requesting ideas to
advance the field of Computer Science as a discipline.

Instead,  DARPA  publishes  BAA’s  to  solicit  ideas  for  obtaining  a  particular  capa-
bility,  such  as  achieving  24  by  7  situational  awareness,  or  developing  a  new  High-
Performance  computer  based  upon  productivity  as  a  goal  rather  than  raw  speed  as
measured by instructions per second.

Whether  or  not  Computer  Science  was  needed  to  achieve  these  capabilities  is  a

consequence of the effort and not a prime reason in its own right.

Because  of  this,  it  required  significant  effort  to  compile  the  numbers  in  this  re-
port.  Each  of  DARPA’s  400-plus  efforts  had  to  be  examined  individually  to  deter-
mine whether or not Computer Science was an ingredient.

In  order  to  avoid  having  almost  every  effort  classified  as  such,  only  those  where

Computer Science as defined above was a significant ingredient were included.

Hence  the  following  funding  data  should  be  considered  as  a  low  estimate  of  the

actual funding.

In addition, due to database constraints, the university participation funding data
is limited to those instances where the university is identified as the prime (or sole)
performer on the contract or grant. The database records the amounts obligated and
disbursed to the performer of record on each contracting vehicle; subsequent funding
distributions  made  by  the  prime  contractor  to  subcontractors,  which  could  include
Universities, is not captured in the database.
Overall Computer Science Funding trends:

DARPA  conducted  a  review  of  FY  1994–2004  funding  for  computer  science  re-
search. The following table summarizes CS research funding for those years ($, Mil-
lions).

These funds support a vast array of information research including basic (6.1) re-
search, traditional software and high performance computing programs, information
assurance  and  security,  and  applications  of  the  technology  for  warfighter  require-
ments in such areas as language translation, advanced networking, robotic systems
control, and command and control systems.

Increasingly,  DARPA  funding  is  being  applied  to  long-term  research  that  is  ex-
ploring  cognitive  computing,  which  is  the  quest  for  computers  that  are  interactive
with  the  user  and  capable  of  learning  as  opposed  to  the  current  generation  of  ma-
chine  tools;  the  use  of  advanced  quantum  theory  and  biological  based  computer
science; and, Defense applications of computer science research. Universities are not
excluded from any of these research areas and are welcome to participate to the ex-
tent they are willing to comply with basic DoD oversight and security requirements
and ITAR restrictions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

The  years  following  the  FY  1995  budget  ($546  million)  reflected  completion  of  a
number  of  software  (architectures,  persistent  object  bases),  hardware  programs
(completion  of  the  first  high-performance  computing  initiative)  and  applications
(global grid communications, defense simulation Internet, transition of the advanced
simulation program to the Defense Simulation Systems Office).

As a consequence, funding declined in FY 1996–98 in comparison to the FY 1995

level.

The  decline  in  computer  science  funding  in  the  late  1990s  would  have  been  far
more severe had it not been for the significant funding increases for information as-
surance  programs  (all  of  which  had  computer  science  as  a  significant  part),  and
DARPA’s  participation  in  the  Next  Generation  Internet  program,  a  multi-agency,
term  limited  (five-year)  effort  to  explore  network  bandwidth  expansion  and  quality
of service initiatives.

Information  assurance  programs  increased  five  fold  between  FY  1995  and  FY
1999.  In  FY  1995,  Information  Assurance  programs  were  only  $10  million  or  less
than  two  percent  of  computer  science  funding.  By  FY  1999,  Information  Assurance
funding  had  increased  to  $55  million  or  10  percent  of  the  computer  science  total.
After  a  temporary  lull  in  FY  2000,  increases  in  middleware  research  and  ex-
panded emphasis on information tools for Asymmetric Threat prediction and preven-
tion fueled the major expansion of IT funding in FY 2001–2003.

From  FY  2000  to  FY  2003  computer  science  funding  rose  $88  million  or  17  per-
cent. Yet even as the budget was increasing, the portfolio mix was changing. Agent
based  software,  Quality  of  Service  programs,  and  high  performance  computing  ar-
chitectures  transitioned  into  DOD  applications  programs,  and  the  Software  Engi-
neering Institute was transferred from DARPA’s accounts to OSD.

Between FY 2003 and FY 2004, overall funding for computer science research de-
clined  slightly,  by  $30  million  or  five  percent,  from  $613  million  to  $583  million.  A
number  of  ongoing  embedded  software  programs  transitioned  to  major  applications
efforts  such  as  the  Future  Combat  Systems.  Like  FY  2000,  the  FY  2004  decrease
is more an anomaly than a significant trend.

All  computer  science  research  activities  associated  with  Asymmetric  Threats  pro-
grams  were  eliminated  by  congressional  decree  in  FY  2004,  thus  further  reducing
the  FY  2004  computer  science  budget  by  nearly  $80  million,  and  also  reduced  out-
year outlays. Funding increases in cognitive computing, language translation efforts,
and classified applications partially offset the congressional action.

The  FY  2005–06  budgets  have  held  computer  science  funding  constant  at  the  FY
2004  level.  The  following  table  displays  the  budgets  for  FY  2004–2006  as  reflected
in the FY 2006 President’s budget.

Another  way  to  look  at  the  computer  science  trends,  without  the  masking  effect
of  inflation,  is  to  covert  and  display  the  data  in  constant  dollars.  The  following
graph does just that.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

When  expressed  in  constant  dollars,  it  becomes  clear  that  the  trend  in  DARPA
computer  science  funding  was  downward  from  FY  1995  to  FY  2000.  The  downward
trend stopped in FY 2000 and has been increasing since then.

University  Involvement  in  DARPA  Computer  Science  Research:  Data  constraints
limited  the  evaluation  of  university  research  funding  to  the  FY  2001–2004  period.
The following table shows university funding for those years.

There  are  factors  for  the  decline,  some  of  which  were  beyond  DARPA’s  control.

They are:

1. High  Performance  Computing  (HPC):  In  FY  2001,  over  50  percent  of  HPC
funding ($67 million) went to universities. However, the program focus shift-
ed  from  pure  research  to  super  computer  construction.  This  change  in  em-
phasis  resulted  in  the  major  CS  vendors—Sun,  IBM,  Cray,  etc.—receiving
the bulk of the funding and as a result, universities received only 14 percent
of  the  HPC  funding  in  FY  2004  ($14  million).  But,  they  are  included  in  the
program through sub-contract relationships

2. Information Assurance (IA): University research comprised $20 million of the
$70  million  applied  to  IA  efforts  in  FY  2001.  During  the  subsequent  years,
the IA program classification increased. By FY 2004, the unclassified budget
for  IA  was  less  than  half  of  the  FY  2001  program,  and  the  amount  issued
to universities had dropped to $4 million.

3. Asymmetric  Threats:  Universities  received  a  consistent  $11-12  million  per
year for asymmetric threat program research. This ended with congressional
cancellation of the program in FY 2004.

4. Intelligent  Software:  Much  of  the  intelligent  software  research  in  FY  2001
was  oriented  towards  proving  and  refining  the  use  of  software  agents  and
control  architectures.  As  the  research  matured,  many  of  the  tools  developed
were  integrated  into  network  command  and  control  application  programs.
While the universities continued involvement with these efforts after transi-
tion  to  applications,  the  amount  they  received  (approximately  $8  million  in
FY 2004) was only about one third the amount they received in FY 2001 (ap-
proximately  $28  million)  when  the  programs  were  still  in  the  early  stages
of research.

5. Classified  programs:  Classified  funding  for  computer  science-related  pro-
grams  increased  markedly  between  FY  2001  and  FY  2004.  Universities  re-
ceived none of this funding.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix C

49

REPRINTED FROM

The New York Times

April 2, 2005
Pentagon  Redirects  Its  Research  Dollars;  University  Scientists  Concerned  by  Cuts

in Computer Projects

By JOHN MARKOFF
SAN FRANCISCO, April 1

The Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency at the Pentagon—which has long
underwritten  open-ended  ‘‘blue  sky’’  research  by  the  Nation’s  best  computer  sci-
entists—is  sharply  cutting  such  spending  at  universities,  researchers  say,  in  favor
of financing more classified work and narrowly defined projects that promise a more
immediate payoff.

Hundreds  of  research  projects  supported  by  the  agency,  known  as  DARPA,  have
paid off handsomely in recent decades, leading not only to new weapons, but to com-
mercial technologies from the personal computer to the Internet. The agency has de-
voted hundreds of millions of dollars to basic software research, too, including work
that  led  to  such  recent  advances  as  the  Web  search  technologies  that  Google  and
others have introduced.

The shift away from basic research is alarming many leading computer scientists
and electrical engineers, who warn that there will be long-term consequences for the
Nation’s economy. They are accusing the Pentagon of reining in an agency that has
played  a  crucial  role  in  fostering  America’s  lead  in  computer  and  communications
technologies.

‘‘I’m  worried  and  depressed,’’  said  David  Patterson,  a  computer  scientist  at  the
University of California, Berkeley who is President of the Association of Computing
Machinery, an industry and academic trade group. ‘‘I think there will be great tech-
nologies that won’t be there down the road when we need them.’’

University  researchers,  usually  reluctant  to  speak  out,  have  started  quietly  chal-
lenging the agency’s new approach. They assert that DARPA has shifted a lot more
work in recent years to military contractors, adopted a focus on short-term projects
while  cutting  support  for  basic  research,  classified  formerly  open  projects  as  secret
and placed new restrictions on sharing information.

This  week,  in  responding  to  a  query  from  the  staff  of  the  Senate  Armed  Services
Committee,  DARPA  officials  acknowledged  for  the  first  time  a  shift  in  focus.  They
revealed  that  within  a  relatively  steady  budget  for  computer  science  research  that
rose  slightly  from  $546  million  in  2001  to  $583  million  last  year,  the  portion  going
to university researchers has fallen from $214 million to $123 million.

The  agency  cited  a  number  of  reasons  for  the  decline:  increased  reliance  on  cor-
porate  research;  a  need  for  more  classified  projects  since  9/11;  Congress’s  decision
to  end  controversial  projects  like  Total  Information  Awareness  because  of  privacy
fears;  and  the  shift  of  some  basic  research  to  advanced  weapons  systems  develop-
ment.

In  Silicon  Valley,  executives  are  also  starting  to  worry  about  the  consequences  of

DARPA’s stinting on basic research in computer science.

‘‘This  has  been  a  phenomenal  system  for  harnessing  intellectual  horsepower  for
the  country,’’  said  David  L.  Tennenhouse,  a  former  DARPA  official  who  is  now  Di-
rector of Research for Intel. ‘‘We should be careful how we tinker with it.’’

University  scientists  assert  that  the  changes  go  even  further  than  what  DARPA
has disclosed. As financing has dipped, the remaining research grants come with yet
more  restrictions,  they  say,  often  tightly  linked  to  specific  ‘‘deliverables’’  that  dis-
courage exploration and serendipitous discoveries.

Many  grants  also  limit  the  use  of  graduate  students  to  those  who  hold  American
citizenship,  a  rule  that  hits  hard  in  computer  science,  where  many  researchers  are
foreign.

The shift at DARPA has been noted not just by those researchers directly involved

in computing technologies, but by those in other fields supported by the agency.

‘‘I  can  see  they  are  after  deliverables,  but  the  unfortunate  thing  is  that  basic  re-
search gets squeezed out in the process,’’ said Wolfgang Porod, director of the Center
for Nano Science and Technology at the University of Notre Dame.

The  concerns  are  highlighted  in  a  report  on  the  state  of  the  Nation’s  cyber  secu-
rity  that  was  released  with  little  fanfare  in  March  by  the  President’s  Information

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

Technology  Advisory  Committee.  DARPA  has  long  focused  on  long-term  basic  re-
search  projects  with  time  horizons  that  exceed  five  years,  the  report  notes,  but  by
last  year,  very  little  of  DARPA’s  financing  was  being  directed  toward  fundamental
research in the field.

‘‘Virtually every aspect of information technology upon which we rely today bears
the  stamp  of  federally  sponsored  university  research,’’  said  Ed  Lazowska,  a  com-
puter  scientist  at  the  University  of  Washington  and  co-chairman  of  the  advisory
panel.  ‘‘The  Federal  Government  is  walking  away  from  this  role,  killing  the  goose
that laid the golden egg.’’

As a result of the new restrictions, a number of computer scientists said they had
chosen not to work with DARPA any longer. Last year, the agency offered to support
research by Leonard Kleinrock, a computer scientist at the University of California,
Los  Angeles  who  was  one  of  the  small  group  of  researchers  who  developed  the
Arpanet, the 1960’s predecessor to today’s Internet.

Dr. Kleinrock said that he decided that he was not interested in the project when
he  learned  that  the  agency  was  insisting  that  he  employ  only  graduate  assistants
with American citizenship.

DARPA officials, who declined repeated requests for interviews, disputed the uni-
versity  researchers.  The  agency,  which  responded  only  in  writing  to  questions,  con-
tended  that  the  criticisms  leveled  by  the  advisory  committee  and  other  researchers
were  not  accurate  and  that  it  had  always  supported  a  mix  of  longer-  and  shorter-
term research.

‘‘The  key  is  a  focus  on  high-risk,  high-payoff  research,’’  Jan  Walker,  a  DARPA
spokeswoman, stated in an e-mail message. Given the threat from terrorism and the
demands  on  troops  in  Iraq,  she  wrote,  DARPA  is  rightly  devoting  more  attention
to ‘‘quick reaction’’ projects that draw on the fruits of earlier science and technology
to produce useful prototypes as soon as possible.

The Pentagon shift has put added pressure on the other federal agencies that sup-

port basic information technology research.

At  the  Directorate  for  Computer  and  Information  Science  and  Engineering  of  the
National  Science  Foundation,  the  number  of  research  proposals  has  soared  from
2,000 in 1999 to 6,500 last year. Peter A. Freeman, its director, said that the sharp
rise was partly attributable to declines in Pentagon support.

‘‘DARPA has moved away from direct funding to universities,’’ Mr. Freeman said.
‘‘Even  when  they  do  directly  fund,  some  of  the  conditions  and  constraints  seem  to
be  pretty  onerous.  There  is  no  question  that  the  community  doesn’t  like  what  the
head of DARPA has been doing, but he has his reasons and his prerogatives.’’

The transformation of DARPA has been led by Anthony J. Tether, a Stanford-edu-
cated electrical engineer who has had a long career moving between executive posi-
tions at military contractors and the Pentagon.

Last  year,  Dr.  Tether’s  new  approach  led  to  a  series  of  cutbacks  at  a  number  of
computer  science  departments.  Program  financing  for  a  DARPA  project  known  as
Network  Embedded  Sensor  Technology—intended  to  develop  networks  of  sensors
that  could  potentially  be  deployed  on  battlefields  to  locate  and  track  enemy  tanks
and  soldiers—has  been  cut  back  or  ended  on  as  many  as  five  university  campuses
and shifted instead to traditional military contractors.

‘‘The  network  has  now  become  as  vital  as  the  weapons  themselves,’’  Dr.  Tether
said  in  an  appearance  before  the  advisory  committee  last  year,  testifying  that  se-
crecy had become—more essential for a significant part of the agency’s work.

That has created problems for university researchers. Several scientists have been
instructed, for example, to remove previously published results from Web sites. And
at  U.C.L.A.  and  Berkeley,  DARPA  officials  tried  to  classify  software  research  done
under a contract that specified that the results would be distributed under so-called
open-source licensing terms.

‘‘We  were  requested  to  remove  all  publicly  accessible  pointers  to  software  devel-
oped  under  the  program,’’  said  Deborah  Estrin,  Director  of  Embedded  Network
Sensing at U.C.L.A. ‘‘This is the first time in 15 years that I have no DARPA fund-
ing.’’

At Berkeley, Edward A. Lee, who was recently named Chairman of the Computer
Science  Department,  agreed  not  to  publish  a  final  report  at  DARPA’s  request,  even
though he told officials the data had already become widely available.

Despite  the  complaints,  some  pioneering  researchers  support  the  changes  being
driven  by  Dr.  Tether  and  say  they  are  necessary  to  prepare  the  Nation  for  a  long
battle against elusive enemies.

‘‘There are pressures and demands on DARPA to be relevant,’’ said Robert Kahn,
a  former  DARPA  administrator  who  is  now  President  of  the  Corporation  for  Na-
tional Research Initiatives in Reston, Va. ‘‘People think it should stay the same, but
times have changed.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

Still, a number of top scientists argue that the Pentagon’s shift in priorities could
not have come at a worse time. Most American companies have largely ended basic
research and have begun to outsource product research and development extensively
even as investments in Asia and Europe are rising quickly.

And  many  computer  scientists  dispute  DARPA’s  reasoning  that  fighting  wars  de-
mands a shift away from basic research. During the Vietnam War, they say, DARPA
kept its commitment to open-ended computer research, supporting things like a lab-
oratory in the hills behind Stanford University dedicated to the far-out idea of build-
ing computing machines to mimic human capabilities.

John  McCarthy  founded  the  Stanford  artificial  research  lab  in  1964,  helping  to
turn it into a wellspring for some of Silicon Valley’s most important companies, from
Xerox Parc to Apple to Intel.

‘‘American leadership in computer science and in applications has benefited more

from the longer-term work,’’ Mr. McCarthy said, ‘‘than from the deliverables.’’
Copyright  2005 by The New York Times Co. Reprinted with permission.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix D

52

Typical DARPA Research Efforts

1. 3–Dimensional  Integrated  Circuits:  Three  dimensional  stacked  integrated

circuits to achieve ‘‘human brain-like’’ complexity in digital circuits.

2. Adaptive  Focal  Plane  Array:  Tunable  microelectromechanical  (MEMS)
etalons at each pixel of an infrared focal plane array for chip-scale hyperspectral
imaging.

3. Advanced  Soldier  Sensor  Information  System  and  Technology:  Methods
that  will  allow  machines  to  automatically  parse  multimodal  sensory  input  into
meaningful  ‘‘experiences’’  and  support  intelligent  indexing  and  retrieval  of  use-
ful episodes.

4. Architectures  for  Cognitive  Information  Processing:  Radically  new  com-
puter  architectures  that  are  a  better  match  to  cognitive  information  processing
algorithms than conventional Von Neumann machines.

5. Biological Sensory Structure Emulation: Fundamental understanding of bi-
ological  sensory  structures,  and  emulating  this  knowledge  to  create  superior
synthetic sensors.

7. Bio-Magnetic  Interfacing  Concepts:  Novel  capabilities  for 

6. Biologically-Inspired  Cognitive  Architectures:  Relatively  complete  models
of  the  brain’s  functioning  mapped  to  brain  structures;  models  for  cognition,  as
well  as  understanding  memory  models  used  by  people  for  everyday  reasoning.
integrating
nanomagnetics  with  biology  as  a  powerful  new  tool  for  manipulation  and  func-
tional control of large numbers of cells and biomolecules, including magnetically
actuated,  on/off  control  of  cellular  functions,  and  magnetic  filtration  of  patho-
gens.

8. Canard  Rotor  Wing:  Aircraft  capable  of  transforming  from  a  helicopter  into

a jet-and retaining all the advantages of either.

9. Chip  Scale  Atomic  Clock:  Atomic  time  precision  in  devices  smaller  than  a

dime that will revolutionize modern networking and communications.

10. Close  Combat  Lethal  Reconnaissance:  A  new  weapon  approach  that  allows

long-range indirect fire to occur at the individual soldier level.

11. Computational Fluid Dynamics: Incorporation of underlying physics will en-
able advances in CFD for building ships with greatly reduced friction drag, and
building extraordinarily quiet helicopter blades.

12. Coordination  Decision-Support  Assistants:  Personalized  machine-based
cognitive  coordination  agents  to  assist  commanders  in  adapting  complex  plans
in real time to changing situations.

13. Cormorant:  Unmanned  aircraft  that  can  be  launched  from  a  submarine  and

retrieved at the end of a mission.

14. Data  in  Optical  Domain—Network:  All-optical  communications  with  optical

coding, storage, multiplexing, and routing.

15. Defense  Against  Cyber  Attacks  on  Mobile  Ad  Hoc  Network  Systems:
Cognitive,  autonomous,  information  assurance  tools  for  next-generation,  yet-to-
be-deployed, tactical military networks.

16. Disruption  Tolerant  Networking:  Replacing  the  connection  oriented  philos-
ophy  of  today’s  Internet  with  protocols  that  guarantee  message  delivery,  even
when connections are disrupted.

17. Dynamic  Quarantine  of  Computer-Based  Worms:  Computer  defenses  that

operate ‘‘faster-than-worm-speed’’ against zero-day worms.

18. Electronic  and  Photonic  Integrated  Circuits:  Ubiquitous  photonics  pro-

duced on the same wafer as silicon microelectronics.

19. Engineered  Bio-Molecular  Nano-Devices/Systems:  Engineered  bio-molec-
ular  nanoscale  devices  that  emulate  the  behavior  of  membrane  ion  channels  to
enable real-time observation and analysis of bio-molecular signals, enabling sin-
gle-molecule sensitivity.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

20. Exploitation  of  3D  Data:  New  methods  to  describe  and  analyze  shape  signa-
tures  from  advanced  3D  sensors  that  can  recognize  specific  targets  from  a  vast
array  of  alternatives;  e.g.,  finding  a  specific  terrorist  vehicle  in  urban  clutter.
21. Focus  Areas  in  Theoretical  Mathematics:  New  mathematical  foundations

for conformal field theory in physics.

22. Global Autonomous Language Exploitation: Ultimately replace human lan-
guage  translators  and  human  analysts  with  machine  language  processing  that
leads  directly  from  source  natural  language  (speech  or  text)  to  actionable  intel-
ligence.

23. Global  Reach  With  Global  Endurance:  Novel  aircraft  and  propulsion  con-
cepts  to  enable  aircraft  to  launch  from  the  United  States  and  reach  anywhere
in the world—and stay aloft for weeks at a time.

24. Heterogeneous Urban Reconnaissance Teams: System to provide real-time
reconnaissance,  surveillance,  targeting,  and  acquisition  services  directly  to
warfighters in complex urban environments.

25. High-Productivity  Computing  Systems:  Viable  peta-scale  processor  to  be

available (in small numbers) by 2010.

26. Handheld  Isothermal  Silver  Standard  Sensor:  Develop  a  handheld  sensor
for biological warfare agents that brings laboratory-quality assays into the field.
27. Human Assisted Neural Devices: Fundamental research to enable the under-
standing  and  use  of  brain  activity  to  control  external  prosthetic  devices,  using
sensory feedback and memory.

28. Hypersonic  Aircraft  and  Missiles:  Controlled  flight  at  higher  speeds  than
ever  before,  exploring  the  uncharted  territory  of  flight  at  six  to  20  times  the
speed of sound.

29. Immune Buildings: Buildings to actively defend against chemical and biologi-

cal warfare agent releases inside or near them.

30. Improving  Warfighter  Information  Intake  Under  Stress:  A  machine  that
recognizes  a  human’s  cognitive  state  (especially  under  stress)  and  adapts  its
mode of information presentation based on the state.

31. Indoor  and  Underground  Navigation:  GPS-like  capability  to  navigation  in-

side and underground.

32. Innovative Space-Based Radar Antenna Technology: Components, deploy-
ment technologies, and active calibration methods to enable affordable, tactical-
grade  targeting  from  space,  thereby  enabling  true  persistent  surveillance  of  all
moving ground vehicles.

33. Integrated  Sensor  Is  Structure:  Integrate  the  world’s  largest  radar  into  a
station  keeping  airship,  to  enable  uninterrupted,  persistent  surveillance  of  all
air and ground targets, including dismounted troops.

34. Intelligence,  Surveillance,  and  Reconnaissance  (ISR)  for  Building
Internals:  Extend  the  range  of  our  ISR  capabilities  to  include  determining
building layout and occupancy from outside, prior to entry.

35. Laser Weapons:  Tactical  and  practical  laser  weapons  that  can  be  carried  in  a
HMMWV  or  fighter  jet  and  are  capable  of  shooting  any  tactical  threat  out  of
the air-from missiles to mortars.

36. Low  Power  Micro  Cryogenic  Coolers:  Local  refrigerators  machined  into  re-
gions  of  highly  sensitive  circuits  to  increase  the  performance  of  the  electronics
without appreciable increases in the direct current power.

37. Machines  That  Mimic  Nature:  Nano-flapping  winged  vehicles,  vehicles  that

flare to land like birds, and snake-like robots.

38. Mission-Adaptable Chemical Spectrometer: A man-portable, chemical iden-

tification system with a sensitivity of 10 parts per trillion.

39. Mobile  Integrated  Sustainable  Energy  Recovery:  Novel  mechanical  and
chemical  approaches  to  allow  the  processing  of  military  waste  into  logistics
fuels.

40. Negative  Index  Materials:  Novel  microwave  materials  that  have  a  negative
refractive index (‘‘left handed’’) behavior, and extending this behavior to the op-
tical regime.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

41. New  Concepts  for  Logistics:  Novel,  heavy  lift  aircraft  concepts  capable  of
moving an entire army brigade from fort to fight-eliminating any need for bases
outside the United States.

42. Novel Satellite Communications: Jam-proof communications satellites.
43. Ocean  Wave  Energy  Harvesting:  High  efficiency  harvesting  of  electrical  en-

ergy from wave motion.

44. Opto-Electronics  for  Coherent  Optical  Transmission  And  Signal  Proc-
essing:  Exploit  phase  control  of  photons  to  realize  coherent  optical  free-space
communications.

45. Persistent Operational Surface Surveillance and Engagement: Persistent
surveillance  system  that  can  respond  rapidly  to  a  rapidly  evolving  insurgent
threat.

46. Personalized  Assistant  That  Learns:  Integrated,  enduring  personalized  cog-

nitive assistant that perceives, reasons, and learns.

47. Protein  Design  Processes:  Approaches  to  radically  transform  the  protein  de-
sign process by developing new mathematical and biochemical approaches to the
in silico design of proteins.

48. Quantum  Information  Science  and  Technology:  Fundamental  technology

and ideas that could ultimately lead to a quantum computer.

49. Rad Decontamination: First methods to decontaminate buildings after release
of  radiological  dispersal  device;  provides  a  clean-up  option  other  than  rubble-
ization.

50. Radiation  Hard  By  Design:  Putting  Moore’s  Law  into  space  by  exploiting
commercial  integrated  circuit  fabrication  of  military-critical  circuits  for  sat-
ellites.

51. Rapid  Vaccine  Assessment:  Interactive  and  functional  in  vitro  human  im-

mune system that will replicate the in vivo human immune response.

52. Real-time  Adversarial  Intelligence  and  Decision-making:  Methods  that
model an adversary’s likely course of action in different urban combat scenarios.
53. Real-World  Reasoning:  Fundamental  research  in  machine  reasoning,  trying
to drastically improve the scale at which certain types of reasoning can be done.
54. Restorative  Injury  Repair:  Fundamental  understanding  of  the  behavior  of
cells as they recover from injury, and learning how to control their regeneration
in  order  to  regrow  the  original  structure  (skin,  muscle,  etc.),  rather  than  scar.
55. Robotic  Ground  Vehicles:  Ground  vehicles  that  can  sense  and  react  to  com-
plex  terrain-negotiating  obstacles,  discovering  paths,  avoiding  detection,  and
conducting military missions.

56. Robotic  Space  Assembly  Concepts:  Revolutionary  space  capabilities  on
orbit—systems  too  complex  and  fragile  to  be  constructed  anywhere  but  in  zero-
G.

57. Robotic  Spacecraft:  Autonomously  repairing,  upgrading,  and  refueling  other
satellites-completely changing the paradigm and economics of ‘‘disposable’’ mili-
tary spacecraft.

58. Satellite Navigation: Using pulsing neutron stars as GPS-like sources.
59. Self  Forming  Constellations  of  Tiny  Intelligent  Spacecraft:  Spacecraft
that are cheap, easy to launch, and swarm together to provide entirely new ca-
pabilities beyond current space systems.

60. Self-Regenerative  Systems:  Revolutionary  capabilities  for  computer  systems
under  cyberattack  to  heal  themselves,  create  immunity  to  future  attack,  and
recognize and stop insider threats.

61. Semiconductor  Ultra  Violet  Optical  Sources:  New  region  of  the  photon

spectrum with wide bandgap semiconductor lasers and light emitting diodes.

62. Slow  Light:  Fundamental  physics  and  new  solid-state  materials  that  slow,
store,  and  process  light  pulses,  i.e.,  optical  information,  in  optical  components.
63. Standoff  Precision  Identification  in  Three  Dimensions:  New  long-range
ladar that can acquire entire scenes in a single frame, rather than by scanning.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

64. Statistical  and  Perturbation  Methods  in  Partial  Differential  Equation
(PDE)  Systems:  Stochastic  treatment  of  fundamental  PDEs  modeling  physical
systems; e.g., Maxwell, Navier-Stokes, Helmholtz, Poisson, and Laplace.

65. Surviving Blood Loss: Fundamental understanding of the mechanisms of oxy-
gen use in cells and the mechanisms of hibernation in order to increase the time
before onset of hemorrhagic shock.

66. Sustained  Littoral  Presence:  Using  the  chemistry  of  the  undersea  environ-

ment to generate electrical power.

67. Swarming  Robotic  Flyers  for  Urban  Reconnaissance:  Controlling  every
intersection and rooftop and reporting directly back to the soldier on the ground.
68. Technology for Frequency Agile Digitally Synthesized Transmitters: 500
GHz  transistors  with  large  dynamic  range  to  support  circuits  for  direct  digital
generation of microwave waveforms.

69. Terahertz  Imaging  Focal  Plane  Array  Technology:  Bridging  the  terahertz
gap  with  sources  and  detectors  in  the  300  to  3,000  GHz  (3  THz)  frequency
range.

70. Triangulation  Identification  for  Genetic  Evaluation  of  Biological  Risk:
The first, truly broadband sensor for detecting biological warfare agents, as well
as  diagnosing  human  disease,  including  agents/diseases  never  before  seen  or
sequenced.

71. Tiny  Bullets  and  Grenades:  Munitions  capable  of  steering  themselves  in

flight to hit the hardest targets at the farthest ranges.

72. Topological  Data  Analysis:  Mathematical  concepts  and  techniques  necessary
to  determine  the  fundamental  geometric  structures  underlying  massive  data
sets.

73. Traction  Control:  Nonlethal  force  multiplier  to  develop  capability  to  adjust
traction  on  surfaces  to  allow  traction  by  U.S.  forces,  but  deny  it  to  the  enemy.
74. Transfer  Learning:  New  methods  for  learning  that  ultimately  will  allow  the
transfer  of  knowledge  learned  on  one  problem  to  many  others  not  anticipated
when the initial learning was done.

75. Untouchable  Aircraft:  Giving  aircraft  the  capability  to  shoot  down  modern

missile threats with high power beam weapons.

76. Very High Efficiency Solar Collectors: Engineered biomolecules to guide the
assembly  of  inorganic  molecules  to  create  solar  cells  that  are  50  percent  effi-
cient.

77. Wide Bandgap Semiconductors for RF Applications: High power, high fre-
quency transistors based on wide bandgap semiconductors for future radar, elec-
tronic warfare, and communications systems.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

BIOGRAPHY FOR ANTHONY J. TETHER

Dr.  Anthony  J.  Tether  was  appointed  as  Director  of  the  Defense  Advanced  Re-
search Projects Agency (DARPA) on June 18, 2001. DARPA is the principal Agency
within  the  Department  of  Defense  for  research,  development,  and  demonstration  of
concepts, devices, and systems that provide highly advanced military capabilities. As
Director, Dr. Tether is responsible for management of the Agency’s projects for high-
payoff, innovative research and development.

Until  his  appointment  as  Director,  DARPA,  Dr.  Tether  held  the  position  of  Chief
Executive  Officer  and  President  of  The  Sequoia  Group,  which  he  founded  in  1996.
The  Sequoia  Group  provided  program  management  and  strategy  development  serv-
ices  to  government  and  industry.  From  1994  to  1996,  Dr.  Tether  served  as  Chief
Executive  Officer  for  Dynamics  Technology  Inc.  From  1992  to  1994,  he  was  Vice
President  of  Science  Applications  International  Corporation’s  (SAIC)  Advanced
Technology  Sector,  and  then  Vice  President  and  General  Manager  for  Range  Sys-
tems at SAIC. Prior to this, he spent six years as Vice President for Technology and
Advanced Development at Ford Aerospace Corp., which was acquired by Loral Cor-
poration  during  that  period.  He  has  also  held  positions  in  the  Department  of  De-
fense,  serving  as  Director  of  DARPA’s  Strategic  Technology  Office  in  1982  through
1986,  and  as  Director  of  the  National  Intelligence  Office  in  the  Office  of  the  Sec-
retary of Defense from 1978 to 1982. Prior to entering government service, he served
as  Executive  Vice  President  of  Systems  Control  Inc.  from  1969  to  1978,  where  he
applied  estimation  and  control  theory  to  military  and  commercial  problems  with
particular  concentration  on  development  and  specification  of  algorithms  to  perform
real-time resource allocation and control.

Dr.  Tether  has  served  on  Army  and  Defense  Science  Boards  and  on  the  Office  of
National Drug Control Policy Research and Development Committee. He is a mem-
ber  of  the  Institute  of  Electrical  and  Electronics  Engineers  (IEEE)  and  is  listed  in
several  Who’s  Who  publications.  In  1986,  he  was  honored  with  both  the  National
Intelligence  Medal  and  the  Department  of  Defense  Civilian  Meritorious  Service
Medal.

Dr. Tether received his Bachelor’s of Electrical Engineering from Rensselaer Poly-
technic Institute in 1964, and his Master of Science (1965) and Ph.D. (1969) in Elec-
trical Engineering from Stanford University.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Dr. Wulf.

STATEMENT OF DR. WILLIAM A. WULF, PRESIDENT, NATIONAL

ACADEMY OF ENGINEERING

Dr.  WULF.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the
Committee.  I  am  Bill  Wulf.  I  am  President  of  the  National  Acad-
emy of Engineering. I am on leave from the University of Virginia,
Computer Science Department where, among other things, I did re-
search on cyber security. I really appreciate the opportunity to tes-
tify to the Committee today, because I think this is a really impor-
tant issue.

I come at this from the, I think, fortunate perspective of an aca-
demic  who  has  received  federal  support  from  both  DARPA  and
NSF, being the founder of a software company and thus a personal
witness  to  how  that  federal  support  translates  into  commercial
product, as someone who had the responsibility of dispensing those
research funds as Assistant Director of the National Science Foun-
dation,  and  now,  at  the  Academies,  as  a  participant  in  a  broad
range of technology-related public policy discussions.

Before I respond to the specifics of the questions that were in the
letter inviting me here, I would like to touch on three points having
to do with how I think about these issues.

First,  in  ‘‘Science  the  Endless  Frontier,’’  the  report  that  estab-
lished the system of federal funding of basic research that we now
have, Vannevar Bush advocated a system in which the government
funds research, but the research to be done is selected on its merit
by  the  researchers  themselves.  He  said  that  such  a  system  would

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

pay  dividends  to  the  Nation  in  national  security,  prosperity,  and
health. Frankly, I think it is hard to think of a better ‘‘poster child’’
for the truth of this assertion than computer science.

From  smart  bombs  for  defense,  to  a  three  percent  productivity
growth due to information technology, to cochlear implants, the Na-
tion  has  benefited  tremendously  from  the  federal  investment  in
long-term  basic  research  at  universities.  Note  I  said  ‘‘investment’’
in long-term research. I think it is a mistake to think of such fund-
ing  as  an  expense.  It  is  an  investment  that  demonstratively  has
had a huge return.

Second,  computing  and  computer  science  is  in  the  unusual  posi-
tion  of  being  both  a  challenging  intellectual  discipline  in  itself  and
providing  an  infrastructure  for  other  fields  of  science,  engineering,
and  commerce.  While  many  benefits  to  society  can  be  directly  at-
tributed  to  computer  science,  there  are  many  more  that  have  re-
sulted  from  the  use  of  computing  in  everything  from  cosmology,  to
weather prediction, to health care, to Wal-Mart’s ‘‘just in time’’ de-
livery  system.  Across  this  broad  spectrum,  computer  science  has
been an investment with an enormous multiplier, because advances
in  computing  and  information  technology  have  immediate,  direct,
and tangible benefits on virtually all human activities.

Third, it is about people, stupid! It is worth reminding ourselves
that Bush’s ‘‘Science the Endless Frontier’’ was written in response
to President Roosevelt’s question about how we would ensure, how
the country would ensure, that if there were another world war we
would have the people able to do what the scientists and engineers
did  to  help  win  World  War  II.  For  all  of  the  bounties  that  we  can
point  to  as  coming  from  computing  research,  the  most  important
output  has  been  the  cadre  of  educated  women  and  men  that  can
take us to the next level.

So with that context, let me touch now on some of the questions
in  your  invitation  letter  to  me.  I  hope  I  have  answered  them  all
and answered them more fully in my written testimony.

I  must  say  that  although  this  hearing  is  about  the  state  of  com-
puter science, I am more generally concerned about what I perceive
as  a  shift  to  more  risk-adverse  funding  of  research  in  all  of  the
physical  sciences  and  engineering.  But  with  respect  to  computer
science,  within  the  context  of  this  general  drift  toward  conserv-
atism, I would make several points.

First,  the  NSF  budget  for  computer  and  information  science  and
engineering  has  grown  nicely  from  when  I  ran  that  directorate  in
the  ’80s,  and  I  think  the  CISE  Directorate  is  to  be  congratulated
for  using  that  growth  to  increase  the  average  grant  size  rather
than  taking  the  politically  easier  route  of  funding  more  proposals.
This  has,  however,  led  it  to  a  potentially  serious  decline  in  the
success  rate;  that  is,  the  number  of  proposals  that  are  funded  as
a fraction of those that are submitted, although I must say that the
success  rate  is  determined  by  a  number  of  factors,  not  just  the
amount of funds. I don’t have access to the data that would let me
analyze  how  serious  the  problem  is  in  specific  areas.  What  I  can
say, from discussions with my colleagues, however, is that the com-
puter  science  community  believes  that  it  is  a  serious  problem  and
has  adapted  its  behavior  accordingly.  More  time  is  spent  writing

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

proposals rather than doing research, more failed proposals are re-
cycled, more incremental and less bold ideas are advanced.

NSF has, by the way, and with thanks to this committee, focused
more  resources  on  cyber  security  research.  It  is,  in  fact,  now  the
major  supporter  of  university-based  research  in  this  area.  This  is,
however, also an example of the success rate problem. Only slightly
more  than  eight  percent  of  the  proposals  in  response  to  its  Cyber
Trust Initiative were funded.

Second, I am deeply concerned about what I believe is happening
at  DARPA.  On  top  of  what  I  perceive  to  have  been  a  many-year
drift toward the less ambitious and more incremental, the Iraq War
has  been  described  as  a  reason  to  dramatically  accelerate  this  to
focus on reaping the successes of the past, to focus on rapid deploy-
ment,  to  focus  on  industrial  development  over  university  research,
and to shift the balance strongly toward near-term topics.

While  I  can  certainly  agree  that  reaping,  developing,  and  focus-
ing on the near-term are needed, so is long-term investing. Without
current  investment,  there  won’t  be  anything  to  reap  in  the  future.
Moreover,  there  are  many  DOD  organizations  that  can  reap  and
develop. There was only one old style DARPA, and it is gone.

The  problem  with  trying  to  assess  the  consequences  of  the  kind
of shift we have seen at DARPA is that they are opportunity costs.
They are measured in ‘‘might have beens,’’ and at best, are evident
only  years  after  the  fact.  By  comparison  with  tangible,  immediate
results  of  reaping  and  developing,  such  costs  may  appear  ephem-
eral  and  perhaps  even  wasteful.  Yet  one  can  only  wonder  at  what
the world would be like today if the immediacy of the Vietnam and
Cold Wars had diverted ARPA—intentionally ARPA, not DARPA—
from  funding  crazy  ideas  like  networking,  timesharing,  VLSI,
graphics,  RISC  architectures,  RAID  disk  systems,  parallel  com-
puting.  These  and  any  number  of  other  technologies  are  central  to
today’s computer industry and the results pay off daily to industry,
government, consumers, and the military.

It  is  well  known  that  it  takes  about  15  years,  plus  or  minus  a
few,  for  ideas  to  make  their  way  from  laboratory  to  product.  One
way  to  look  at  that  is  that  there  is  normally  a  15-year  pipeline  of
ideas and technologies. In fact, only a few of the ideas in that pipe-
line  will,  in  fact,  become  commercial,  and  we  have  no  good  way  to
predict  which  of  them  will  be  the  most  important.  Thus,  if  one
stops  filling  the  pipeline,  the  effect  on  industry  will  not  be  imme-
diately  visible  as  it  ‘‘drains’’  the  pipe,  nor  will  the  exact  nature  of
the  future  impact  be  predictable.  But  that  there  will  be  an  impact
is an inescapable lesson of history.

As  was  noted  in  the  recent  Defense  Science  Board  Task  Force,
this  was  from  February  of  2005,  on  High  Performance  Microchips,
I  quote:  ‘‘University  and  independent  laboratory  work  has  played
an important role in microelectronic history in that it has sown the
seeds  for  major  technological  shifts.  At  a  time  when  the  effective-
ness  of  conventional  approaches  to  the  extension  of  Moore’s  Law
are  nearing  their  end,  new  ideas  are  essential  to  continue  the
progress  on  which  the  industry  and  future  military  systems  de-
pend.’’

Although  this  DSB  report  is  focused  on  microelectronics,  much
the  same  can  be  said  for  all  aspects  of  information  technology.  At

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

a  time  of  growing  global  competition,  DARPA’s  disinvestment  in
university-based,  long-term  research  is,  in  my  view,  a  risky  game
for the country.

You also asked me about the government’s priorities for research.
I  suspect  that  the  answer  to  that  question,  by  a  set  of  randomly-
chosen  computer  scientists  would  very  enormously  and  probably
correlate  pretty  well  with  whether  their  individual  research  inter-
ests are on today’s ‘‘in list.’’ Frankly, my concern is less with what
is  on  that  ‘‘in  list’’  than  with  the  frequency  with  which  the  list
changes.

As  I  tried  to  say  in  my  previous  testimony  to  this  committee  on
the  issue  of  cyber  security,  stability  of  funding  is  as  important  as
its magnitude. Academic careers are built on a reputation for work
done  over  decades.  If  the  perception  is  that  the  area  is  a  ‘‘fad,’’  it
may attract a few weaker researchers, but the best researchers will
migrate to where multi-decade support is probable.

Given  that  I  have  already  run  over  my  time,  Mr.  Chairman,  I

will end there and thank you very much for the opportunity.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Wulf follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM A. WULF

The State of Computer Science Research in the U.S. and the

Evolution of Federal Support for It

Good morning, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. I am Wm. A. Wulf,
President  of  the  National  Academy  of  Engineering,  and  on  leave  from  being  the
AT&T Professor of Engineering and Applied Science in the Department of Computer
Science  at  University  of  Virginia.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on
the state of Computer Science research in the U.S.

A  few  words  about  my  background  will  provide  a  context  for  my  remarks.  I  was
a  professor  at  Carnegie  Mellon  University  (CMU)  for  13  years  (from  1968  to  1980);
and during that time I did research in a number of subfields of Computer Science—
specifically  computer  security,  computer  architecture,  operating  systems,  program-
ming  languages,  and  optimizing  compilers.  I  left  CMU  in  1980  to  found  and  run  a
software company and subsequently served as an Assistant Director of the National
Science Foundation (NSF). In 1991, I returned to academia at the University of Vir-
ginia,  where  I  resumed  my  research  in  Computer  Science.  In  1997  I  became  Presi-
dent  of  the  National  Academy  of  Engineering  which,  together  with  the  National
Academy  of  Sciences,  is  chartered  by  the  Congress  to  provide  advice  to  the  govern-
ment  on  issues  of  science,  engineering  and  health.  Thus  I  have  the  fortunate  per-
spective of being a recipient of federal research support, a witness to how that sup-
port  translates  into  commercial  product,  someone  with  the  responsibility  of  dis-
pensing that research support, and a participant in a broad range of technology re-
lated public policy deliberations.

Before responding to the specifics of the questions in your letter inviting me here
today,  I  would  like  to  make  four  points  concerning  how  I  think  about  these  issues.
First,  in  Science  The  Endless  Frontier,  the  report  that  established  our  system  of
federal  funding  of  basic  research,  Vannever  Bush  advocated  a  system  in  which  the
government  funds  research,  but  the  research  to  be  done  is  selected  on  its  merit  by
the researchers themselves. He said that such a system would pay dividends to the
Nation  in  national  security,  prosperity,  and  health.  It  is  hard  to  think  of  a  better
‘‘poster  child’’  for  the  truth  of  this  assertion  than  Computer  Science.  Consider  the
abbreviated list:
National  Security:  smart  bombs,  GPS,  unprecedented  ‘‘information  awareness’’  for
the  war-fighter,  unmanned  robotic  vehicles  for  surveillance,  enormously  en-
hanced training through use of virtual reality, etc.

Prosperity: a three percent national productivity growth fueled by information tech-
nology,  dozens  of  multi-billion  dollar  per  year  industries  (see  Figure  1),  Inter-
net-enabled business models, a 40-fold reduction in the cost of telephony, a glob-
al wireless phone system, etc.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Health:  Medical  imagery  (CAT  scans,  etc.),  cochlear  implants,  bio-sensors,  smart

prosthetics, smart defibrillating pacemakers, etc.

60

All of these were made possible by the federal investment in long-term, basic com-
puting  research.  It  is  a  mistake  to  think  of  such  funding  as  an  ‘‘expense;’’  it  is  an
investment that demonstrably has had a huge return! Technology such as that listed
above  is  the  return  on  the  investments  made  a  decade  or  more  ago.  Investments
made  today  in  research  will  have  equally  large  returns  for  our  children  and  grand-
children; conversely, it is our children and grandchildren that will pay if we do not
make them now.

Second,  computing  and  computer  science  is  in  the  unusual  position  of  being  both
a  challenging  intellectual  discipline  in  itself,  and  providing  an  infrastructure  for
other fields of science, engineering, and commerce. While the benefits to society list-
ed  above  can  be  directly  attributed  to  computer  science,  there  are  also  many  more
benefits that have resulted from the use of computing in everything from cosmology,
to  weather  prediction,  to  health  care,  to  Walmart’s  ‘‘just  in  time’’  inventory.  Across
this broad spectrum, computer science has enabled a better quality of life for us all.
For me this simply reinforces the notion that funds expended on computing research
are demonstrably investment, not expense. They are, in fact, an investment with an
enormous  multiplier  because  advances  in  computing  and  information  technology
have immediate, direct and tangible benefits on virtually all human activities.

Third, I do not believe the ‘‘linear model’’ of technology development! In my expe-
rience,  the  idea  that  basic  research  begets  applied  research  begets  development  be-
gets benefits to society is both wrong and counter-productive when applied to public
policy  decisions!  Instead,  there  is  a  marvelously  rich  and  productive  interplay  be-
tween  basic  scientific  discovery  and  application,  between  universities  and  industry,
between  societal  need  and  technology.  We  refer  to  Figure  1  as  the  ‘‘tire  tracks
chart;’’  it  shows  the  relation  between  industry  and  universities  in  the  development
of  about  twenty  information  technologies,  each  of  which  produces  more  than  a  bil-
lion dollars of revenue per year. As you can see, progress does not always start with
basic research, and it often involves iteratively exchanging roles between university
and industry. The bottom line, however, is that if federally-funded, university-based
basic research weren’t ‘‘in the loop,’’ these enormously beneficial technologies would
not exist. Basic research may not be the original source for all the benefits we enjoy
from  technology,  but  it  is  a  vital  and  irreplaceable  component  of  the  rich  system
that produces them.

Fourth and finally, it’s about people, stupid! It is worth reminding ourselves that
Bush’s  Science  The  Endless  Frontier  was  written  in  response  to  President  Roo-
sevelt’s  question  about  how  we  can  ensure  that,  if  there  were  another  world  war,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

we  would  have  the  people  able  to  do  what  scientists  and  engineers  did  to  help  win
WWII. For all the bounties that we can point to as coming from computing research,
the most important output has been the cadre of educated women and men that can
take  us  to  the  next  level.  From  personal  experience,  I  firmly  believe  that  the  U.S.
early  dominance  in  electronics  and  software  was  because  of  the  students  educated
by  the  enlightened  policies  of  DARPA  and  NSF  beginning  in  the  1960’s!  If  com-
puting research has a large multiplier because of its broad application, then the peo-
ple  capable  of  doing  that  research  are  yet  another  multiplier  on  top  of  that!  Dis-
investment in university-based research is a disinvestment in the production of the
next  generation  of  people,  with  far  greater  negative  impact  than  simply  the  loss  of
the research.

With  that  context,  let  me  now  turn  to  the  three  questions  in  your  invitation  to

me:

1. What  effects  are  shifts  in  federal  support  for  computer  science—e.g.,  shifts
in  the  balance  between  short-  and  long-term  research,  shifts  in  roles  of  dif-
ferent  agencies—having  on  academic  and  industrial  computer  science  re-
search? What effects are changes in the research likely to have on the future
of  the  U.S.  information  technology  industry  and  on  innovation  in  the  field?
2. Are  the  Federal  Government’s  current  priorities  related  to  computer  science

research appropriate? If not, how should they be changed?

3. What are [my] views on the recent President’s Information Technology Advi-
sory  Committee  (PITAC)  report  on  cyber  security?  What  should  the  Federal
Government  be  doing  to  implement  the  recommendations  of  this  report?
Should PITAC be renewed when its current term expires on June 1?

Although  this  hearing  is  about  the  state  of  computer  science,  I  am  concerned
about  what  I  perceive  as  a  shift  to  more  risk  averse  funding  of  research  in  all  of
the physical sciences and engineering, and in all of the agencies that have tradition-
ally  funded  such  research.  At  a  macro-level,  I  am  concerned  that  while  this  com-
mittee has authorized a doubling of the NSF budget, the funds have not been appro-
priated.  I  am  equally  concerned  about  the  proposed  decrease  of  DOD  6.1  funding.
It is easy to make, and even to understand, the argument that in the current budget
situation  increases  are  not  likely  in  either  of  these  accounts;  nonetheless,  I  find  it
deeply  troubling  that  there  seems  to  be  little  recognition  of  the  long  term  con-
sequences of a decision not to make these investments.

As I have testified to this committee before, it is not just that there is an increas-
ingly  short-term  focus  in  some  agencies,  it  is  that  even  in  those  agencies  with  a
longer-term  focus,  when  resources  are  tight,  researchers  themselves  propose  more
incremental, less risky projects. Where bold new ideas are needed, as in cyber secu-
rity,  we  see  conservatism  and  temerity  instead.  There  are  exceptions  of  course,  but
perversely, when resources are tight we generally get less out of what we do spend.
Someone  once  said  that  great  research  does  not  come  from  moments  of  great  in-
sight, but from moments of great courage! When the existence of one’s research pro-
gram  is  on  the  line,  courage  becomes  even  rarer  than  usual.  There  is  a  cascading
effect of this—more timid PI’s educate students to be more timid, provoking a long-
term decline in the quality of research.

With  respect  to  computer  science  within  this  general  drift  towards  conservatism,

I would make several points:

First, at NSF the budget for Computer and Information Science and Engineering
(CISE) has grown nicely from when I ran it in the late 80’s, and CISE is to be con-
gratulated for using that growth to increase the average grant size rather than tak-
ing  the  politically  easier  route  of  funding  more  proposals.  In  addition,  it  has  added
center-scale  projects  through  its  Information  Technology  Research  (ITR)  program.
Together, however, this has led to a potentially serious decline in the ‘‘success rate’’
in some areas—although the success rate is determined by a number of factors and
I do not have access to the data to let me analyze just how serious this is in specific
areas.  What  I  can  say  from  discussions  with  my  colleagues  is  that  the  computer
science  community  believes  that  it  is  serious  and  has  adapted  its  behavior  accord-
ingly:  more  time  is  spent  writing  proposals,  more  failed  proposals  are  ‘‘recycled,’’
more  incremental  and  less  bold  ideas  are  advanced,  etc.  I  suspect  that  the  decline
in success rates is serious, but I know that even if it is not, it is having a significant
negative impact.

NSF has, by the way, and with thanks to this committee, focused more resources
on  cyber  security  research.  NSF  is,  in  fact,  now  the  major  supporter  of  university-
based research in this area. It is, however, also an example of the success rate prob-
lem  mentioned  above—only  slightly  more  than  eight  percent  of  the  proposals  in  re-
sponse to its Cyber Trust initiative were funded!

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Having been the Assistant Director in charge of CISE, I can’t help also remarking
that there is often a misunderstanding of the CISE budget. About half of it is lever-
age  for  other  fields,  not  computer  science.  CISE  manages  the  Foundation’s  invest-
ment  in  cyber-infrastructure  that  is  devoted  to  supporting  those  other  fields.  When
at  the  Foundation  I  felt  simultaneously  proud  to  have  the  opportunity  to  leverage
the  success  of  those  other  fields,  and  frustrated  at  the  misunderstanding  by  many
of how little of our budget was actually devoted to the basic underpinning that cre-
ated that leverage.

Second,  I  am  deeply  concerned  about  what  has  happened  at  DARPA.  On  top  of
a  many  year  drift  toward  the  less  ambitious  and  more  incremental,  the  Iraq  war
has  been  described  as  a  reason  to  dramatically  accelerate  this—to  focus  on  reaping
the  successes  of  the  past,  to  focus  on  rapid  development,  to  industrial  development
over university research, and to shift the balance strongly toward near-term topics.
While I can agree that reaping, developing and focusing on the near-term are need-
ed,  so  is  long-term  investing.  Without  current  investment  there  won’t  be  anything
to reap next time. Moreover, while there are many DOD organizations that can reap
and  develop,  and  that  collectively  have  the  bulk  of  DOD’s  Science  and  Technology
budget, there was only one old-style DARPA, and it is gone.

The  problem  with  trying  to  assess  the  consequences  of  the  kind  of  shift  we  have
seen at DARPA is that they are opportunity costs, measured in ‘‘might have beens,’’
and  at  best  evident  only  years  after  the  fact.  By  comparison  with  the  tangible,  im-
mediate  results  of  reaping  and  developing,  such  costs  may  appear  ephemeral  and
perhaps  even  wasteful.  Yet  one  can  only  wonder  at  what  the  world  would  be  like
today if the immediacy of the Vietnam War had diverted ARPA from funding crazy
ideas  like  networking,  timesharing,  VLSI,  graphics,  RISC  architectures,  RAID  disk
systems, parallel computing—or any number of other technologies that are essential
to  today’s  computer  industry  and  whose  results  pay  off  daily  to  industry,  govern-
ment and the consumer as well as the military.

Any number of studies have shown that it takes about fifteen years, plus or minus
a  few,  for  ideas  to  make  their  way  from  laboratory  to  product.  One  way  to  look  at
that  is  that  there  is  a  fifteen  year  pipeline  of  ideas  and  technology.  Only  a  few  of
these  ideas  will,  in  fact,  become  commercial,  and  we  have  no  good  way  to  predict
which  of  them  will  be  the  most  important.  Thus,  if  one  stops  filling  the  pipeline,
the effect on industry will not be immediately visible as it ‘‘drains’’ the pipeline, nor
will  the  exact  nature  of  the  future  impact  be  predictable.  But  that  there  will  be  an
impact is an inescapable lesson of history.

As  was  noted  in  the  recent  (February  2005)  Defense  Science  Board  (DSB)  Task

Force on High Performance Microchip Supply:

‘‘University  and  independent  laboratory  work  has  played  and  important  role  in
micro-electronic  history  in  that  it  has  sown  the  seeds  for  major  technological
shifts.. . . At a time when the effectiveness of conventional approaches to the ex-
tension of Moore’s Law are nearing their end, new ideas are essential to continue
the progress on which the industry and future military systems depend.’’

Although  this  DSB  report  is  focused  on  micro-electronics,  much  the  same  can  be
said  for  all  aspects  of  information  technology.  At  a  time  of  growing  global  competi-
tion, DARPA’s disinvestment in university-based, long-term research is, in my view,
a risky game for the country.

Third, please permit me to vent an old annoyance. Information technology has be-
come  critical  to  virtually  every  agency  of  the  Federal  Government,  and  specifically
to those that fund research—NASA, DOE, NIH, EPA, NOAA, etc. I believe it is fair
to  say  that  these  agencies  could  not  fulfill  their  primary  mission  without  the  infor-
mation  technology  developed  in  the  last  50  years.  Yet  none  of  these  agencies  has
contributed  significantly  to  the  development  of  the  basics  underlying  that  tech-
nology.  As  concerned  and  unhappy  as  I  am  with  the  trends  at  the  traditional
funders  of  computer  science,  I  am  at  least  as  much  so  with  the  complete  absence
of those other agencies that benefit enormously from computer science research!

Now let me turn to the question about the government’s priorities. I suspect that
the  answer  to  this  question  by  a  set  of  randomly  chosen  computer  scientists  would
vary enormously and correlate well with whether an individual researcher’s interest
was  on  today’s  ‘‘in  list.’’  My  concern  is  less  with  what  is  on  today’s  ‘‘in  list’’  than
with  the  frequency  with  which  the  list  changes.  As  I  tried  to  say  in  my  previous
testimony  to  this  committee  on  the  issue  of  cyber  security,  stability  of  funding  is
as important as its magnitude. Academic careers are built on a reputation for work
done over decades. If the perception is that an area is a ‘‘fad,’’ it may attract a few
weaker  researchers,  but  the  best  researchers  will  migrate  to  where  multi-decade
support is probable.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

I  understand  the  desire  for  program  officers  and  agency  heads  to  ‘‘make  their
mark,’’  but  I  think  the  most  effective  and  profound  change  the  government  could
make  would  be  to  ensure  that  any  new  programs  last  long  enough  to  have  an  ef-
fect—to attract people, let them find their footing, have a real chance to succeed or
fail,  and  produce  real  benefit  to  society!  Such  a  move  would  both  raise  the  bar  on
evaluation  of  new  programs  and  create  the  stability  that  will  ensure  that  the  best
researchers become involved.

To answer your third question—as you might expect from my previous testimony
to  this  committee,1 I  am  strongly  in  agreement  with  the  recent  PITAC  report  on
Cyber Security.2 I am particularly pleased that they strongly identified the need for
a  better  funded  and  stable  program  of  long-term  basic  research;  as  you  will  recall,
that was what I also recommended. In my view, the dominant model of cyber secu-
rity, namely a perimeter defense, is flawed and incremental patches to it will never
result  in  the  level  of  security  we  need  for  today’s  systems,  much  less  the  increased
dependence  we  should  expect  for  future  ones.  This  is  an  excellent  example  where
boldness and courage are needed, and hence where the perception of excessively low
proposal  success  rates  can  have  severe  consequences!  Their  one  recommendation
that  was  not  in  my  previous  testimony  concerns  the  need  for  coordination  among
the  various  agencies  that  fund  cyber  security  research,  and  I  concur  that  such  co-
ordination  is  needed.  It  is  too  soon  to  know  what  will  happen  as  a  result  of  the  re-
port, but I hope it will be aggressively implemented.

Concerning  PITAC—I  believe  it  fulfills  a  unique  and  important  role.  Its  reports
on  Health  Care  Information  Technology  and  Cyber  Security  have  been  extremely
valuable, and I expect their forthcoming report on Computational Science will be as
well. So, from my perspective it is important for PITAC to be re-chartered, but that
clearly  hinges  on  the  Administration’s  perception  of  its  utility,  not  mine.  If  it  is  re-
chartered,  I  would  like  to  see  PITAC  tackle  the  broader  issues  that  are  the  subject
of  this  hearing,  namely  whether  the  Nation’s  overall  information  technology  R&D
investment appropriate for us to maintain our lead in this critical field.

Thank you for the opportunity to testify on this important matter.

BIOGRAPHY FOR WILLIAM A. WULF

Education:
B.S. Engineering Physics University of Illinois, 1961
M.S. Electrical Engineering University of Illinois, 1963
Ph.D. Computer Science University of Virginia, 1968

Positions:
President, National Academy of Engineering, 1996 to present.
AT&T Prof. of Engr., University of Virginia, 1988 to present.
Assistant Director, National Science Foundation, 1988 to 1990.
Chairman & CEO, Tartan Laboratories Inc., 1981 to 1987.
Professor, Carnegie-Mellon University, 1975 to 1981.
Associate Professor, Carnegie-Mellon University, 1973 to 1975.
Assistant Professor, Carnegie-Mellon University, 1968 to 1973.
Instructor, University of Virginia, 1963 to 1968.

Descriptive Biography:

Dr. Wulf was elected President of the National Academy of Engineering (NAE) in
April  1997;  he  had  previously  served  as  Interim  President  beginning  in  July  1996.
Together  with  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  the  NAE  operates  under  a  con-
gressional charter and presidential executive orders that call on it to provide advice
to the government on issues of science and engineering.

Dr. Wulf is on leave from the University of Virginia, where he is a University Pro-
fessor  and  the  AT&T  Professor  of  Engineering  and  Applied  Science.  Among  his  ac-
tivities  at  the  University  were  a  complete  revision  of  the  undergraduate  Computer
Science  curriculum,  research  on  computer  architecture  and  computer  security,  and
an effort to assist humanities scholars exploit information technology.

1 Testimony to the House Science Committee, CYBER SECURITY: BEYOND THE MAGINOT

2 President’s Information Technology Advisory Committee (PITAC), Cyber Security: A Crisis of

LINE, 10 Oct. 2001

Prioritization, February 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

In  1988-90  Dr.  Wulf  was  on  leave  from  the  University  to  be  Assistant  Director
of the National Science Foundation (NSF) where he headed the Directorate for Com-
puter and Information Science and Engineering (CISE). CISE is responsible for com-
puter science and engineering research as well as for operating the National Super-
computer Centers and NSFNET. While at NSF, Dr. Wulf was deeply involved in the
development of the High Performance Computing and Communication Initiative and
in the formative discussions of the National Information Infrastructure.

Prior to joining Virginia, Dr. Wulf founded Tartan Laboratories and served as its
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. Before returning to academe, Dr. Wulf grew
the  company  to  about  a  hundred  employees.  Tartan  developed  and  marketed  opti-
mizing  compilers,  notably  for  Ada.  Tartan  was  sold  to  Texas  Instruments  in  1995.
The technical basis for Tartan was research by Dr. Wulf while he was a Professor
of  Computer  Science  at  Carnegie-Mellon  University,  where  he  was  Acting  Head  of
the  Department  from  1978–1979.  At  Carnegie-Mellon  Dr.  Wulf’s  research  spanned
programming  systems  and  computer  architecture;  specific  research  activities  in-
cluded:  the  design  and  implementation  of  a  systems-implementation  language
(Bliss),  architectural  design  of  the  DEC  PDP–11,  the  design  and  construction  of  a
16  processor  multiprocessor  and  its  operating  system,  a  new  approach  to  computer
security,  and  development  of  a  technology  for  the  construction  of  high  quality  opti-
mizing compilers. Dr. Wulf also actively participated in the development of Ada, the
common DOD programming language for embedded computer applications.

While at Carnegie-Mellon and Tartan, Dr. Wulf was active in the ‘‘high tech’’ com-
munity in Pittsburgh. He helped found the Pittsburgh High Technology Council and
served  as  Vice  President  and  Director  from  its  creation.  He  also  helped  found  the
CEO  Network,  the  CEO  Venture  Fund,  and  served  as  an  advisor  to  the  Western
Pennsylvania Advanced Technology Center. In 1983 he was awarded the Enterprise
‘‘Man of the Year’’ Award for these and other activities.

Dr.  Wulf  is  a  member  of  the  National  Academy  of  Engineering,  a  Fellow  of  the
American Academy of Arts and Sciences, a Corresponding Member of the Academia
Espanola De Ingeniera, a Member of the Academy Bibliotheca Alexandrina (Library
of  Alexandria),  and  a  Foreign  Member  of  the  Russian  Academy  of  Sciences.  He  is
also a Fellow of five professional societies: the ACM, the IEEE, the AAAS, IEC, and
AWIS. He is the author of over 100 papers and technical reports, has written three
books,  holds  two  U.S.  Patents,  and  has  supervised  over  25  Ph.D.s  in  Computer
Science.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much, Dr. Wulf.
Dr. Leighton.

STATEMENT OF DR. F. THOMSON LEIGHTON, CHIEF

SCIENTIST AND CO-FOUNDER, AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES

Dr. LEIGHTON. Sorry. I will start over.
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  my  testimony
today  is  based  on  my  experience  as  the  co-founder  and  Chief  Sci-
entist  of  Akamai  Technologies.  I  am  also  a  professor  of  Applied
Mathematics  at  MIT  and  Chair  of  the  PITAC  Subcommittee  on
Cyber Security.

Akamai is the leading provider of content-delivery services on the
Internet. Using sophisticated algorithms to coordinate computers in
thousands  of  locations  spanning  70  countries,  Akamai  distributes
content  and  applications  for  thousands  of  websites  to  hundreds  of
millions  of  consumers  worldwide.  We  serve  each  of  you  every  day.
One out of every five Global 500 companies and many government
agencies, including the House of Representatives, rely on Akamai’s
services.

Akamai  also  provides  the  primary  means  of  defense  against
cyber  attacks  for  many  key  websites.  When  the  FBI  website  was
brought  down  on  September  11,  they  turned  to  Akamai  to  help
them  restore  service.  On  behalf  of  our  customers,  we  fight  a  non-
stop  battle  against  cyber  attacks  that  are  increasing  in  sophistica-
tion and scale every day.

Like  the  Internet  itself,  Akamai  evolved  from  an  academic  re-
search  project  sponsored  by  DARPA.  DARPA  has  a  long  and  very
successful  history  of  funding  basic  research  by  the  Nation’s  best
computer  scientists.  But  recently,  DARPA  has  shifted  IT  funding
away from basic research at universities in favor of classified work
and/or more development-related projects.

If DARPA’s current practices had been in effect in the mid-1990s,
it  is  unlikely  that  the  development  of  Akamai’s  technology  would
have  taken  place.  That  is  because  no  other  agency  has  stepped  in
to  fill  the  gap  created  by  the  shift  at  DARPA.  This  is  particularly
evident in the area of cyber security.

Although  DHS  is  tasked  with  providing  security  for  the  home-
land,  they  spend  less  than  two  percent  of  their  S&T  budget  on
cyber security. And of that amount, less than one-tenth, a mere $2
million, is spent on fundamental research for cyber security.

Today,  NSF  has  the  only  substantial  civilian  program  for  cyber
security  research,  and  it  is  seriously  underfunded.  In  2004,  NSF
funded just eight percent of the qualified research proposals in the
area of cyber security. This is a factor of three less than the overall
agency  average.  In  IT  overall,  the  funding  rate  is  only  16  percent,
an  amount  that  has  dropped  by  a  factor  of  two  over  the  last  four
years.

As  a  result  of  the  decline  in  government  funding  for  basic  re-
search in IT, we are now facing a serious lag in our nation’s ability
to  continue  to  innovate,  and  at  a  time  when  innovation  is  most
needed.

The  need  for  innovation  is  especially  urgent  in  the  area  of  cyber
security.  Today,  it  is  possible  for  a  malicious  agent  to  penetrate
millions of computers around the world in a matter of minutes and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

then  exploit  those  machines  to  attack  the  Nation’s  critical  infra-
structure, penetrate its sensitive systems, or steal valuable data.

As we have documented in a recent PITAC report, cyber attacks
are growing at an alarming rate, and they now cost the Nation bil-
lions  of  dollars  annually.  The  financial  sector  is  being  particularly
hard  hit.  New  forms  of  electronic  crime,  such  as  phishing,
pharming,  and  cyber  extortion,  unheard  of  only  a  few  years  ago,
are  now  commonplace.  Eighty-three  percent  of  financial  institu-
tions  reported  compromised  systems  in  2003,  a  rate  that  doubled
in  just  two  years.  And  at  least  one  percent  of  U.S.  households  fell
victim  to  electronic  identity  theft  at  a  cost  of  over  $400  million  in
the first half of 2004.

Everyone  is  vulnerable.  Today,  a  criminal  can  steal  most  any
password that is used for access over the Internet. Beyond the eco-
nomic  repercussions,  there  are  serious  risks  to  our  national  secu-
rity.

Today,  virtually  every  sector  of  the  Nation’s  infrastructure,  in-
cluding  communications,  utilities,  finance,  transportation,  law  en-
forcement,  and  defense,  is  critically  reliant  on  networked  IT  sys-
tems,  and  these  systems  have  very  little,  if  any,  defense  against
cyber  attack.  All  elements  of  the  Nation’s  infrastructure  are  inse-
cure if the IT is insecure. And today, our IT is insecure.

Our  national  defense  systems  are  also  at  risk,  because  the  mili-
tary increasingly relies on many of the same vulnerable IT systems
as  the  civilian  sector.  This  is  one  reason  why  it  is  vital  that
DARPA  not  ignore  the  civilian  sector  when  allocating  funds  for
cyber security research.

We  are  now  just  beginning  to  see  the  effects  of  a  decades-long
failure  to  develop  the  security  protocols  and  practices  needed  to
protect  the  Nation’s  IT  infrastructure.  Although  the  short-term
patches  and  fixes  that  are  the  norm  today  can  be  useful  in  re-
sponse  to  isolated  vulnerabilities,  they  do  not  adequately  address
the core problems.

In  order  to  make  true  progress  against  the  core  problems  that
plague  our  IT  infrastructure,  PITAC  believes  that  fundamental  re-
search  is  required  to  develop  entirely  new  approaches  to  cyber  se-
curity.  We  recommend  that  the  NSF  budget  for  cyber  security  be
increased by $90 million annually and that DARPA restore its his-
torical role of funding basic, unclassified research in cyber security.
We  also  recommend  that  DHS  significantly  expand  its  funding  for
cyber security research.

It  is  imperative  that  the  Federal  Government  take  action  before
the  situation  worsens  and  the  cost  of  inaction  becomes  even  great-
er.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Leighton follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF F. THOMSON LEIGHTON

Chairman  Boehlert,  Ranking  Member  Gordon,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I
appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  this  morning  about  The  Future  of  Computer
Science Research in the United States.

I am appearing today in my role as the Co-founder and Chief Scientist of Akamai
Technologies.  I  am  also  a  Professor  of  Applied  Mathematics  at  MIT,  a  member  of
the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC),  and  Chair  of
the PITAC Subcommittee on Cyber Security.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

Although  I  will  focus  my  remarks  on  the  crisis  this  nation  faces  in  the  area  of
cyber security, the challenges we face with cyber security research are very similar
to  those  we  face  with  IT  at  large.  Namely,  there  is  much  research  that  urgently
needs to be done, little of which will be funded by industry. And, the current under-
investment  in  fundamental  research  by  the  government  could  lead  to  dire  con-
sequences for the Nation.

Akamai is the leading supplier of content delivery services on the Internet. Using
sophisticated  algorithms  to  coordinate  the  operation  of  15,000  web  servers  in  70
countries,  Akamai  distributes  content  and  applications  from  thousands  of  web  sites
to  hundreds  of  millions  of  consumers  worldwide.  We  serve  each  of  you  every  day.
One out of every five Global 500 companies and many government agencies (includ-
ing  the  House  of  Representatives)  utilize  the  Akamai  platform  to  distribute  their
content and applications over the Internet.

As  part  of  our  business,  we  provide  the  primary  means  of  defense  against  cyber
attacks for many web sites. When the FBI web site was brought down on September
11, 2001, they turned to Akamai to help them restore service. On behalf of our cus-
tomers,  we  fight  a  nonstop  battle  against  cyber  attacks  that  are  increasing  in  so-
phistication and scale every day.

Like the Internet itself, Akamai evolved from what was originally an academic re-
search  project  sponsored  by  the  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency
(DARPA). DARPA has a long and very successful history of funding research by the
Nation’s  best  computer  scientists.  But  recently,  DARPA  has  shifted  funding  away
from fundamental research at universities in favor of financing classified work and/
or more development-related projects.

If  DARPA’s  current  practices  had  been  in  effect  in  the  mid-1990s,  it  is  unlikely
that the development of Akamai’s technology, to improve the distribution of content
and applications over the Internet, would have taken place. That is because no other
agency has stepped in to fill the gap created by the shift at DARPA. This is particu-
larly evident in the area of cyber security.

Although  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  is  tasked  with  providing
security  for  the  homeland,  including  cyber  security,  they  spend  less  than  two  per-
cent of their Science and Technology budget on cyber security, and, of that amount,
less than 1/10 (a mere $2 million) is spent on fundamental research for cyber secu-
rity.

Although  many  agencies  are  concerned  with  cyber  security,  the  National  Science
Foundation  (NSF)  has  the  only  substantial  program  for  funding  fundamental  re-
search on cyber security, and it is seriously under funded. In 2004, NSF funded just
eight  percent  of  qualified  research  proposals  in  the  area  of  cyber  security.  This  is
a  factor  of  three  less  than  the  overall  agency  average.  In  the  related  area  of  com-
puter  science  and  engineering,  the  funding  rate  is  only  16  percent,  and  decreasing.
In fact, the success rate for NSF’s Computer and Information Science and Engineer-
ing  (CISE)  Directorate  proposals  has  dropped  by  a  factor  of  two  over  the  last  four
years.

As  a  result  of  the  changes  in  government  funding  for  basic  research,  we  are  now
facing  a  serious  lag  in  our  nation’s  ability  to  continue  to  innovate,  and  at  a  time
when innovation is most needed.

The need for innovation is especially urgent in the area of cyber security. Because
of  the  great  improvements  in  functionality  and  efficiency  afforded  by  Internet  tech-
nology,  it  has  been  incorporated  into  most  every  aspect  of  our  society.  Today,  vir-
tually  every  sector  of  the  Nation’s  infrastructure—including  communications,  utili-
ties, finance, transportation, law enforcement, and defense—is now critically reliant
on networking technology.

Unfortunately,  the  revolution  in  connectivity  afforded  by  the  Internet  has  also
dramatically increased the capabilities of those who would do harm. Today, it is pos-
sible  for  a  malicious  agent  to  penetrate  millions  of  computers  around  the  world  in
a matter of minutes, exploiting those machines to attack the Nation’s critical infra-
structure,  penetrate  sensitive  systems,  or  steal  valuable  data.  The  growth  in  the
number of attacks matches the tremendous growth in connectivity, and dealing with
these attacks now costs the Nation billions of dollars annually.

We  have  included  numerous  statistics  that  document  the  rapidly  escalating  na-
ture  of  the  cyber  security  problem  in  the  PITAC  report,  titled  ‘‘Cyber  Security:  A
Crisis in Prioritization.’’ I will mention just a few here.

In  the  last  half  of  2004,  over  7,000  different  viruses  and  worms  were  released
across the Internet. This is a 64 percent increase over the first six months of 2004.1
Because  of  such  viruses  and  worms,  the  percentage  of  computers  that  became  in-

1 Symantec, Internet Security Threat Report, March 21, 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

fected  each  month  grew  from  one  percent  in  1996  to  over  10  percent  per  month  in
2003.2

These  infected  computers  reside  in  our  homes,  offices,  and  schools.  No  computer
is  immune.  Indeed,  the  networks  of  40  percent  of  the  Fortune  100  companies  were
so severely compromised in 2003 that they became the source of a spreading virus.3
Once infected, a computer can be reprogrammed so as to reveal confidential infor-
mation  to  attackers,  destroy  or  alter  important  data,  and/or  to  carry  out  attacks
against  others.  When  infected  computers  are  incorporated  into  so-called  ‘‘bot  ar-
mies,’’  they  can  be  used  as  platforms  for  launching  unwanted  spam  or,  even  worse,
denial of service attacks against critical infrastructure. In the first half of 2004, the
rate at which newly-infected computers were incorporated into bot armies rose from
2,000 per day to over 30,000 per day.4

The  use  of  bot  armies  to  attack  web  sites  has  given  rise  to  a  new  form  of  crime
known as cyber extortion, in which the criminal will demand payment in return for
not  attacking  a  businesses’  web  presence.  Although  cyber  extortion  was  unheard  of
just  a  few  years  ago,  17  out  of  100  companies  surveyed  in  a  recent  poll  reported
being the target of cyber extortion in 2004.5

The financial sector is one of many key industry segments that are being particu-
larly  hard  hit  by  cyber  crime.  83  percent  of  financial  institutions  reported  com-
promised  systems  in  2003,  more  than  double  the  rate  in  2001.  The  use  of  phishing
scams to direct unwitting citizens to fake web sites, whereupon they are tricked into
revealing their passwords and other sensitive information is now rampant.6

In  the  last  two  months,  a  new  and  even  more  pernicious  kind  of  attack  known
as  pharming  has  become  widespread.7 Pharming  is  different  from  phishing  in  that
it  makes  use  of  fundamental  vulnerabilities  in  the  basic  protocols  that  are  used  to
run the Internet. As a result, the attack is virtually undetectable, even by an experi-
enced professional.

It  is  estimated  that  over  one  percent  of  U.S.  households  fell  victim  to  electronic
identity  theft  at  a  cost  of  over  $400M  in  the  first  six  months  of  2004.8 Everyone
is vulnerable. Today, a criminal can steal most any password that is used for access
over the Internet.

Beyond  the  economic  repercussions,  there  are  serious  risks  to  our  national  secu-
rity.  Today,  virtually  every  sector  of  the  Nation’s  infrastructure—including  commu-
nications,  utilities,  finance,  transportation,  law  enforcement,  and  defense—is  criti-
cally  reliant  on  networked  IT  systems,  and  these  systems  have  very  little,  if  any,
defense against cyber attack.

All  elements  of  the  Nation’s  infrastructure  are  insecure  if  IT  is  insecure,  and,

today, our IT is insecure.

Our  national  defense  systems  are  also  at  risk,  because  the  military  increasingly
relies on many of the same vulnerable IT systems as the civilian sector. This is one
reason  why  it  is  vital  that  DARPA  not  ignore  the  civilian  sector  when  allocating
funds for cyber security research.

In  response  to  the  growing  crisis,  some  have  stated  that  if  only  the  citizens  at
home  and  in  small  business  would  keep  their  firewalls  and  software  patches  up  to
date,  we  would  be  OK.  While  such  safeguards  are  clearly  necessary,  they  are  far
from  sufficient.  After  all,  if  the  most  sophisticated  and  IT-savvy  companies  in  the
world  are  routinely  falling  victim  to  cyber  attacks,  how  can  we  expect  our  citizens
at home and in small business to fare any better?

Moreover, the problem is not just about ubiquitous software that is vulnerable to
viruses  and  worms.  The  core  protocols  that  form  the  underpinnings  of  the  Internet
were simply not designed with security in mind.

We  are  now  just  beginning  to  see  the  effects  of  a  decades-long  failure  to  develop
the security protocols and practices needed to protect the Nation’s IT infrastructure,
and  to  adequately  train  and  grow  the  numbers  of  experts  needed  to  employ  those
mechanisms  effectively.  The  short-term  patches  and  fixes  that  are  deployed  today
can be useful in response to isolated vulnerabilities, but they do not adequately ad-
dress the core problems.

2 ICSA  Labs  Virus  Alerts;  PITAC—February  2005  Report,  ‘‘Cyber  Security:  A  Crisis  of

Prioritization,’’ p. 10.

3 Symantec Internet Security Threat Report, March 21, 2005.
4 PITAC—February 2005 Report, ‘‘Cyber Security: A Crisis of Prioritization,’’p. 10.
5 2004  poll  by  Carnegie-Mellon  University—InformationWeek;  PITAC—February  2005  Report

‘‘Cyber Security: A Crisis of Prioritization,’’ p. 8.

6 Anti-Phishing Working Group (www.antiphishing.org).
7 Anti-Phishing Working Group (www.antiphishing.org).
8 Consumers  Union  (www.consumersunion.org);  PITAC—February  2005  Report  ‘‘Cyber  Secu-

rity: A Crisis of Prioritization,’’ p. 9.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

In order to make true progress against the core problems that plague our IT infra-
structure, PITAC believes that fundamental research is required to develop entirely
new approaches to cyber security. We recommend that the NSF budget for cyber se-
curity  be  increased  by  $90M  annually  and  that  DARPA  restore  its  historical  role
of  funding  basic,  unclassified  research  in  cyber  security.  We  also  recommend  that
DHS significantly expand its funding for cyber security research.

The report goes on to describe ten specific research areas that are in the greatest
need  of  support  as  well  as  specific  recommendations  to  improve  coordination  of  re-
search  efforts,  to  facilitate  technology  transfer,  and  to  increase  the  pool  of  experi-
enced researchers in the area of cyber security.

In  summary,  the  PITAC  finds  that  the  IT  infrastructure  of  the  United  States—
and thus all other elements of our infrastructure that rely on IT, such as the electric
power  system,  the  government,  and  the  military—is  highly  vulnerable  to  terrorist
and criminal attacks. Fundamental research is urgently required to improve our de-
fenses.  It  is  imperative  that  the  Federal  Government  take  action  before  the  situa-
tion worsens and the cost of inaction becomes even greater.

Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix A

72

The Threat from ‘‘Phishing’’ and ‘‘Pharming’’

(excerpts  from:  The  Arizona  Republic—‘Pharmers’  hit  online  bank  users  with

fraud scam, April 22, 2005, by Jane Larson)

A  new  malicious  cyber  security  crime  is  emerging  that  has  serious  ramifications
for  consumers,  business,  and  even  government  agencies.  The  criminal  act  is  called
pharming—a  play  on  ‘‘phishing,’’  and  another  type  of  Internet  fraud—that  involves
highly skilled hackers who secretly redirect users’ computers from financial sites to
the  scammers’  fake  ones,  where  they  steal  passwords  and  other  personal  informa-
tion. Even the Web address looks the same.

Unlike phishing, where users click on links in e-mails and are taken to fake sites,
pharming  intercepts  a  user  on  his  or  her  way  to  the  bank  or  credit-card  firm.  And
it  potentially  can  affect  thousands  of  users  at  a  time.  Hackers  are  targeting  small
sections  of  the  Internet  and  rerouting  traffic  to  fake  bank  sites  to  capture  users’
passwords. The legitimate sites don’t notice the drop in Web traffic because it is just
a fraction of the total.

Criminals can ‘pharm’ data online with little or no knowledge by consumers. Even
experienced  Internet  users  can  become  victims  and  not  know  it.  It  is  just  a  matter
of time before the scam becomes widespread.

An  anti-phishing  bill  introduced  in  Congress  last  month  would  also  apply  to
pharming.  It  calls  for  prison  time  and  fines  for  those  caught  either  phishing  or
pharming.

Consider the following facts:

— Over  7,300  new  Windows-based  virus  and  worm  variants  emerged  over  the
last  six  months  of  2004.  This  is  a  64  percent  increase  over  the  first  six
months of 2004. (Symantec)

— Over  2,600  active  phishing  sites  were  reported  in  February  of  2005.  (Anti-

Phishing Working Group)

— 64  brand  name  businesses  were  targeted  by  phishing  scams  in  January

2005. (Anti-Phishing Working Group)

— The  United  States  ranks  first  among  countries  hosting  the  most  phishing

Web sites. (Anti-Phishing Working Group)

Pharmers have four main ways of operating: attacking a user’s computer, attack-
ing  the  large  servers  that  find  web  sites  for  users,  compromising  the  routing  infra-
structure, or by intercepting wireless communications.

The  first  way  is  to  send  virus-laden  e-mails  that  install  small  software  programs
on  users’  computers.  When  a  user  tries  to  go  to  his  bank’s  web  site,  the  program
redirects the browser to the pharmers’ fake site. It then asks a user to update infor-
mation  such  as  log-ons,  PIN  codes  or  driver’s  license  numbers.  Scammers  use  the
information to steal identities.

Other  viruses,  called  key  loggers,  track  a  user’s  key  strokes  on  legitimate  sites

and can be used to steal passwords.

The  pharmers’  second  method  takes  advantage  of  the  fact  that  Web  sites  have
verbal  names  but  reside  at  numeric  addresses  on  the  Internet.  When  users  type  a
Web site’s name into their browsers, Domain Name System (DNS) servers read the
name and look up its numeric address so that users can get to the site.

Pharmers interfere with that process by changing the real site’s numeric address

to the fake site’s numeric address.

The  servers  can  belong  to  financial  institutions,  Web-hosting  companies  or  Inter-
net service providers. This tactic, called DNS poisoning, has been around for years,
but it is only in the past six months that techies have seen it used for identity theft
and dubbed it pharming.

The  third  way  is  by  sending  incorrect  data  to  an  Internet  router,  exploiting  the
fact  that  the  Border  Gateway  Protocol  (BGP)  has  no  security.  A  hacker  can  then
induce the router to send traffic to the wrong place.

The  fourth  method  is  to  intercept  wireless  traffic.  If  a  user  is,  for  example,  in  a
cyber/wireless  cafe´,  a  hacker  can  bring  his  own  Dynamic  Host  Configuration  Pro-
tocol (DHCP) server, intercept a wireless signal, and reply to an end user’s Internet
request  prior  to  the  response  from  the  actual  origin  page.  The  hacker  then  takes
over the session, and is controlling all communications.

What is alarming is that pharming can re-route many thousands of Internet users
at a time, making the impact potentially huge. With phishing, you’re scamming one
person at a time; pharming allows you to scam a large group at once.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Pharming can also easily be evolved to impact businesses and military personnel,

essentially collecting confidential data, and jeopardizing national infrastructure.

73

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix B

74

PITAC Letter to the President to Accompany PITAC Report

on Cyber Security

[Note:  The  Executive  Summary  of  this  Report  is  included  in  the  hearing  charter.]

February 28, 2005
The Honorable George W. Bush
President of the United States
The White House
Washington, D.C. 20500
Dear Mr. President:

We  submit  to  you  the  enclosed  report  entitled  Cyber  Security:  A  Crisis  of
Prioritization.  For  nearly  a  year,  the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory
Committee  (PITAC)  has  studied  the  security  of  the  information  technology  (IT)  in-
frastructure of the United States, which is essential to national and homeland secu-
rity as well as everyday life.

The  IT  infrastructure  is  highly  vulnerable  to  premeditated  attacks  with  poten-
tially  catastrophic  effects.  Thus,  it  is  a  prime  target  for  cyber  terrorism  as  well  as
criminal  acts.  The  IT  infrastructure  encompasses  not  only  the  best-known  uses  of
the  public  Internet—e-commerce,  communication,  and  Web  services—but  also  the
less  visible  systems  and  connections  of  the  Nation’s  critical  infrastructures  such  as
power  grids,  air  traffic  control  systems,  financial  systems,  and  military  and  intel-
ligence  systems.  The  growing  dependence  of  these  critical  infrastructures  on  the  IT
infrastructure means that the former cannot be secure if the latter is not.

Although current technical approaches address some of our immediate needs, they
do  not  provide  adequate  computer  and  network  security.  Fundamentally  different
architectures  and  technologies  are  needed  so  that  the  IT  infrastructure  as  a  whole
can become secure.

Historically, the Federal Government has played a vital, irreplaceable role in pro-
viding  support  for  fundamental,  long-term  IT  R&D,  generating  technologies  that
gave rise to the multi-billion-dollar IT industry. The PITAC’s review of current fed-
erally supported R&D in cyber security finds an imbalance, however, in the current
cyber  security  R&D  portfolio:  most  support  is  for  short-term,  defense-oriented  re-
search;  there  is  relatively  little  support  for  fundamental  research  to  address  the
larger  security  vulnerabilities  of  the  civilian  IT  infrastructure,  which  supports  de-
fense systems as well. Therefore, PITAC urges changes in the Federal Government’s
cyber security R&D portfolio to:

• Increase  federal  support  for  fundamental  research  in  civilian  cyber  security
by $90 million annually at NSF and by substantial amounts at agencies such
as  DARPA  and  DHS  to  support  work  in  10  high-priority  areas  identified  by
PITAC.

• Intensify  federal  efforts  to  promote  recruitment  and  retention  of  cyber  secu-
rity  researchers  and  students  at  research  universities,  with  an  aim  of  dou-
bling this profession’s numbers by the end of the decade.

• Provide  increased  support  for  the  rapid  transfer  of  federally  developed  cut-

ting-edge cyber security technologies to the private sector.

• Strengthen the coordination of the Interagency Working Group on Critical In-
formation  Infrastructure  Protection  and  integrate  it  under  the  Networking
and Information Technology Research and Development (NITRD) Program.

These  actions  will  lead  the  way  toward  improving  the  Nation’s  cyber  security,
thereby  promoting  the  security  and  prosperity  of  our  citizens.  We  would  be  pleased
to discuss this report with you and members of your Administration.

Sincerely,

Marc R. Benioff
PITAC Co-Chair

Edward D. Lazowska

PITAC Co-Chair

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix C

75

PITAC Executive Summary

(FROM FEBRUARY 2005 REPORT: CYBER SECURITY: A CRISIS OF PRIORITIZATION)
The information technology (IT) infrastructure of the United States, which is now
vital  for  communication,  commerce,  and  control  of  our  physical  infrastructure,  is
highly vulnerable to terrorist and criminal attacks. The private sector has an impor-
tant  role  in  securing  the  Nation’s  IT  infrastructure  by  deploying  sound  security
products and adopting good security practices. But the Federal Government also has
a  key  role  to  play  by  supporting  the  discovery  and  development  of  cyber  security
technologies  that  underpin  these  products  and  practices.  The  PITAC  finds  that  the
Federal Government needs to fundamentally improve its approach to cyber security
to fulfill its responsibilities in this regard.
Background

The Nation’s IT infrastructure has undergone a dramatic transformation over the
last decade. Explosive growth in the use of networks to connect various IT systems
has  made  it  relatively  easy  to  obtain  information,  to  communicate,  and  to  control
these systems across great distances. Because of the tremendous productivity gains
and  new  capabilities  enabled  by  these  networked  systems,  they  have  been  incor-
porated  into  a  vast  number  of  civilian  applications,  including  education,  commerce,
science  and  engineering,  and  entertainment.  They  have  also  been  incorporated  into
virtually  every  sector  of  the  Nation’s  critical  infrastructure—including  communica-
tions, utilities, finance, transportation, law enforcement, and defense. Indeed, these
sectors are now critically reliant on the underlying IT infrastructure.

At  the  same  time,  this  revolution  in  connectivity  has  also  increased  the  potential
of  those  who  would  do  harm,  giving  them  the  capability  to  do  so  from  afar  while
armed  with  only  a  computer  and  the  knowledge  needed  to  identify  and  exploit
vulnerabilities.  Today,  it  is  possible  for  a  malicious  agent  to  penetrate  millions  of
computers  around  the  world  in  a  matter  of  minutes,  exploiting  those  machines  to
attack the Nation’s critical infrastructure, penetrate sensitive systems, or steal valu-
able data. The growth in the number of attacks matches the tremendous growth in
connectivity, and dealing with these attacks now costs the Nation billions of dollars
annually. Moreover, we are rapidly losing ground to those who do harm, as is indi-
cated  by  the  steadily  mounting  numbers  of  compromised  networks  and  resulting  fi-
nancial losses.

Beyond economic repercussions, the risks to our nation’s security are clear. In ad-
dition to the potential for attacks on critical targets within our borders, our national
defense systems are at risk as well, because the military increasingly relies on ubiq-
uitous  communication  and  the  networks  that  support  it.  The  Global  Information
Grid  (GIG),  which  is  projected  to  cost  as  much  as  $100  billion  and  is  intended  to
improve military communications by linking weapons, intelligence, and military per-
sonnel  to  each  other,  represents  one  such  critical  network.  Since  military  networks
interconnect  with  those  in  the  civilian  sector  or  use  similar  hardware  or  software,
they  are  susceptible  to  any  vulnerability  in  these  other  networks  or  technologies.
Thus cyber security in the civilian and military sectors is intrinsically linked.

Although  the  large  costs  associated  with  cyber  insecurity  have  only  recently  be-
come  manifest,  the  Nation’s  cyber  security  problems  have  been  building  for  many
years  and  will  plague  us  for  many  years  to  come.  They  derive  from  a  decades-long
failure to develop the security protocols and practices needed to protect the Nation’s
IT infrastructure, and to adequately train and grow the numbers of experts needed
to  employ  those  mechanisms  effectively.  The  short-term  patches  and  fixes  that  are
deployed today can be useful in response to isolated vulnerabilities, but they do not
adequately  address  the  core  problems.  Rather,  fundamental,  long-term  research  is
required  to  develop  entirely  new  approaches  to  cyber  security.  It  is  imperative  that
we  take  action  before  the  situation  worsens  and  the  cost  of  inaction  becomes  even
greater.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

BIOGRAPHY FOR F. THOMSON LEIGHTON

Tom  Leighton  co-founded  Akamai  Technologies  in  September  1998.  Serving  as
Chief  Scientist,  Dr.  Leighton  is  Akamai’s  technology  visionary  as  well  as  a  key
member of the Executive Committee setting the company’s direction.

As  one  of  the  world’s  preeminent  authorities  on  algorithms  for  network  applica-
tions,  Dr.  Leighton’s  work  behind  establishing  Akamai  was  based  on  recognizing
that a solution to freeing up Web congestion could be found in applied mathematics
and  algorithms.  Akamai  has  demonstrated  this  through  the  creation  of  the  world’s
largest distributed computing platform that dynamically routes content and applica-
tions  across  a  network  of  over  15,000  servers.  Dr.  Leighton’s  technology  achieve-
ments  at  Akamai  earned  him  recognition  as  one  of  the  Top  10  Technology
Innovators in U.S. News & World Report.

A Professor of Applied Mathematics at MIT, he has served as the Head of the Al-
gorithms  Group  in  MIT’s  Laboratory  for  Computer  Science  since  its  inception  in
1996.

Dr.  Leighton  holds  numerous  patents  involving  cryptography,  digital  rights  man-
agement,  and  algorithms  for  networks.  During  the  course  of  his  career,  he  has
served  on  dozens  of  government,  industrial,  and  academic  review  committees;  pro-
gram  committees;  and  editorial  boards.  He  is  a  former  two-term  chair  of  the  2,000-
member Association of Computing Machinery Special Interest Group on Algorithms
and Complexity Theory, and a former two-term Editor-in-Chief of the Journal of the
ACM,  the  Nation’s  premier  journal  for  computer  science  research.  Dr.  Leighton  is
a  Fellow  for  the  American  Academy  of  Arts  and  Sciences,  and  is  currently  serving
as  Chair  of  the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC)
Subcommittee on Cyber Security. In 2004 he was elected into the National Academy
of Engineering for contributions to the design of networks and circuits and for tech-
nology for Web content delivery.

Dr.  Leighton  has  published  more  than  100  research  papers,  and  his  leading  text
on parallel algorithms and architectures has been translated into several languages.
In  2002,  Dr.  Leighton  was  recognized  by  his  alma  mater  as  Princeton  University’s
seventh  Gordon  Wu  Distinguished  Lecturer.  He  graduated  summa  cum  laude  from
Princeton  with  a  B.S.  in  Engineering.  He  received  his  Ph.D.  in  Mathematics  from
MIT.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Thank  you  very  much,  Dr.  Leighton,  and

your slides.

thank all of you.

Let me just clarify a couple of points, for openers.
We  are  not  suggesting  that  DARPA  is  anti-university  or  against
computer science, nor are we suggesting, Dr. Tether, that somehow
the  agency  is  going  in  the  wrong  direction  that  has  been  dragged
into the ground. What we are suggesting rather emphatically—and
there is more than one way to analyze the data—what we are sug-
gesting is that there has been a trend at DARPA over the last five
or  six  years  away  from  certain  kinds  of  research,  and  your  charts
verify  that.  And  Dr.  Wulf  and  Dr.  Leighton  pointed  that  out  in
their  testimony.  We  need  to  have  a  discussion  about  the  impact  of
that shift and what should be done about it across the Federal Gov-
ernment.  What  this  is  all  about,  what  we  hope  to  do,  is  come  rea-
sonably together about forging an overall policy, not about singling
out  a  particular  agency  which  has  a  long  and  distinguished  record
and sort of call the agency on the carpet.

But  I  am  concerned,  we  are  concerned  collectively  about  the
trends  short-term  versus  long-term.  Well,  we  will  go  beyond  that.
Dr.  Tether,  let  me  get  back  to  some  of  the  data  you  showed  in

I  think  we  can  have  a  good  debate  about  whether  DARPA  has
struck the right balance in its research. There really are two sides
to  that  issue,  and  it  is  a  question  of  balance  to  begin  with.  And  I

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

think  you  have  acknowledged  that.  But  we  ought  to  be  able  to
agree on the facts about what you are funding.

According  to  the  information  that  DARPA  itself  provided  the
Senate,  that  other  body,  as  we  refer  to  it  here  in  the  House,
DARPA’s  computer  science  funding  to  universities  dropped  by  50
percent  from  fiscal  year  2001  to  fiscal  year  2004.  The  charts  you
showed us talked about overall university funding, not just for com-
puter  science,  and  overall  computer  science  funding,  not  just  for
universities.  One  can  argue  that  the  decline  in  funding  for  univer-
sities  might  be  good  or  bad  or  indifferent,  but  do  you  acknowledge
that DARPA funding has shifted? And that is what we are talking
about, the shift in emphasis.

Dr.  TETHER.  Well,  the  shift  in  computer  science  at  DARPA  has
been towards the cognitive side, which, by the way, no one, I don’t
think,  anywhere  would  say  is  a  near-term  vision.  Cognitive  means
having  a  computer  that  basically  learns  your  habits  and  supports
you.  And  as  I  said,  Bill  Gates  said  in  response  to  the  kids  asking
why should we go into computer science and what other adventures
are  there,  that  if  we  can  make  a  computer  software  that  learns
that  it  will  have  the  value  of  more  than  10  Microsofts.  Now  that
is  a  big  deal.  So  yes,  we  did  shift.  We  shifted  into  that  area.  We
shifted away.

Now  let  me  say  one  thing  else  that  I  would  like  with  respect  to

what we are doing in cyber security.

The  incident  that  I  believe  Tom  was  talking  about  is  what  was
called  the  ‘‘slammer  worm,’’  which  basically,  in  about,  oh,  I  don’t
know,  10  minutes  compromised  over  90  percent  of  the  computers
on the Internet. Just two weeks ago, we built ourselves a computer
test  bed  comprised  of  several  hundreds  of  computers.  And  we  use
that  to  test  out  things.  Just  two  weeks  ago  on  that  computer  test
bed,  we  let  loose  a  worse-than-the-slammer  worm  and  stopped  it
cold. Now we also let it loose without having our new technique on
there, and it devastated that computer network in seconds.

Now this work, however, was classified. Now you might ask why
on  earth  would  we  have  that  classified.  Well,  first  of  all,  we  took
a worm that devastated the world and we mutated it into a bigger
worm. I wouldn’t want many people to know how to do that. Okay.
We  also  came  up  with  techniques  to  stop  that  worm,  but  we  are
still  not  done  with  those  techniques,  because  if  people  knew  what
the  technique  was,  they  could  design  around  it.  So  we  are  now  in
the  process  of  basically  that  red  team  and  blue  team  where  now
that  we  stopped  that  worm,  the  red  team  is  now  looking:  we  give
them  full  knowledge  of  the  technique.  They  are  trying  to  come  up
with  another  worm  that  can  destroy  that  technique,  and  so  forth
and so on.

And  that  is  why  we  are  keeping  it  classified  until  we  fully—we
understand  that  we  don’t  want  a  short-term  fix  like  he  talked
about.  We  want  to  find  the  fix  that  we  can  then  put  out  in  code
that  no  one  can  reverse-engineer  and  protect  the  commercial  mar-
ket.

Now  by  the  way,  just  as  an  aside,  all  of  that  was  done  through

your Rome labs. That was the executor of that——

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  They  are  our  Rome  labs.  I  want  you  to

have partial ownership, too.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

Dr. TETHER. I am sorry. I forgot. I am sorry. Our Rome labs.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  All  right.  Let  me  just  add,  look,  that  is  a
good story. And we all understand the need for classification. Good
gosh. Every——

Dr.  TETHER.  Well,  apparently  some  people  believe  that  if  it  is

classified it is not long-term research.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  All  right.  I  have  got—let  me  ask  Dr.  Wulf
and  Dr.  Leighton,  if  I  may,  to  consume  the  rest  of  my  time,  and
we will go to others for questions. Sort of comment on Dr. Tether’s
testimony.  He  is  skilled.  He  is  a  master  at  this.  And  why  don’t  I
look  about  the  rest  of  the  story?  And  if  you  want  to  give  a  plug  to
our Rome lab, I would be glad to hear from you.

Dr. WULF. I have not had a lot of dealings with Rome in the last
few  years,  but  I  had  a  lot  before  that.  We  had  some  joint  research
that we did with them, as a matter of fact.

The  problem  with  the  kind  of  approach  that  Dr.  Tether  is  point-
ing  out  is  that  at  any  given  point  in  time,  there  are  about  a  half
a  million  bugs  in  the  Windows  operation  system.  You  only  need
one—to exploit one—to be able to compromise a system. Simply re-
acting to the slammer or a mutated slammer, all you have done is
you  have  reacted  to  one  way  of  potentially  compromising  the  sys-
tem out of potentially a half a million others.

As  I  testified  before  this  committee  before,  we  will  not  have  se-
cure  computer  systems  based  on  the  current  models  of  security.
They  will  not  work.  They  will  always  have  this  problem.  They  are
perimeter  defense  models,  and  they  will  always  have  the  difficulty
that there is a way to penetrate the perimeter.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Dr. Leighton.
Dr.  LEIGHTON.  Yes.  Slammer  was  released  in  early  2003.  It  is
one  virus.  In  the  last  half  of  2004,  there  were  over  7,000  different
viruses released into the Internet. The slammer virus, of course, is
very  interesting.  It  was  not  designed  to  attack,  just  to  replicate
itself.  And  when  slammer  was  released,  actually  the  Defense  De-
partment  networks  were  the  second  most  impacted  network  in
terms of a failure to be able to route packets through the Internet.
If  the  research  on  defending  against  viruses  and  worms  is  classi-
fied,  that  means  that  it  won’t  be  of  use  to  the  government,  to  the
population,  and  to  enterprises,  and  we  will  be  defenseless  if,  in-
deed,  they  have  discovered  a  way  to  defend  networks  against  vi-
ruses  and  worms.  And  if  they  have,  I  would  be  very  interested  to
see that technology. And I think our government would be very in-
terested in having it deployed to protect ourselves. We are basically
defenseless today against viruses and worms.

Dr. TETHER. I agree, and I would be very happy to actually show
them what we are doing, but it does require classified information.
The slammer worm that was a—what we did with the mutation,
just  to  get  technical,  was  that  we  made  it  into  a  single  packet
worm so a signature detection couldn’t detect the worm. And it was
not just replicating.

We  also  did  the  hard  test.  We  had  an  insider.  In  other  words,
this worm was released into the network pretending that there was
somebody  inside  the  network  who  let  it  go.  So  it  wasn’t  coming
through  the  perimeter.  It  was  inside.  And  yeah,  he  is  right  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

that  is  the  harder  problem,  because  they  will  always  get  through
the perimeter.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  All  right.  Doctor,  my  time  is  up,  and  we
could engage you in a very interesting discussion, but to draw upon
my  passion,  baseball,  for  an  analogy,  you  are  looking  at  the  box
score,  Dr.  Tether,  and  you  are  talking  about  a  home-run,  and  boy,
we  all  applaud  that.  It  is  very  important.  But  what  about  the
Minor League system? And what about the rest of the system? And
if  we  are  not  investing  in  long-term  research,  if  the  trend  con-
tinues,  and  Dr.  Wulf  and  Dr.  Leighton  share  our  concern,  then  we
are not going to win championships in the future.

Dr. TETHER. I absolutely agree, and that is why I believe that we
really  need  to  concentrate  on  the  feedstock,  on  getting  those  kids
into  high  school  who  want  to  go  into  science  and  engineering.  And
if  we  can’t  do  that,  we  are  going  to  lose  the  ball  game,  because
there is going to be nobody in the minor leagues.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  You  know,  I  have  got  a  program  up  in
Rome  I  want  to  talk  to  you  about.  The  ACE  program,  Advanced
Course  in  Engineering.  If  you  haven’t  heard  about  it,  then  you
should  hear  about  it,  and  you  should  understand  what  we  are
doing with high school kids and college kids building that team.

But  my  time  long  ago  was  expired.  But  I  tried  to  follow  your

lead, Dr. Tether, so—Mr. Davis.

Mr. DAVIS. Chairman Boehlert, thanks very much.
DARPA,  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency.  That  is  a
pretty  powerful  name.  Indications  of  a  lot  of  good  things,  perhaps,
to happen. It started in 1958. The hopes, the funding of university
research, this is an area where they could reach out and find fund-
ing that could provide the dollars needed for the research that has
been  a  great  deal,  I  think,  for  Americans.  Certainly  it  has  helped
our  economy,  and  the  technology  today  that  we  see  occurring,  par-
tially,  and  perhaps  in  many  cases,  is  wholly  because  of  the  dollars
that we have given to our universities for the research.

The  question  is  for  Dr.  Marburger.  It  is  really  a  two-fold  ques-
tion.  Do  you  see  the  changing  mode  for  federal  support  as  a  prob-
lem  for  maintaining  a  robust  federal  research  investment  in  basic
computer  science  research  and  since  OSTP  is  charged  with  setting
overall  federal  research  priorities,  are  you  taking  any  steps  to  try
to  offset  the  effects  of  the  shift  in  funding  behavior  by  DARPA  by
encouraging  increased  support  by  other  civilian  and  federal  R&D
agencies,  such  as  the  Department  of  Energy  and  National  Insti-
tutes  of  Health  or  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Tech-
nology? Do I need to repeat those two questions?

Dr. MARBURGER. I think I can remember the gist of them.
Congressman,  the  fields  of  science  are  always  shifting,  and  of
course  the  shifting  fields,  where  the  work  is  done  and  the  specific
disciplines  that  are  involved  in  moving  ahead  the  frontiers  of
science  require  constant  attention.  That  is  why  we  have  a  new
budget  every  year.  We  try  to  make  budget  requests  that  request
funds for the agencies that we think are most appropriate for deliv-
ering  on  basic  research  and  applied  research  in  these  shifting
areas.

We  do  have  mechanisms  to  do  this.  We  coordinate  the  efforts  in
the  information  technology  area  through  a  robust  interagency

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

working  group  and  an  office,  a  national  office  for  the  National  In-
formation Technology R&D program.

I  mention  that  we  actually  move  to  begin  implementing  a  rec-
ommendation  from  the  PITAC  Subcommittee  on  Cyber  Security
even  before  the  report  came  out,  and  it  is  precisely  in  the  area  of
increased  coordination  among  different  agencies  that  we  began  to
act. I mentioned that in my testimony.

I  think  it  is  important  for  us  to  be  responsive  to  the  concerns
that  exist  in  the  community,  and  I  believe  we  have  the  apparatus
there  to  do  it.  It  is,  as  I  mentioned  before,  it  is  a  priority  for  the
Administration, and we are acting to address that priority through
our mechanisms.

Mr. DAVIS. Are you satisfied with the current priorities for basic

computer science research across different agencies?

Dr. MARBURGER. That is a hard question to answer, because I am
not  completely  aware  of  how  those  priorities  get  embedded  in  the
specific  programs  at  NSF,  for  example,  in  the  Department  of  En-
ergy  and  the  Department  of  Defense,  which  are  the  major  Depart-
ments  that  fund  this  kind  of  work.  They  are  certainly  concerned
about  it.  I  know  that,  because  we  talk  with  them  all  of  the  time,
they  have  strategies  for  dealing  with  their  mission  needs  in  each
of  the  areas  in  which  we  work  closely  with  them.  I  am  satisfied
that there is adequate attention being paid in the agencies for this.
Whether  we  are  able  to  get  the  funds  in  the  right  places  imme-
diately as soon as people would like to have them there is another
question.  It  is  obviously  in  a  rapidly-changing  environment.  We
can’t  always  move  immediately  to  get  the  funds  where  we  want
them.  I  do  believe  that  the  requests  that  are  made  in  the  Presi-
dent’s  budget  each  year  are  appropriate  for  the  levels  of  funding
overall that are required to address this problem.

Mr.  DAVIS.  My  time  is  about  to  expire,  but  let  me  reiterate  my
belief  that  one  of  the  reasons  that  we  have  the  strongest  economy
in the world today with perhaps less than five percent of the entire
population of the world, the reason that if someone gets in trouble,
the  911  number  they  call  is  really  USA,  is  that  we  have  provided
dollars for research and development and that much of that success
that we have has come from some of the research universities that
we  have  in  this  country.  And  it  is  my  hope  that  we  realize  from
the  Administration,  from  DARPA,  that  coordinated  effort  and  that
cooperation  and  the  funding  needs  to  continue  at  a  level  to  where
the  future  generations  will  see  the  America  that  we  see  it  today.
And  I  have  some  real  concerns  about  research  and  development
dollars. With all of the dollars that we spend, $2 trillion and some,
that  we  are  not  doing  enough  research  and  development.  And  I
think, excluding or using a part of the dollars in other areas, which
appears to be what is happening with DARPA, and removing those
dollars from our fine universities is probably not as wise a decision
as I would like to see us be making.

Thank you for your testimony.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  The  Chair  identifies  with  the  remarks  of

the distinguished gentleman.

Mr. Rohrabacher.
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Well, first of all, let me congratulate DARPA
for highlighting high school road warriors. I believe they are in my

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

district,  so  that  was  a  great  selection.  Also,  the  selection  of  your
site for your DARPA gathering in August happens to be very close
to  my  district,  and  hopefully  I  will  be  able  to  join  you  there,  so
thank you very much.

This is a little frustrating to me, because, to be quite frank, peo-
ple  can  use  pious  words  to  discuss  things,  and  it  sort  of  does  not
lead  to  a  better  understanding  of  what  the  reality  is.  It  seems  to
me  what  we  have  here  is  not  a  decline  in  money  for  research  for
computers.  I  mean,  Dr.  Tether  was  very  clear,  the  amount  of
money being spent for research on computers is actually on the up-
ward  trend.  The  question  is  whether  we  should  channel  the
amount  of  money  that  is  being  spent  on  research  into  esoteric
projects  in  the  universities  that  may  or  may  not  ever  come  to  fru-
ition  and  help  anybody  versus  actually  spending  money  in  devel-
oping  ways  to  make  sure  people’s  lives  are  changed  and  bettered
within a lifetime at least.

You  know,  when  I  first  became  the  Chairman  of  the  Sub-
committee  on  Energy  and  Environment  Research,  we  had  to  take
a look at what was actually getting done with the amount of money
that we were spending. And of course, nobody ever wants to try to
prioritize  around  here  and  say  what  isn’t  working.  They  always
want to say, ‘‘Give more money to us and we will, you know, spend
it wisely,’’ I guess. And I found out that we have been spending all
kinds of money in various areas, but one area really stood out, and
there  had  never  been  anything  demonstrated  that  the  money  had
been actually put to use for our benefit yet. And that was in fusion
research.  It  seemed  to  me,  after  looking  at  that  program,  that  we
were  spending  more  and  more  and  more  money  over  the  years  in
fusion  research.  We  have  spent,  I  think,  billions  of  dollars,  but  we
didn’t  have  anything  to  show  for  it  after  20  years.  Now  is  it  inac-
curate  then  to  say  if  the  Administration  or  someone  would  say,
‘‘Well, we should channel that money someplace else where it is ac-
tually being put to use that we are spending less money on energy
research’’? No. In fact, we weren’t.

And  let  me  get  to  the  specifics  on  this.  What  I  see  this  as,  and
what,  Mr.  Chairman,  what  I  have  seen  today,  in  terms  of  the  cen-
tral  argument,  is  whether  or  not  money  should  be  spent  on  basic
and  fundamental  research  that  may  never  come  to  fruition  or
should we actually start channeling a little bit more of that money
into  developing  the  research  necessary  to  develop  some  of  these
ideas  that  have  been  discovered  through  research  in  the  past  so
that  it  actually  changes  our  life  somewhat.  And  I  have  no  argu-
ment  whatsoever  with  the  approach  that  this  Administration  and
Dr. Tether are taking, and I would congratulate them. I am the fa-
ther  of  triplets,  and  they  are  one  year  and  two  weeks  old  today,
and I think what you are doing is long-term, because what you are
doing  is  going  to  make  their  lives  better.  And  just  channeling
money, more and more money, into esoteric research at the univer-
sity is not necessarily going to make their lives better.

And I thank you for that. And I can see that you are taking heat
for  it,  Dr.  Tether,  today,  and  I  want  you  to  know  that  some  of  us
understand  that  you  are  making  very,  very  positive  and,  I  would
say, common sense decisions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

With  that  said,  let  me  ask  you  about  this.  You  were  talking
about  computers,  and  that  is  supposedly  why  we  are  here  today.
You  were  actually  criticizing;  I  will  have  to  tell  you,  fellows,  you
have sort of a critical tone to your voice when Dr. Tether is talking
about  the  research  that  he  is  doing,  because  after  all,  there  are  so
many  other  areas.  Isn’t  it  better  for  him  to  be  doing  this  research
to  try  to  fight—if  he  can’t  fight  it  for  everything,  isn’t  it  good  for
him to find some sort of shield against a limited number of worms,
even  though  there  might  be  7,000  other  worms  that  he  isn’t  tack-
ling?

Dr. WULF. No.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  It  is  not?  It  is  better  for  us  to  spend  the
money  on  some  guy  who  is  doing  research  that  may  or  may  not
ever be applied anywhere?

Dr.  WULF.  I  would  be  happy  to  get  you  references.  I  don’t  have
them  on  the  top  of  my  head,  but  there  have  been  any  number  of
economic studies of what the social rate of return on investment in
long-term  basic  research  is,  and  they  tend  to  run  in  numbers  like
80  percent  per  year  compounded.  Okay.  Yes,  it  is  absolutely  true.
Long-term  basic  research  is  risky.  It,  by  definition,  is  risky.  We
don’t know what we don’t know. Nonetheless, we wouldn’t have the
Internet,  and  we  wouldn’t  have  a  lot  of  other  very  practical  things
had we not invested in that kind of long-term basic research.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Didn’t DARPA have something to do with the

Internet?

Dr. WULF. It absolutely did.
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Right.
Dr. WULF. That was back in the days when they invested in peo-

ple rather than projects.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Let  me  ask,  Dr.  Tether.  You  just  heard  that
big  challenge  there.  The  Internet.  These  guys  are  taking  credit  for
long-term  research  money  that  was  spent  probably,  what,  I  don’t
know—there  was  a  lot  of  other  money  that  was  spent  at  the  uni-
versities that never saw the light of day, but can we say that it was
the basic research and not DARPA’s developmental dollars that can
be given credit for the Internet?

Dr.  TETHER.  Actually,  there  is  probably  enough  credit  for  every-

body, but let me tell you——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay.
Dr. TETHER. Let me tell you, the way I understood it is that real-
ly  what  brought  around  the  Internet  was  that  at  that  time  com-
puters  were  very  small.  I  mean,  they  were  not  very  powerful,  and
the  idea  was,  ‘‘Well,  maybe  we  could  net  them  together.’’  And  by
netting them together, you get more out of them than just one com-
puter. So a network was really created. This was a product. It was
to  put  together  computers,  because  we  had  problems  to  solve  like
air defense and so forth and so on.

Along  with  putting  those  computers  together,  the  researchers
were around the country. And some of them said, ‘‘You know what,
I  will  just  leave  a  message  for  that  fellow,  because  he  is  on  the
West Coast, and he will pick it up in the morning.’’ And that really
was the genesis of e-mail. It wasn’t that somebody was being fund-
ed  to  create  e-mail,  it  was  a  fallout  out  of  a  product,  out  of  a  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

gram  that  was  a  development  of  making  computers  be  netted  to-
gether.

The  same  thing  goes  on  today.  I  will  go  back  to  what  we  are
doing  today  in  computer  science,  and  we  are  doing  the  cognitive
computing,  which  is  really  so  far  out,  you  know.  It  is  amazing  to
have these people say that this is near-term. I mean, I——

Mr. ROHRABACHER. I would agree with that. I mean, I have—Mr.
Chairman, I want to emphasize that point. To suggest that the cog-
nitive research and computers is short-term development——

Dr.  TETHER.  Well,  they  can  have  their  opinion  that  maybe  the
money  shouldn’t  go  into  cognitive  research,  that  it  ought  to  go
someplace  else,  as  you  said,  but  to  say  that  cognitive  research  is
not  short-term,  and  to  say  that  if  we  can  do  it,  it  is  not  a  major
economic impact, I think is wrong.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman BOEHLERT. The gentleman’s time has expired.
Mr. Matheson.
Mr. MATHESON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
And  I  want  to  thank  the  Committee.  It  has  been  a  very  inter-

esting hearing.

Dr. Wulf, I wanted to ask you a question. You testified before the
Science Committee on cyber security issues in October of 2001. And
at  the  time,  you  appeared  to  be  worried  about  these  issues.  And
you  said  that—and  I  am  going  to  quote  you.  You  said,  ‘‘Our  re-
search  base  in  computer  security  and  network  security  is  minus-
cule.’’ And you also said that there has never been a funding agen-
cy  that  believed  that  it  was  its  responsibility  to  develop  the  com-
munity  of  scholars  researching  this  area  and  that  because  the  re-
sources  are  so  scarce,  the  community  gets  very  conservative,  lead-
ing  to  what  you  called  the  Maginot  Line  model  for  cyber  security.

Dr. WULF. The Maginot Line, yes, sir.
Mr.  MATHESON.  Maginot.  Sorry.  Now  approaching  four  years
since  you  made  that  statement  to  this  committee,  how  do  you  feel
today?  Are  you  more  upbeat  about  the  state  of  cyber  security  re-
search  at  academic  institutions?  And  have  there  been  any  positive
changes  in  this  regard?  And  what  do  you  see  as  the  remaining
challenges in this area?

Dr. WULF. Let us see. Thanks to this committee, Chairman Boeh-
lert,  there  has  been  an  increased  emphasis  on  computer  security.
Again, I am talking about long-term basic research, because I don’t
believe  that  the  fundamental  model  that  we  are  currently  using
will  ever  produce  secure  systems,  so  we  do  really  need  the  disrup-
tive idea, the rethinking of the basics. As a consequence, there has
been  more  money  at  NSF.  NSF,  under  its  current  Assistant  Direc-
tor,  has  taken  on  that  responsibility.  Sure,  he  could  use  more
money and that sort of thing, but the fact that they have taken on
that responsibility, I think, is a very positive step forward.

It  is  still  the  case,  unfortunately,  that  the  research  community,
the collection of scholars, is still minuscule. When we testified here,
what,  three  years  ago  now,  four  years  ago,  good  heavens,  we  had
an  estimate  that  the  number  of  Ph.D.s  being  produced  per  year
was seven. We have done some counting since then. The estimates
now  are  maybe  20.  But  it  is  still  an  incredibly  small  community.
The  largest  conference  in  computer  graphics  attracts  about  50,000

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

people.  The  largest  conference  in  computer  security  attracts  about
200. So it is still a very, very small community. And the argument
I  made  then,  and  I  would  make  again,  is  there  ought  to  be  more
money, but actually the most important thing is predictability.

As  I  said  in  my  testimony  today,  academics  make  their  reputa-
tion  in  a  career  over  decades.  And  if  there  is  not  some  reasonable
assurance  that  money  will  be  there  over  that  period  of  time,  they
will run.

Mr. MATHESON. Let me ask you, what are your views on the rec-
ommendations  of  the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory
Committee report on cyber security?

Dr.  WULF.  I  am  very  pleased  with  the  recommendations  that
they  made.  In  fact,  I  think  there  was  only  one  that  wasn’t  really
directly  in  my  testimony  of  2001,  and  that  was  for  more  coordina-
tion among the agencies involved, and that is obviously a very good
idea.

Mr.  MATHESON.  In  terms  of  that  coordination,  how  do  you  see

that being improved, or who should be responsible for that?

Dr.  WULF.  You  know,  the  only  way  that  really  ever  works  is  if
all  of  the  agencies  see  something  in  it  for  themselves.  When  we
structured  the  High  Performance  Computing  and  Communication
Initiatives  in  the  late  ’80s  and  early  ’90s,  we  crafted  a  way  to  find
a  special  niche  for  each  of  the  agencies  involved  and  gave  them  a
responsibility for that. I think a similar sort of thing would be real-
ly advantageous here.

Mr. MATHESON. I think this issue is not going away.
Dr. WULF. No. No.
Mr.  MATHESON.  I  would  like  to  think  that  this  committee  would
continue  to  have  great  interest  in  what  we  can  do  to  improve  ef-
forts for cyber security.

With  that,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  will  yield  back  the  balance  of  my

time.

Chairman BOEHLERT. I think it is difficult for Dr. Marburger, for
example,  to  respond  to  the  question  from  Mr.  Davis,  I  mean  be-
cause  of  his  position  and  everything.  But  I  have  to  believe,  in  his
heart  of  hearts,  I  have  to  believe  all  of  the  people  involved  in  the
science  enterprise  within  the  federal  establishment  are  not  satis-
fied  with  our  investment  in  the  science  enterprise  within  the  gov-
ernment.  I  don’t  expect  you  to  respond  to  that.  And  boy,  I  would
be  the  most  surprised  guy  in  the  world  if  you  could  find  anybody
employed  by  the  U.S.  Government  in  a  position  of  responsibility
who can, with a straight face, say, ‘‘We are putting enough empha-
sis on the challenges in the area of cyber security.’’

And  so  Dr.  Wulf,  thank  you  so  much.  We  have  been  talking
about  this  for  years.  And  seven  to  20  is  a  big  percentage  increase,
but  boy  oh  boy,  that  is  not  nearly  adequate  to  meet  the  challenge.
With  that,  the  Chair  recognizes  the  very  distinguished  Vice

Chairman of the Science Committee, Mr. Gutknecht.

Mr.  GUTKNECHT.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I
am  not  sure  I  deserve  that,  but  I  do  want  to  thank  the  panelists
for  coming  today.  This  has  been  a  fascinating  discussion.  Espe-
cially, Dr. Tether, I loved your slide presentation. I only wish more
Members  of  Congress  could  get  a  chance  to  see  that.  I  have  been
an admirer of DARPA for a very long time, and I think part of the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

reason  was  expressed  by  my  colleague  from  California,  and  that  is
that  it  is  very  much  a  results-oriented  endeavor.  And  I  suspect  at
some  level  that  does  cause  conflict  among  various  academicians.  I
mean,  they  all  have  their  own  points  of  view  in  areas  that  they
would like to pursue, but ultimately, I think DARPA is very much
results-oriented.  And  I  think  that  that  is  something  that  at  least
many of us on this committee appreciate.

Let  me  just  add  a  little  bit  of  grist  to  the  mill  here  in  terms  of
this  whole  discussion.  I  wouldn’t  call  it  a  debate  or  even  an  argu-
ment,  but  a  discussion  about  computer  sciences.  I  think  an  impor-
tant element that could have been included in your presentation is
how  the  cost  of  computing  systems,  particularly  supercomputers,
have  come  down  just  dramatically.  Just  last  week,  I  toured  the
supercomputer center inside the Mayo research facility at the Mayo
Clinic  in  Rochester,  Minnesota.  They  already  have  one  supercom-
puter,  and  they  are  in  the  process  now  of  acquiring  and  building
what  they  believe  will  be  the  14th  fastest  computer  in  the  world.
And  the  cost,  I  don’t  want  to  quote  it,  but  it  seemed  to  me  infini-
tesimally  smaller  than  the  supercomputers  that  I  saw  just  eight
years ago at the University of Minnesota.

Another  point  I  wanted  to  make,  and  as  I  say,  I  am  not  sure  I
have  a  good  question  here,  but  a  couple  of  comments.  One  of  the
things that you had in your presentation, and I have been meeting
with some scientists who have been working with the University of
Minnesota on this whole issue of photonics. Now it is way over my
head,  but  they  put  it  in  language  good  enough  that  I  could  under-
stand  most  of  what  they  were  talking  about.  And  I  do  hope  it  is
something  that  DARPA  will  take  very  seriously,  because  I  think
there  are  enormous  possibilities  of  this  particular  technology,  as-
suming the physics is what they think it is, not only from a defense
standpoint  but  I  think  from  an  economic  standpoint.  As  I  listened
to their presentation, my eyes started to spin at all of the possibili-
ties.

Finally, though, and I think this is a comment for all of you, and
perhaps  you  want  to  comment  on  this,  I  am  particularly  pleased
with  this  thing  we  call  the  Grand  Challenge.  And  I  really  want  to
encourage  all  agencies,  all  science  agencies,  and  all  universities  to
look  for  ways  to  encourage,  principally,  I  would  say,  high  school
students  and  their  science  and  math  and  physics  teachers  to  get
more involved in these kinds of endeavors, because I think if there
is  one  thing  we  need  more  of  in  the  United  States  today,  it  is  to
get  young  people  actively  engaged  in  science  projects.  And  so  I
think  the  Grand  Challenge  is  a  very  important  first  step,  but  I
hope  it  is  not  the  last  step.  I  hope  we  look  for  other  ways  to  bring
young  people  into  this  and  get  them  excited  about  using  some  of
the  things  that  they  learn  in  their  classes  in  science  and  physics
and others.

So not so much a question in any of that, but a comment. If you

want to respond, you are more than welcome.

Dr.  WULF.  I  would  just  say  I  couldn’t  agree  more  with  your  last
point  about  the  Grand  Challenge.  It  just  so  happens  that,  I  think,
about five or six years ago DARPA asked the Academy of Engineer-
ing  to  do  a  study  on  these  so-called  ‘‘inducement  prizes.’’  This  was
before they had received the authority to do that sort of thing. We

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

did  that  study,  and  I  became  totally  enamored  of  this  as  a  way  of
provoking  certain  kinds  of  behavior.  One  of  the  things  we  learned,
for  example,  that  the  typical  winning  team  spends  more  money  to
win  than  they  actually  make  with  the  prize.  They  are  really  after
the bragging rights, not the money. And in fact, I liked it so much
that I have, I think, talked a foundation into funding the Academy
to do an inducement prize in the general area of sustainable devel-
opment. And in fact, the first one we are doing is a contest like the
contest  that  DARPA  is  doing  on  inexpensive  removal  of  arsenic
from  drinking  water,  one  of  the  real  banes  of  existence  of  people
around the world.

Dr.  LEIGHTON.  I  would  also  like  to,  you  know,  second  your  rec-

ommendation.

As  a  high  school  student,  I  was  an  active  participant  in  science

fairs and so forth and it made a big impact on my career.

I  would  also  like  to  mention  that  you  mentioned  the  decreasing
costs  of  the  computing  infrastructure,  which  has  been  vital  to  our
economy. That is featured in the historic role of federally-supported
R&D  in  creating  billion-dollar  segments  of  the  IT  industry.  Pro-
grams  like  VLSI  design,  RISC  processors,  parallel  computing  and
databases  are  critical  to  being  able  to  lower  the  cost  of  computing.
And university-sponsored basic research played a vital role in actu-
ally making that possible.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much.
The gentleman’s time has expired.
Mr. Sherman.
Mr.  SHERMAN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It  won’t  surprise  you
if  my  questioning  focuses  on  DARPA  and  other  U.S.  Government
efforts  that  will  lead,  whether  they  are  intended  to  or  not,  to  self-
aware computers equaling or exceeding human intelligence. We are
funding  here  an  all-out  effort  to  develop  all  kinds  of  new  and  ad-
vanced computer technology. However, I think we are maybe a cou-
ple  of  decades  away  from  computers  that  are  self-aware,  inde-
pendent,  and  deserving  of  a  minimum  wage.  We  are  funding  all  of
the  technology  to  do  more,  and  we  refuse,  as  a  Committee  and  as
a Congress, to fund any research into do we want to develop a new
independent  intelligent  lifeform  on  this  planet.  And  secondly,  we
don’t fund any research into how to prevent the computers that we
are developing from self-awareness, independent motivation, or de-
sire to go on strike for an even higher wage.

Now  I  have  had  a  lot  of  correspondence  with  Dr.  Tether,  where
he has assured me that all of this is just vague science fiction. But
I would say that rare is it in science that our research exactly goes
to  where  we  were  aiming.  Often,  we  do  less,  we  do  more,  and  we
do  something  different.  And  with  science,  it  shouldn’t  surprise  us
at all if we hit something close to the target.

So let us take a look at the target. Now I get these letters saying
not to worry, we are not really trying to do this. And then 10 min-
utes  ago,  my  staff  looked  at  your  web  page  saying  that  it  is  your
mission to develop a computer that knows what it is doing, will be
able  to  reason,  will  learn  from  their  experience,  be  capable  of  ex-
plaining  themselves  and  talking  naturally,  or  taking  naturally-ex-
pressed  direction,  and  will  be  aware  of  themselves  and  able  to  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

flect  on  their  own  behavior.  In  other  words,  you  are  talking  about
a computer considerably smarter than my last opponent.

We are in the spin business. I know that the Administration and
the  science  establishment  doesn’t  want  to  fund  research  into
whether we should create what I would refer to loosely as a silicon-
based  intelligent  lifeform  and  does  not  even  want  to  research  the
much  more  technical  issue  of  how  we  develop  higher  and  higher
levels  of  computer  capacity  while  deliberately  engineering  devices
to  make  sure  that  we  do  not  create  self-awareness.  I  would  point
out  that  many  of  those  who  have  thought  about  the  issue  of  when
will  we  know  that  computers  deserve  the  minimum  wage  have  de-
scribed it as when you can have an e-mail conversation with a com-
puter  and  not  know  whether  you  are  talking  to  a  computer  or  a
human  being.  And  DARPA’s  mission  statement  says  you  are  aim-
ing for computers that will be capable of explaining themselves and
taking naturally-expressed direction.

So  when  you  are  dealing  with  Sherman  with  his  concerns  that
you  wish  to  allay,  I  get  a  letter  saying  not  to  worry.  But  when  I
look on your web page it is with the intention of developing a com-
puter that will pass the test put forward by some as to when com-
puters equal human intelligence, and that is to have a natural con-
versation,  and  as  I  say,  able  to  reason,  learn  from  their  experi-
ences,  capable  of  explaining  themselves,  aware  of  themselves,  and
able to reflect on their own behavior. How many of us in this room
could  ask  more  of  ourselves  than  to  be  self-aware  and  reflective?
Will DARPA fund research, at least into how to prevent a computer
with enormous computational capacities from achieving self-aware-
ness and self-direction?

Dr. TETHER. Well, that might be one of those good university pro-

grams.

Mr. SHERMAN. How confident are you that if I support this effort

that research with that as a goal will be funded?

Dr.  TETHER.  You  know,  when  you  sent  your  letter  to  me  last
year, I thought it was actually, quite frankly, a very thoughtful let-
ter.  I  thought  you  brought  up  some  good  points.  I  didn’t  try  to  be
flip  in  answering  your  letter.  In  the  ’50s,  about  50  years  ago,
Turing came up with a test, and it was called the Turing Test, and
that  was  if  you  could  talk  on  the  phone  or  whatever  your  mode  of
communication was and couldn’t tell that it wasn’t a machine, then
it  was  alive,  or  artificial  intelligence.  That  was  the  term.  And  in
fact,  that  has  been  reached  in  a  few  cases,  but  when  it  has  been
reached, it has always been reached in a very narrow domain. You
know, in fact, if you go on the phone company now and ask for in-
formation,  you  will  most  certainly  be  talking  to  a  computer,  and
you  can  actually  ask  a  lot  of  questions  and  get  a  lot  of  answers,
as  long  as  you  can  keep  your  conversation  restricted  to  that  do-
main.

Will  we  ever  get  to  the  point  that—and  I  believe  that  we  are
going  to  have  computers  that  are  going  to  be  very  good  in  special-
ized domains, you know—that we’ll actually be able to, in a special-
ized  domain,  communicate  with  a  person  in  a  way  where  the  per-
son  might  not  realize  that  he  is  really  talking  to  a  machine?  But
the  difference  between  that  and  a  human  is  that  a  human  can
learn  something  in  an  area  and  then  be  subjected  to  a  whole  new

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

area  that  he  has  never  been  and  be  able  to  use  that  knowledge
from  that  other  area  in  a  way  that  is  mysterious.  But  that  seems
to be the difference between these computers that we are trying to
build  and  a  human  being,  that  we  can  learn  something  and  go  to
a  brand  new  area,  never  having  been  there,  and  project  somehow,
that information.

I guess that is why I said earlier that I couldn’t believe that any-
body would call cognitive processing near-term. It is most certainly
not.  But  it  is  important  for  the  Department  of  Defense,  in  fact,  it
is  probably  important  for  the  U.S.  economy,  to  be  able  to  get  that
capability.

For  the  Department  of  Defense,  it  is  important  for  the  following

reasons. Let us go to network security.

If you go to an area, you will find that the reason that networks
are  vulnerable  are  usually  because  people  don’t  put  them  together
correctly. When they set them up, they make an error. They make
a mistake. And what you really want to have is a computer system
that can do that for you.

Mr.  SHERMAN.  Dr.  Tether,  I  haven’t  even  questioned  whether
cognitive  reasoning  and  incredible  computational  capacity  and  all
of  the  ability  to  reason  in  a  computer  would  not  be  an  incredibly
valuable  thing  for  our  country,  for  our  world,  and  for  our  Defense
Department. What I have asked you, though, is two questions. Will
you  fund  research  into  how  to  make  sure  that  no  matter—I  will—
make  sure  is  too  strong  of  a  word,  how  to  increase  the  likelihood
that  a  computer  with  tremendous  cognitive  ability,  if  you  want  to
use  that  term,  a  tremendous  computational  ability  does  not  have
self-awareness, self-direction, and that is the one question?

Dr. TETHER. I will tell you what I will do. Quite frankly, I think
it  is  an  interesting  question.  I  will,  and  I  believe  it  actually  is  one
of  these  questions  that  somewhere  in  the  university  we  ought  to
have that done. Yes, I will.

Mr. SHERMAN. Thank you.
Dr.  TETHER.  We  will  see  what  happens.  It  will  be  interesting  to.
I will try to formulate that question in a way that I—it is a little—
I must admit, it is a little counterculture for us to say, ‘‘Tell us how
to  not  do  this,’’  but  that  is  an  interesting  question.  And  I  will  try
to—I will do that. I will——

Mr.  SHERMAN.  The  engineers  that  developed  engines  developed

governors and developed brakes.

Dr. TETHER. They did. They did.
Mr. SHERMAN. And you wouldn’t want to be an automotive engi-

neer without knowing how to——

Dr. TETHER. I promise you, I will do it. I will——
Mr. SHERMAN. Thank you.
Dr.  TETHER.  At  least  I  will  make  an  attempt  to  have  somebody

do it for us. Okay.

Mr.  SHERMAN.  Thank  you.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you.
The gentleman’s time has expired.
Ms. Biggert.
Ms. BIGGERT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I think I will go back to computer science in general.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

But  how  can  we  determine  if  federal  funding  is  adequate?  Dr.
Marburger,  you  mentioned  a  33  percent  drop  in  DARPA’s  funding
in  NITRD.  Was  there  debate  over  whether  that  was  appropriate?
And  do  other  agencies  need  to  pick  up  the  slack?  And  are  they
doing so?

Dr.  MARBURGER.  The  NITRD  budget  is  a  composite  of  budgets
from  each  of  the  agencies,  and  we  only  get  the  information  about
these  numbers  after  the  budget  is  already  out.  We  do  produce  a
supplementary report associated with the budget request each year
that has these numbers in it, but they are a composite of decisions
that are made in the agencies.

Now  when  we  see  the  amounts  that  are  actually  out  there,  then
we  bring  the  agencies  together,  through  the  coordinating  commit-
tees  that  we  have,  and  discuss  what  the  significance  is  of  these
numbers,  and  try  to  identify  holes  and  strategies  for  making  the
requests in the following budget year. That is how it works.

So  that  obviously  leaves  room  for  fluctuations  in  programs  that
are  unexpected.  But  in  general,  we  try  to  have  communication
among  the  agencies  so  that  they  are  aware  of  impacts  of  decisions
that one agency might take on the others.

Ms.  BIGGERT.  Well,  but  then  you  see  the  numbers  and  see  that
DARPA  has  dropped  their  funding.  Is  that  a  problem,  or  do  other
agencies  then  up  the  amount  of  money  that  they  are  going  to  put
into something?

Dr.  MARBURGER.  We  have  conversations  all  of  the  time  about
how  the  agencies  will  fulfill  their  missions  and  the  priorities  that
they establish for them. I am going to ask Dr. Tether to say a word
about that at this point.

Dr.  TETHER.  Let  me  first  say  that  Dr.  Marburger  does  a  great
job.  You  know,  he  calls  us  into  hearings,  and  sometimes  we  say,
‘‘oh,  we  are  busy,’’  and  he  says,  ‘‘There  is  still  going  to  be  a  hear-
ing,’’  and  we  do  eventually  go.  And  we  talk.  And  we  do  do  a  lot  of
talking. He really does a great job.

Now  on  the  budget  that  he  is  talking  about,  unfortunately,  it  is
not  really  fair  to  say  that  we  dropped  IT  that  much  because  it  is
an accounting problem. The way the crosscuts are, the money that
we  put  into  cyber  security,  for  example,  which  are  all  IT,  are  not
included  in  that  cut,  because  it  is  included  in  another  OMB  cut.
The amount of money that we put into microelectronics and things
like  spintronics,  which  is  making  the  brand  new  memories  for  the
future, which again you would think would be IT, are not included
in that number he gave, because it is another OMB cut, and OMB
did not want us to take the same dollar and have it show up three
places.  And  so  unfortunately,  what  you  have  is  a  decrease,  which
if I were to add all of the IT that I also provide to these other two
organizations, they would not—it would not have shown that much
of a drop.

Ms.  BIGGERT.  But  was  that  in  the  previous  year?  I  mean,  if  you
have a drop there, with the dollars that you have got in that fund-
ing, it still is a drop. Something has been cut out of it.

Dr.  TETHER.  Well,  the  problem  is  that  the  comparison  is  over
years where these other programs are brand new programs, so they
wouldn’t  have  appeared  in  the  first  category.  I  really  can’t  say.  I
am  trying  to  actually,  because  of  this  controversy  over  this  drop,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

do  exactly  what  you  are  asking,  try  to  get  a  true  apples-to-apples
comparison,  forget  what  OMB  tells  us  to  do,  God  bless  us,  you
know, but we will add up——

Chairman BOEHLERT. I wish you had that luxury.
Dr.  TETHER.  We  will  add  up  IT  apples  to  apples  and  see  what
it  turns  out  to  be.  But,  by  the  way,  we  have  lots  of  conversations
about  this  subject.  And  I  wish  we  knew,  I  wish  we  had  an  algo-
rithm out of which would spit out exactly how much funding should
go  into  a  particular  discipline.  I  mean,  I  really  wish  we  had  that.

Ms. BIGGERT. Will you make that available to us, then?
Dr. TETHER. Yes, I will.
Ms. BIGGERT. Thank you.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you.
Ms. Jackson Lee.
Ms. JACKSON LEE. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. This is
an  important  hearing,  as  a  number  of  our  hearings  have  been,  as
we have focused on some of the deficiencies in the oversight respon-
sibilities that we have.

I  would  like  to  focus  my  remarks,  and  I  would  ask  unanimous
consent, Mr. Chairman, to put my total opening statement into the
record.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Without objection, so ordered.
Ms. JACKSON LEE. Thank you.
I  would  like  to  just  focus  my  remarks  on  the  perception  that  I
have, and that is that we are in trouble, frankly, and I am not sure
if  we  are  going  to  dig  ourselves  out  of  the  hole.  I  think  we  are  in
trouble because we are not creating a legion, an army of new tech-
nocrats. I recall some years ago when every graduating senior was
talking about being a computer scientist. Unfortunately, the thrust
of that computer scientist or doing computer work was working on
computers.  It  really  had  nothing  to  do  with  creating  new  tech-
nologies.  It  certainly  had  nothing  to  do  with  software  technology,
which  at  that  time  we  were  very  proud  to  have  focused  in  the  Sil-
icon  Valley.  Even  now,  we  are  draining  the  resources  out  of  that
particular  region,  and  much  of  our  work  is  finding  itself  offshore
in places like China.

I  happen  to  be  holistically  concerned  about  the  world’s
upliftment,  but  I  would  also  argue  that  it  has  always  been  the
United States’ ability to survive to be at the cutting-edge.

I  cite  as  a  premise,  or  one  of  my  premises,  the  work  of  Vinton
Cerf  and  Robert  Kahn  that  was  noted  in  ‘‘An  Endless  Frontier
Postponed,’’  in  Science,  Volume  308,  May  6,  2005.  It  specifically
notes  that  in  June,  these  scientists  will  receive  the  A.M.  Turing
Award  from  the  Association  for  Computing  Machinery  based  upon
their creation in 1973 of the language of the Internet. Where would
we  be  if  we  did  not  have  the  language  of  the  Internet?  Twenty
years  later,  the  Mosaic  web  browser  gave  the  Internet  its  public
face.  This,  of  course,  had  some  basis  in  our  public  funding.  And  of
course,  DARPA  was  organized—it  funded  TCP,  but  the  Soviet  sat-
ellite Sputnik in 1957 led to the creation of DARPA, a very impor-
tant  agency,  and  it  has  been  on  the  cutting-edge.  U.S.  IT  research
grew  largely  under  DARPA  and  the  National  Science  Foundation.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

So if we are underfunding our university research, and I cite for
you  the  numbers  that  may  have  already  been  cited,  but  I  want
them  in  the  record.  Between  fiscal  year  2001  to  fiscal  year  2004,
DARPA  support 
for  university-based,  non-classified  research
dropped  by  order  of  40  percent  from  $214  million  to  $123  million.
The  Internet  research  that  these  two  gentlemen  will  be  honored
for,  as  I  understand,  was  not  military-classified  research,  and
therefore, here lies my angst.

If  you  look  at  the  number  of  potential  scientists  in  this  area  or
in  the  area  of  physics,  chemistry,  and  other  areas,  we  know  that
our numbers are going drastically down. We also know that we are
suffering because of a lack of technology. I will give you one exam-
ple. In talking about securing America and cargo screening, simple
screening  of  cargo  in  airplanes,  right  now  we  screen  every  single
suitcase of a traveling passenger on an airplane. We do not screen
cargo.  That  raises  a  great  outcry,  and  of  course,  the  easy  response
is,  ‘‘Go  screen  cargo.’’  It  makes  sense.  But  in  fact,  we  don’t  have
the technology to be able to screen cargo. A sad state of affairs.

In  fact,  I  think  the  very  infrastructure  and  underpinnings  of
Homeland  Security  is  technology.  One,  when  we  speak  about  im-
proving  our  security  at  the  borders,  we  talk  about  technology,  the
new  types  of  screening  technology.  When  we  talk  about  securing,
if you will, various documents, we talk about cyber security and the
vulnerability of that.

So  my  general  question  would  be  aren’t  we  in  a  mess.  And  how
do  we  get  out  of  that  mess?  Where  are  the  advocacy  groups  to  de-
mand?  You  know,  the  National  Science  Foundation  has  its  public
underpinnings,  fearful  of  any  misstatements  to  go  contrary  to  Ad-
ministration policies, no matter what the Administration might be.
It  might  be  Democrat  or  Republican  or  otherwise.  Where  are  the
voices  to  suggest  that  we  are  not  training  a  whole  battalion  of  sci-
entists  to  come  forward,  and  computer  science  happens  to  be
uniquely  situated?  You  don’t  have  the  high  school  students  taking
physics.  And  I  have  heard  some  questions  about  we  should—or
some comments of what we should be doing, but it is going to take
money.

So maybe I could just get one response from that. My time is out,
but  I  think  we  are  in  a  mess,  and  it  is  hard  to  dig  out  of  it,  and
I  really  don’t  hear  any  voices  being  provocative  and  thinking  out
of the box.

I yield back. If there is someone who wants——
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Well,  the  gentlelady’s  time  is  expired  with
her  initial  summary  of  events,  but  we  will  ask  the  witnesses.  She
has restated something that we are all vitally concerned about and
all working, hopefully, to address.

Who wants to respond?
Dr. Marburger.
Dr. MARBURGER. Let me say a few words about this. There is no
question  that  the  world  is  changing  rapidly,  and  nations  that  for-
merly  did  not  have  the  capacity  to  participate  in  a  technology-
based  economy  are  acquiring  that  capacity  very  rapidly.  And  the
rates of change are very impressive, and they are to be taken quite
seriously,  which  is  why  we  really  have  to  tune  up  our  own  prior-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

ities  as  a  Nation.  And  certainly  computer  science  and  cyber  secu-
rity are among those priorities.

The  situation  is  not  as  gloomy  as  it  seems,  and  some  of  these
dramatic  rates  of  change  have  to  be  put  in  perspective.  The  abso-
lute  numbers  of  scientists  in  these  developing  countries  are  much
smaller than in the United States, for example. We should welcome
the  emergence  of  new  economies  that  can  participate  in  our  own
trade and help us to resolve problems of society.

But  there  are  some  good  stories  here,  and  as  a  result  of  efforts
that  Administrations  have  made,  the  number  of  high  school  grad-
uates  that  take  a  physics  course  is,  in  fact,  going  up.  It  has  not
been  going  down.  In  a  decade,  it  has  increased  from  about  one-
fourth  of  all  high  school  graduates  to  about—to  more  than  one-
third of all high school graduates. So the numbers of scientists are
going up. It fluctuates with the kinds of programs that we have or
the  prospects  for  jobs  in  these  areas,  but  the  indicators  are,  by  no
means,  as  universally  bleak  as  we  hear.  That  does  not  mean  that
we  should  not  take  these  issues  lightly.  We  must  continue  to  sup-
port  the  areas  that  we  know  our  economy  in  the  future  depends
upon.

Thank you.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much, Dr. Marburger, but
Ms.  Jackson  Lee  is  absolutely  right  with  the  general  thrust  of  her
comments.  I  mean,  this  glass  is  not  half  full.  And  when  the  NSF
education directorate, for example, is being asked to absorb a rath-
er substantial cut, we sort of think that some people have priorities
wrong.  And  so  we  are  trying  to  address  a  wide  range  of  subjects.
And in response to Mr. Rohrabacher’s earlier comments, I would
point  out  that  one  of  the  long-range  investments  we  need  to  make
as  a  Nation  is  do  a  hell  of  a  lot  better  than  we  are  doing  in  K–
12 science and math education, because all of you are not going to
get what you need in the future to do what we demand of you and
expect of you unless we start at the beginning. So the whole science
enterprise,  as  I  refer  to  it,  requires  more  investment.  And  we  are
not  just  throwing  money  at  things.  And  it  is  naive  to  suggest  that
any  investment  in  long-term  research—the  investors  have  every
right to expect that every dollar invested is going to produce imme-
diate  significant  results.  I  mean,  that  just  defies  basic  logic  when
you are dealing with research matters.

But let me ask just——
Ms.  JACKSON LEE.  Mr.  Chairman,  would  you  yield  for  just  one

Chairman BOEHLERT. I will for one moment.
Ms. JACKSON LEE. All right.
I  appreciate  Dr.  Marburger’s  comments,  and  when  I  say  bigger
and  better,  I  don’t  suggest,  Mr.  Chairman  or  panelists,  that  we
should  be  arrogantly  bigger  and  better.  But  one  physics  course  is
good, but it is not cutting-edge technology. That is what I am fear-
ful of is that we are losing that, and I hope that we can be working
toward that effort collectively.

moment?

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you.
Ms. JACKSON LEE. I yield back.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

What  I  would  like  to  do  to  wrap  up  is  say,  Dr.  Tether,  you  feel
we  have  sort  of  backed  you  into  a  corner.  That  is  not  our  goal  at
all.  But  let  me  ask  Dr.  Wulf  and  Dr.  Leighton,  what  isn’t  DARPA
doing now that you think they should be doing? Give us some guid-
ance.

Dr. LEIGHTON. Well, I would like to start in the area of cyber se-
curity.  DARPA  has,  by  and  large,  withdrawn  the  bulk  of  their
funding  for  university  research  in  the  area  of  cyber  security.  And
I think you can see the explanation of that in page 16 of Dr. Teth-
er’s written testimony where it is documented in the various areas
in  computer  science,  at  large,  what  has  happened  there.  And  part
of that is through classification. And I think, you know, a great ex-
ample is the work that Dr. Tether quoted from Rome labs in trying
to contain a virus that was released two and a half years ago.

If,  indeed,  DARPA  can  discover  a  way  to  stop  the  spread  of  vi-
ruses, that is vital technology for the government to be able to use
just to defend itself and for enterprises and our companies and our
schools and the people at home to defend themselves. If it is classi-
fied  and  not  going  to  be  released  to  the  general  public  to  be  able
to  defend  themselves,  then  one  can  question  the  value  of  the  re-
search.  And  if  the  concern  is  that  by  releasing  it  the  bad  guys  are
going  to  find  a  way  around  it,  then  one  questions  the  value  of  the
research  in  the  first  place,  because  if  you  can’t  actually  use  it  to
defend  yourself  because  you  are  worried  the  bad  guys  are  going  to
get around it, then it wasn’t a very good thing to do. And it is vital,
I think, to have the university researchers who are, in some ways,
in the best position to develop entirely new approaches to cyber se-
curity, which our Internet and our IT network systems need.

And  I  would  also  like  to  say,  it  is  not  just  viruses  and  worms.
The  fundamental  protocols  that  make  up  the  Internet,  the  domain
name  system,  which  is  the  equivalent  of  the  411  service,  BGP,
which  routes  your  packets  in  the  Internet,  they  have  no  security
at all. I could pretend to be a bank. I can steal your banking pass-
words  today  without  you  having  a  clue  that  I  have  done  it.  It  is
called  pharming.  And  there  are  many  different  ways  to  do
pharming  today.  And  you  will  see,  I  think,  an  increasing  number
of  articles  in  the  paper  of  just  more  and  more  people  that  have
their  identity  stolen.  And  so  I  think  university  research  plays  a
critical role in the long-range thinking about how do we start over
again  with  the  Internet  in  the  same  way  that  you  see  university
research having an impact on lowering the cost of computing or de-
veloping  the  Internet.  And  in  the  past,  these  efforts  were  funded
by  DARPA  as  part  of  a  basic  research  program  at  universities  in
computer  science,  and  that  is  what  is  changing.  And  that  is  what
is causing the problem.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Dr. Wulf.
Dr.  WULF.  I  have  two  points,  just  one  very  briefly  on  classifica-

tion.

In  the  computer  security,  cyber  security  research  domain,  there
is  a  phrase  that  you  will  hear  a  lot.  That  phrase  is:  ‘‘There  is  no
security  in  obscurity.’’  That  is,  if  you  are  depending  upon  some-
thing  not  being  known,  that  is  itself  a  vulnerability,  which  can  be
a very, very serious one.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

to get to.

So,  for  example,  in  all  of  the  work  on  cryptographic  algorithms,
the method of cryptography is published broadly. It is only the key
that  you  have  to  depend  on.  So  if  it  is  necessary  to  classify  some
of  this  material,  I  can  see  classification,  by  the  way,  for  offensive
techniques.  But  if  it  is  necessary  to  classify  defensive  techniques,
they are probably not very strong techniques.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Look,  let  me  just  ask  you  something  else,
and  Dr.  Tether,  I  will  give  him  a  chance,  but  is  it  just  a  question
of more funding? Because I can guarantee you what Dr. Tether re-
quested  as  it  worked  its  way  out  was  a  hell  of  a  lot  more  than  he
got,  and  justifiably  so.  He  can  justify  and  make  a  good  case  for  a
number of items that he had requested money for that were strick-
en  from  the  request.  So  that  is  the  reality  of  dealing  in  this  town
in the whole budget process.

So  is  it  just  getting  more  money,  or  is  it—do  you  suggest  that
maybe some investments are made in areas that you would assign
a lower priority to and take those resources and put them in areas
that you think are deserving of a higher priority?

Dr. WULF. That is, in fact, exactly the second point that I wanted

It is not just more money. It also has to do with the style of fund-
ing.  Now  this  may  sound  nostalgic  or  something  like  that,  but
when I was being funded by DARPA—ARPA, actually, back in the
’70s and early ’80s, DARPA made very long-term agreements. Cer-
tainly  they  monitored  what  we  were  doing,  but  they  understood
that results might not occur for five years, 10 years. The style that
ARPA has—DARPA has gone to more recently are very short-term
contracts  and  require  demonstrable  deliverables  every  12  months.
That, no matter what the amount of money, builds in a short-term
focus that—well, I just think we are missing about——

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you.
And in all fairness, and I don’t mean to get in point/counterpoint,
but Dr. Tether, who we value very highly as a resource to this com-
mittee, we want to give you a chance to comment on that observa-
tion.

And  then  I  will  wrap  it  up  with  a  final  question  to  Dr.

Marburger about the future of PITAC.

Dr. Tether.
Dr. TETHER. Okay. Let me—I have two comments.
One  is  on  these  so-called  deliverables.  They  are  really  not
deliverables.  What  we  do  in  our  programs,  they  are  really  long-
range  programs.  What  we  do,  what  our  program  managers  do,  is
we ask them to say okay, what is the first thing that has to be true
in  order  for  this,  whatever  you  are  doing,  to  happen?  And  then
what  is  the  second  thing?  Because  there  is  no  sense  spending
money on the second thing if the first thing is not going to be true.
And  we  have  them  lay  out  a  program  over  many  years  that  has
these  gates  that  have  to  be  passed.  We  call  them  go/no-gos,  which
I think frightens some people. But it is a little bit to me like what
is  happening  at  universities  is  that  you  go  in  as  a  freshman  and
you spend four years, give them your money, and you get a degree
and  never  had  to  take  an  exam.  You  never  had  to  show  that  you
had  the  knowledge  to  pass  Physics  1,  and  that  is  a  go/no-go.  That

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

is  all  we  are  really  talking  about  here  is  a  way  to  measure
progress. And that progress is being put together.

Now  we  have  our  6.1  program,  which  is  what  he  is  nostalgic
about,  which  is  the  basic  research,  which  is  just  really  done  with
grants.  And  with  these  grants,  you  typically  give  somebody  a  cou-
ple years, two or three years of money. You don’t say, ‘‘Write if you
get  work,’’  but  it  really  is  somewhat  unfettered  research.  And  that
money  is  a  small  amount  of  the  DARPA  budget,  and  always  has
been a small amount of the DARPA budget. You saw what I have,
about  $150  million  in  6.1,  and  $90  million  of  that  goes  to  univer-
sities. And it goes in the form of grants.

The  rest  of  the  money,  the  other  $450  million  going  to  univer-
sities is really in creating products. And when you get into the cre-
ating  products  business,  or  the  demonstration  business,  it  is  not
unreasonable  to  have  somebody  tell  you,  ‘‘What  is  your  plan?  How
are you going—what are your metrics? How are you going to meas-
ure  yourself  to  know  that  you  are  making  progress?’’  And  that  is
what  these  so-called  deliverables  are  about.  These  are  negotiated
between us and the person doing the work. Now if they don’t want
to do that, then they shouldn’t try to get into the 6.2 or 6.3 arena,
because that is a different arena than the normal universities.

Now the second thing. You know, I don’t get any actionable infor-
mation  from  these  guys.  I  get  a  wringing  of  hands  that  the  money
is going down, but not one person has ever clearly defined, and you
asked  for  it,  the  specific  research  that  is  not  being  done,  the  prob-
lems that are not being solved, or the progress that is impeded. Not
one  of  them  is  saying,  ‘‘Look,  you  are  not  funding  me,  and  I  was
on  the  verge  of  creating  the  unifying  theory  of  computer  science.’’
All  of  the  people  that  you  hear  complaining  are  only  complaining
because  they  are  not  being  funded,  but  they  are  never  telling  you
what it is that they want to do, other than get the money.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Well, we could be engaged all afternoon in
this  subject,  but  we  will  ask  specifically  from  Dr.  Wulf  and  Dr.
Leighton, for the record, and we would ask for a timely submission,
in  response  to  the  challenge  that  Dr.  Tether  has  rightfully  ad-
vanced.

Dr. TETHER. And not say that it is classification that is the prob-
lem.  I  want  to  know  the  problem  that  they  want  to  work  on  that
if  they  got  the  money,  and  the  only  thing  stopping  them  is  getting
the  money,  to  work  on  a  specific  problem  that  they  can  do  it,  it
would  be  fantastic.  And  it  could  be  something  that  could  take  20
years.  We  are  used  to  that,  because  I  will  tell  you,  Mr.  Sherman,
you  know,  I  don’t  know  what  he  is  worrying  about,  but  he  doesn’t
have  to  worry  about  the  cognitive  research  that  we  are  doing
achieving what he is worried about in a long time.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Well,  I  think  Dr.  Wulf  and  Dr.  Leighton
are  up  to  the  challenge,  and  so  you  will  respond  to  the  challenge
offered by Dr. Tether, to him and a copy to the Committee, please.
And Dr. Marburger, what about PITAC? Are you going to renew

it?

Dr.  MARBURGER.  The  PITAC  charter  is  up  shortly,  and  there  is
a process for examining all Presidentially-appointed Advisory Com-
mittees  that  has  begun,  and  it  is  in  process,  and  that  is  about  all
I can say at this point.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

Chairman BOEHLERT. What about your gut feeling right now?
Dr.  MARBURGER.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  as  the  President’s  Science
Advisor,  I  don’t  have  just  gut  feelings.  I  try  to  speak  from  best
knowledge, and I would prefer not to second-guess the President on
any Presidentially-appointed committee.

Chairman BOEHLERT. I see. But what about—what—it is in stat-

ute, counsel points out. PITAC is in statute.

Dr. MARBURGER. Yes.
Chairman BOEHLERT. So you are saying your authority, statutory
authority  expires  on  a  date  certain,  and  then  what?  You  are  going
to have a recommendation from the Administration whether——

Dr. MARBURGER. Right.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.—to  renew,  and  that  will  require  a  new

statute?

Dr.  MARBURGER.  I  am  not  sure  about  the  legal  status.  I  am
aware that there are usually long delays and times associated with
reconstituting  Presidential  Advisory  Committees.  And  in  response
to  legislation  and  to  statute,  the  President  usually  does  this
through  a  series  of  Executive  Orders,  and  the  Executive  Order
under which the current PITAC has operated is due to expire, and
a new Executive Order is required. And that process of generating
a new Executive Order, deciding what the content of it will be and
so forth, it is taking place.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  We  are  confident  that  you  will  give  the

President the benefit of your best judgment.

Dr. MARBURGER. Thank you.
Chairman BOEHLERT. And with that, let me say thank you to all
of  you  for  appearing  here  today.  Pretty  darn  important  subject
matter.  The  room  should  be  filled  to  capacity,  and  the  press  corps
should  be  here,  you  know,  weighing  every  word  you  are  say,  be-
cause  what  we  are  talking  about  is  very,  very  important,  and  so
thank  you  for  what  you  do  so  well.  And  continue  the  good  work.
And we will continue the relationship we have. We are partners in
this venture.

This hearing is adjourned.
[Whereupon, at 12:15 p.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(97)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by John H. Marburger, III, Director, Office of Science and Technology Pol-

icy, The White House

Questions submitted by Chairman Sherwood L. Boehlert
Q1. You said at the hearing that the NITRD budget is a ‘‘composite of budgets from
each of the agencies, and we only get the information about these numbers after
the  budget  is  already  out.’’  This  statement  implies  that  there  is  no  active  plan-
ning  process  that  considers  overall  NITRD  goals  in  determining  individual
agency budget allocations. Is this the case? If not, was there debate over whether
DARPA’s  33  percent  drop  in  NITRD  funding  (over  the  last  five  years)  was  ap-
propriate?  Do  other  agencies  need  to  pick  up  this  slack,  and  are  they  doing  so?
A1. Agencies  determine  their  budget  requests  for  R&D  in  NITRD  Program  areas
after  close  interagency  coordination  through  a  series  of  formal  and  informal  meet-
ings  of  Coordinating  Groups,  Interagency  Working  Groups,  and  the  NITRD  Sub-
committee  itself,  many  of  which  OSTP  oversees  or  participates  in.  This  process  in-
volves  setting  federal  priorities  for  IT  R&D,  determining  agency  priorities  within
these, and coordinating federal spending to ensure that the priorities are met. How-
ever,  as  I  stated,  the  specific  agency  spending  levels  reflected  in  the  President’s
Budget  are  not  finalized  until  just  prior  to  its  release,  and  therefore  the  complete,
final details of the budget for the NITRD Program are not available until then.

The  level  of  DARPA  funding  that  falls  within  the  NITRD  Program  reflects  the
evolution  of  DARPA’s  priorities,  and  an  increasing  emphasis  on  interdisciplinary
R&D.  This  emphasis  on  interdisciplinary  R&D  for  tackling  important  defense-re-
lated  technological  challenges  evolved  over  the  last  five  years  while  being  shaped
by  the  NITRD  interagency  planning  and  coordination  process.  The  growth  in  the
overall  NITRD  program  budget  during  that  period  demonstrates  that  the  NITRD
Program agencies continue to address the Federal Government’s priorities for infor-
mation technology R&D.
Q2. What  impact  is  DARPA’s  reduced  support  for  computer  science  research  having
on the Federal Government’s ability to meet its overall objectives in information
technology?

A2. The  overall  NITRD  Program  budget  grew  from  $1,928  million  in  2001  to  the
budget request of $2,155 million in 2006. That this happened during a tight budget
climate  demonstrates  that  information  technology  R&D  continues  to  be  a  priority
for  the  Administration.  The  Federal  Government  continues  to  invest  in  the  R&D
needed  to  meet  its  overall  objectives  in  information  technology.  However,  at  the
same time, DARPA has been investigating new R&D topics, including some that are
not necessarily central to the NITRD focus areas and that may lead to future discov-
eries  that  could  unlock  unexpected  areas  of  future  computer  science  investigations.
The  IT  R&D  investments  at  DARPA  and  the  other  NITRD  agencies  provide  a
healthy  mixture  of  types  and  topics  of  research  that  will  contribute  to  broad  ad-
vances across a wide range of science and technology.
Q3. What  criteria  should  we  be  using  to  determine  if  federal  support  for  funda-
mental  research  in  computer  science  in  general  and  cyber  security  in  particular  is
adequate?
A3. The  determination  of  what  is  ‘‘adequate’’  depends  on  one’s  perspective.  Federal
agencies  generate  their  budgets  in  the  context  of  their  overall  mission  and  develop
priorities that are consistent with that mission. Adequacy is thus judged in light of
meeting mission needs. From the standpoint of the broader S&T portfolio, we must
balance new and emerging research areas with currently productive ones, which can
result in different trade-offs.

While  we  don’t  have  specific  criteria  we  can  use  to  set  funding  levels  for  our  re-
search  investments,  in  general  we  ask  if  overall  S&T  funding  levels  are  reasonable
and balanced, if a large share of research proposals are proposed competitively and
are awarded in a merit-reviewed process by technically qualified reviewers, if agen-
cy  missions  determine  the  funded  projects  and  levels,  and  if  agency  management
and  oversight  processes  lead  to  the  performance  of  high-quality  research.  These
standards have been used in the formulation of the President’s Budget Request.

More  specific  to  computer  science  and  cyber  security,  we  consider  many  factors
including protecting infrastructure, safeguarding commerce, and preserving privacy,
but  what  is  ‘‘adequate’’  remains  a  fundamental  question,  particularly  with  such  a
dynamic system, where the threats constantly evolve and adapt.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

Question submitted by Representative Dave G. Reichert
Q1. The Advanced Scientific Computing Research (ASCR) program provides the De-
partment  of  Energy  (DOE)  with  world  class  scientific  computation  capabilities
and  high-throughput  networking  research.  The  ASCR  program  is  a  multidisci-
plinary effort involving teams of mathematicians, computer scientists, and appli-
cation  area  scientists  working  to  develop  new  scientific  simulation  codes,  tech-
nologies,  and  the  networking  capacity  required  to  fully  exploit  the  next  genera-
tion of Leadership Class Computing resources.
One rapidly emerging mission need is cyber security. Cyber threats are becoming
increasingly malicious, and regularly outpace the protections that can be put in
place  using  the  current  ‘‘border-based’’  cyber  security  model.  There  is  an  urgent
need for aggressive design and implementation of novel integrated cyber security
systems  that  would  coordinate  both  protective  and  response  measures.  Develop-
ment of such architecture will require close cooperation between researchers and
operational cyber security personnel to build an effective, layered approach that
is tested and vetted in an operational environment. DOE’s national laboratories
provide  an  ideal  environment  to  conduct  such  a  cyber  security  program  to  de-
velop solutions for both the classified and the open science communities, but cur-
rent  funding  may  be  insufficient  to  initiate  a  cyber  security  effort  adequate  to
this challenge.
Dr. Marburger, do you agree that the DOE’s Office of Advanced Scientific Com-
puting  Research  should  create  cyber  security  research  testbeds  at  its  national
laboratories? Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL), in my home State
of Washington, is an ideal site for such an undertaking.

A1. While cyber security research testbeds are an important component of the over-
all cyber security R&D activities for the Federal Government, there is already a sig-
nificant investment across federal agencies in such testbeds, including DETER (De-
fense  Technology  Experimental  Research)  and  EMIST  (Evaluation  Methods  for
Internet  Security  Technology),  both  jointly  funded  by  DHS  and  NSF;  ISEAGE
(Internet-Simulation Event and Attack Generation Environment), funded by the De-
partment  of  Justice;  and  another  cyber  security  testbed  for  emulating  current  and
legacy  industry  environments  at  the  Idaho  National  Laboratory.  This  Department
of  Energy  testbed  has  synergies  with  other  testbed  activities  at  the  Laboratory,  in-
cluding  a  wireless  testbed,  a  SCADA  testbed,  and  the  Critical  Infrastructure  Test
Range.  Additional  investments  in  cyber  security  testbeds  must  be  weighed  against
other important cyber security priorities.

Questions submitted by Representative Bart Gordon
Q1. The  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC)  report  on
cyber  security  finds  the  current  federal  effort  unfocused  and  inefficient  because
of inadequate coordination and oversight. The PITAC’s upcoming report on com-
putational  science,  according  to  preliminary  reports  from  the  committee,  faults
the  federal  interagency  Networking  and  Information  Technology  R&D  program
for placing too much focus on incremental and tactical planning rather than on
strategic planning.
What  is  your  response  to  these  findings,  and  do  you  see  a  need  for  changes  to
refocus and improve the interagency planning process for information technology
research and development?

A1. The  current  interagency  coordinating  body  for  cyber  security  R&D  is  the  Crit-
ical  Information  Infrastructure  Protection  Interagency  Working  Group  (CIIP  IWG),
which  reports  to  the  Infrastructure  Subcommittee  of  the  NSTC.  The  PITAC  report
concluded  that  the  federal  coordination  of  cyber  security  R&D  would  be  more  fo-
cused and more efficient if a coordinating group were formed under the Networking
and  Information  Technology  R&D  (NITRD)  Subcommittee.  To  implement  the  rec-
ommendation  of  the  PITAC  for  improving  coordination,  the  charter  for  the  CIIP
IWG  is  being  changed  so  that  the  IWG  reports  to  both  the  Infrastructure  and
NITRD  Subcommittees,  where  it  will  now  be  known  as  the  Cyber  Security  and  In-
formation  Assurance  (CSIA)  IWG,  a  name  that  more  accurately  reflects  its  activi-
ties.  Reporting  to  both  Subcommittees  has  several  advantages.  First,  it  maintains
the  vital  connection  between  the  security  of  our  cyber  and  physical  infrastructures
through  the  Infrastructure  Subcommittee.  Second,  it  strengthens  the  integration  of
cyber security with the rest of the Federal IT research portfolio. Finally, it provides

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

the IWG with technical and administrative support through the National Coordina-
tion Office for IT R&D. Completion of this reorganization is imminent.

The  PITAC  report  on  computational  science  recommends  the  development  of  a
multi-decade roadmap for R&D investments in computational science, and a restruc-
turing  of  computational  science  activities  within  universities  and  federal  agencies
that  better  mirrors  their  interdisciplinary  nature.  Specifically,  it  recommends
tasking the National Academies to launch studies and convene task forces that seek
to address each of these goals. Based in part upon early input from the PITAC, the
Analytical Perspectives of the 2006 Budget directs the National Coordination Office
to commission an NRC study of scientific questions ‘‘for which an extraordinary ad-
vancement  in  our  understanding  is  difficult  or  impossible  without  leading-edge  sci-
entific simulation capabilities.’’ Additional studies to facilitate the development of a
strategic roadmap for computational science are also being considered.

While  several  of  the  recommendations  of  the  PITAC  for  both  cyber  security  and
computational science are already being implemented, they contribute to an already
strong  and  effective  interagency  planning  process  for  the  NITRD  Program.  Inter-
agency coordination, including budget planning, is active and vigorous. In 2005, the
Supplement  to  the  Budget  for  the  NITRD  Program  was  delivered  to  Congress  in
mid-February.  Both  the  content  and  the  timing  of  the  Budget  Supplement  are  evi-
dence of the strength of interagency coordination.
Q2. What  efforts  are  now  being  made  and  what  mechanisms  exist  to  transition  the
results  of  federally  funded  cyber  security  research  to  commercial  products  and
methods, and do you have recommendations for additional federal efforts in this
area?

A2. There are several existing agency programs aimed at cyber security technology
transfer.  These  include  the  Computer  Security  Resource  Center  and  the  Cryp-
tographic  Module  Validation  Program,  both  at  the  National  Institute  of  Standards
and  Technology,  and  several  pilot  projects  and  deployments  of  cyber  security  tech-
nology funded by the Department of Homeland Security. The PITAC report on cyber
security makes some constructive suggestions regarding ways to increase technology
transfer, including the suggestion of an annual cyber security interagency workshop
with industry participation.

Questions submitted by Representative Sheila Jackson Lee
Q1. While  I  am  unsatisfied  by  the  status  of  computer  science  research  being  con-
ducted on the federal level, I am also disturbed by the lack of female and minor-
ity  representation  in  the  field  of  computer  science.  The  statistics  show  that
women  and  minorities  are  not  being  proportionally  represented  in  academia
when  it  comes  to  computer  science.  In  2003,  women  represented  barely  over  20
percent  of  the  computer  science  doctoral  degrees  granted.  The  same  statistics
show  that  in  2003  the  White  population  made  up  about  70  percent  of  the  doc-
toral  degrees  granted  to  U.S.  citizens  and  permanent  residents.  At  the  same
time,  Asian/Pacific  Islanders  made  up  about  20  percent  of  the  doctoral  degrees
granted, but Blacks, Hispanics and American Indian/Native Alaskans made up
less  than  five  percent  of  the  doctoral  degrees  granted.  These  statistics  are  very
discouraging  and  show  that  we  are  not  reaching  out  to  our  entire  population.
Indeed, the problem starts in the classroom, where many under-privileged youth
do  not  have  nearly  the  same  access  to  computers  and  the  Internet.  If  they  don’t
have  this  background  at  an  early  age,  its  not  surprising  that  they  don’t  pursue
the  field  in  higher  education  and  later  in  life.  What  are  we  doing  to  reach
women, minorities and the under-privileged in our society?

A1. Access to educational opportunities is an important prerequisite for a career in
scientific  research,  but  even  more  important  is  continuity  of  preparation;  that  is,
adequate education at every grade level. At the heart of President Bush’s signature
education  initiative,  the  No  Child  Left  Behind  (NCLB)  Act,  is  a  commitment  to
eliminate the achievement gap between minority and white students by insisting on
greater  accountability  and  ensuring  that  all  students  have  access  to  a  quality  edu-
cation.  This  kind  of  strong  academic  foundation  can  lay  the  groundwork  for  more
students  to  pursue  careers  in  science  and  engineering.  Continued  implementation
of  NCLB  is  an  important  step  towards  the  goal  of  representative  participation  by
women and minorities in all S&T fields.

To improve educational outreach specifically with minority populations, President
Bush  has  issued  1)  an  Executive  Order  in  October  2001  establishing  a  President’s
Advisory  Commission  on  Educational  Excellence  for  Hispanic  Americans  in  the  De-
partment  of  Education  to  provide  advice  on  closing  the  achievement  gap  for  His-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

panic  American  children  in  reaching  the  goals  outlined  in  NCLB;  2)  an  Executive
Order  in  February  2002  establishing  the  President’s  Board  of  Advisors  on  Histori-
cally Black Colleges and Universities in the Department of Education to provide ad-
vice on ways to strengthen the capacity of historically black colleges and universities
to  provide  the  highest  quality  education;  and  3)  in  May  2004  an  Executive  Order
establishing an Interagency Working Group on American Indian and Alaska Native
Education to provide assistance in meeting the goals of the NCLB with Native popu-
lations in a manner that is consistent with tribal traditions, languages and cultures.
Additionally,  Mrs.  Bush  in  June  2004  accepted  the  position  of  Honorary  Chair  of
the Advisory Committee for the Extraordinary Women Engineers Project, an aware-
ness and outreach program designed to encourage young women to choose engineer-
ing  as  a  career  and  to  develop  a  new  generation  of  role  models  for  those  already
in the field.

Many federal agencies have on-going programs that target women, minorities and
the  under-privileged  directly.  For  example:  at  the  National  Science  Foundation
(NSF),  the  Louis  Stokes  Alliances  for  Minority  Participation  Program  is  aimed  at
increasing  the  quality  and  quantity  of  students  successfully  completing  science,
technology,  engineering  and  mathematics  (STEM)  baccalaureate  degree  programs
and increasing the number of students interested in, academically qualified for, and
matriculated into programs of graduate study. NSF’s ADVANCE program focuses on
increasing the participation and advancement of women in academic science and en-
gineering  careers.  Additionally,  from  an  institutional  perspective,  NSF’s  Centers  of
Research  Excellence  in  Science  and  Technology  (CREST)  program  makes  resources
available to significantly enhance the research capabilities of minority-serving insti-
tutions through the establishment of centers that effectively integrate education and
research. CREST promotes the development of new knowledge, enhancements of the
research  productivity  of  individual  faculty,  and  an  expanded  diverse  student  pres-
ence  in  STEM  disciplines.  NSF  currently  provides  support  for  14  CREST  Centers.
There  are  also  other  programs  at  other  agencies.  The  Department  of  Education’s
Minority Science and Engineering Improvement Program supports grants to institu-
tions  of  higher  education  that  are  designed  to  effect  long-range  improvement  in
science and engineering education at predominantly minority institutions and to in-
crease  the  participation  of  under-represented  ethnic  and  racial  minorities  in  sci-
entific  and  technological  careers.  The  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administra-
tion’s Minority University Research and Education Program focuses on collaborative
efforts  with  minority  serving  institutions  to  support  the  advancement  of  under-rep-
resented students in the fields of math, science, engineering, and technology.

Recently,  in  an  effort  to  coordinate  on  and  maximize  the  impact  of  such  agency
programs,  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council’s  Subcommittee  on  Edu-
cation  and  Workforce  Development  has  overseen  the  establishment  of  a  Science
Education Resource Virtual Diversity Center which will serve as a the major STEM
education  content  portal  for  federal  programs  that  target  increased  participation
from  women,  under-represented  minorities,  and  persons  with  disabilities,  and  will
be  a  tool  for  sharing  information  on  all  strategies  designed  to  address  the  Nation’s
STEM workforce needs.
Q2. The  PITAC  cyber  security  report  makes  specific  recommendations  for  increased

cyber security research funding for NSF, DARPA and DHS.

Q2a. What  is  your  reaction  to  this  recommendation;  will  future  Administration

budget requests respond to this recommendation?

A2a. Funding  for  cyber  security  R&D  must  be  considered  in  the  context  of  agency
missions, agency budgets, the overall R&D budget, and the total federal budget, for
which there are many competing priorities. A recommendation calling for a substan-
tial  increase  in  funding  for  a  particular  R&D  area,  given  the  current  severely  con-
strained  fiscal  environment,  implies  a  re-prioritization  of  existing  research  areas.
Any  such  re-prioritization  must  be  based  on  an  in-depth  understanding  of  areas
where specific gaps in our knowledge exist. Agencies are currently involved in devel-
oping this understanding to inform future budget development activities.
Q2b. Why does DHS now spend only 1/10 of two percent of their Science and Tech-
nology  budget  on  fundamental  research  for  cyber  security?  Is  this  an  appro-
priate funding level?

A2b. The Science and Technology budget for the Department of Homeland Security
funds  a  wide  range  of  activities  that  include  R&D  to  address  radiological,  nuclear,
chemical  and  biological  threats  to  the  homeland,  as  well  as  cyber  security  research
to  address  threats  to  our  nation’s  information  infrastructure.  The  S&T  directorate
must  balance  the  funding  for  cyber  security  R&D  against  these  other  priorities.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

Moreover,  many  of  the  activities  funded  through  the  DHS  S&T  directorate  are
short-term development investments to quickly generate the tools necessary for the
detection  and  prevention  of  catastrophic  physical  attacks,  essential  to  protect  our
nation  from  weapons  of  mass  destruction.  Such  short-term  tool  development  activi-
ties are inherently more expensive than research, which tends to skew any compari-
sons to research funding.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Anthony J. Tether, Director, Defense Advanced Research Projects Agen-

cy

Questions submitted by Chairman Sherwood L. Boehlert
Q1. During  a  discussion  with  Representative  Biggert  at  the  hearing,  you  said  that
the 33 percent drop in DARPA’s NITRD budget between fiscal year 2002 (FY02)
and  FY06  was  inaccurate  because  of  an  OMB  accounting  problem,  and  you
agreed  to  provide  the  Committee  with  an  ‘‘apples-to-apples’’  comparison  that
would  better  explain  DARPA  IT  support  over  the  last  five  years.  With  that  in
mind:

Q1a. Please provide the correct budget numbers for FY02 to FY06 for DARPA’s over-
all  spending  on  information  technology  R&D.  Include  information  about  how
much of those funds went to universities each year.

A1a.

funding  after  appropriations.  Lines  3  and  4 

Q1b. Please explain any discrepancies with the published NITRD numbers.
A1b. Line 1 reflects DARPA’s NITRD submissions published in the ‘‘Blue Book’’ for
FY02  to  FY06,  which  are  based  on  the  President’s  Budget  Request.  Line  2  reflects
actual 
include  additional
Nanotechnology and Information Assurance programs that fit the NITRD categories
but were previously excluded to avoid double counting on other OMB crosscuts. Line
5 reflects the total of these additions.
Q1c. Please  explain  DARPA’s  interaction  in  the  NITRD  budget  process,  including
how you interact with OMB and OSTP in planning activities and in finalizing
the numbers that are included in the annual ‘‘blue book.’’

A1c. Initial estimates for the annual NITRD submission are requested by the Office
of  the  Secretary  of  Defense  (OSD)  Comptroller  in  the  November/December  time-
frame  as  the  Department  is  finalizing  budget  controls  for  the  upcoming  President’s
budget  submission.  The  OSD  Comptroller’s  office  then  forwards  these  estimates  to
the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  (OMB)  Analyst  responsible  for  OMB  Max  C
Data  reporting.  Often  these  numbers  are  requested  prior  to  the  final  budget  lock
for the President’s budget which usually occurs in the first week of January. A staff
member  from  the  National  Coordination  Office  for  Information  Technology  R&D
contacts  DARPA  in  the  February  to  May  timeframe  to  verify  the  NITRD  final
amounts  for  printing  of  the  ‘‘blue  book.’’  At  that  time,  if  required,  DARPA  updates
the numbers to reflect the final President’s budget.
Q2. At the hearing you described DARPA’s research in cognitive computing as an ex-

ample of long-term IT research.

Q2a. What  is  the  funding  for  this  program,  and  how  much  of  this  funding  is  going
to  universities,  and  to  computer  science  faculty?  Please  provide  data  for  FY00
to FY05. Also, what funding is planned in this area for FY06 and beyond?

A2a. Funding  for  the  Cognitive  Computing  Systems  program  is  shown  below  with
associated university funding. DARPA research in this area started in FY 2002.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

Q2b. What  other  long-term  research  is  DARPA  currently  supporting  in  computer
science?  How  much  funding  in  those  programs  is  going  to  universities?  How
much is classified?

A2b. As  previously  reported  in  my  testimony,  the  total  DARPA  Computer  Science
Research  funding  is  below  and  covers  the  areas  of  High  Performance  and  Global
Scale  Systems,  Information  Assurance  and  Survivability,  Language  Translation,
Cognitive Systems, Nanotechnology and the applications of these efforts in the Net-
working, Logistics, Communications and Classified areas. More details on individual
programs can be found in DARPA’s detailed budget request.

Q3. What  is  DARPA’s  response  to  the  recommendations  in  the  recent  President’s  In-

formation Technology Advisory Committee (PITAC) report on cyber security?

A3. While  recognizing  the  budget  restraints  that  all  federal  agencies  must  operate
under,  DARPA  wholeheartedly  agrees  with  the  idea  that  both  the  National  Science
Foundation (NSF) and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) should increase
their  support  for  commercial  cyber  security  research  to  build  our  commercial  cyber
security  research  base  and  protect  our  civilian  computer  networks,  respectively.  In
fact,  the  PITAC  was  told  as  much  when  we  met  with  them  while  they  were  pre-
paring  their  report.  Such  increases  at  NSF  and  DHS  would  be  completely  in  line
with the mission of those agencies and the cyber security challenges we face.

As  far  as  DARPA  goes,  our  work  in  cyber  security,  what  we  called  ‘‘information
assurance,’’ is aimed at making sure that the networks at the heart of DOD’s trans-
formation to network centric warfare are secure and robust, because the first thing
a  determined,  sophisticated  adversary  will  do  is  try  to  take  down  our  networks.
Moreover,  the  nature  of  our  military  networks  will  be  different.  These  will  be  net-
works  that  must  assemble  on  the  fly  without  a  fixed  infrastructure,  including  pure
peer to peer networks. We must achieve what has been called ‘‘critical infrastructure
protection’’  without  infrastructure.  No  one  else,  including  the  commercial  sector  or
even  civilian  agencies,  can  or  will  do  it  for  us.  So,  given  our  mission,  DARPA’s  em-
phasis must be on those DOD problems.
Q4. You  noted  in  your  testimony  that  DARPA  does  not  directly  seek  efforts  in  com-
puter  science,  but  rather  solicits  ideas  for  achieving  particular  capabilities.
Without regard to funding constraints, what capabilities that demand a signifi-
cant  focus  on  computer  science  research  merit  further  pursuit  by  DARPA?  Or,
put  another  way:  If  DARPA’s  budget  were  to  receive  a  significant  budget  in-
crease  beyond  the  President’s  request,  what  capabilities  with  a  significant  com-
puter science focus would you pursue?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

A4. As I mentioned during the hearing, DARPA is perhaps the only agency actually
doing something major to maintain our edge in high-performance computing—a sub-
ject that is of great interest to this committee and rightly so. Our High Productivity
Computing Systems program is designing and will build prototypes of the next gen-
eration  supercomputer.  In  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  06  we  will  down-select  to  one  team  to
build  the  prototypes.  If  we  had  additional  money,  it  would  be  better  to  have  two
teams. Two teams would allow us to compare different approaches, have a more di-
verse industrial base and maintain competitive pressure. An extra team would cost
about $70M in FY07.

More  broadly,  it  might  be  helpful  to  have  somewhat  more  money  for  our  work  in
cognitive computing, but the exact amount is hard to say. Our research in cognitive
computing  is  very  challenging  and  long-term  and,  to  the  extent  it  succeeds,  will
have  an  enormous  impact.  But,  as  path  breaking  research,  adding  large  amounts
of  money  to  it  quickly  is  not  likely  to  get  you  much  faster  results.  You  would  get
more  activity  with  more  money,  but  since  a  limited  number  of  people  have  path
breaking  ideas,  you  may  not  get  more  results.  So,  there  might  be  some  leeway  for
more funding in cognitive computing now, but not large amounts more.

Question submitted by Representative Sheila Jackson Lee
Q1. While  I  am  unsatisfied  by  the  status  of  computer  science  research  being  con-
ducted on the federal level, I am also disturbed by the lack of female and minor-
ity  representation  in  the  field  of  computer  science.  The  statistics  show  that
women  and  minorities  are  not  being  proportionally  represented  in  academia
when  it  comes  to  computer  science.  In  2003,  women  represented  barely  over  20
percent  of  the  computer  science  doctoral  degrees  granted.  The  same  statistics
show  that  in  2003  the  White  population  made  up  about  70  percent  of  the  doc-
toral  degrees  granted  to  U.S.  citizens  and  permanent  residents.  At  the  same
time,  Asian/Pacific  Islanders  made  up  about  20  percent  of  the  doctoral  degrees
granted, but Blacks, Hispanics and American Indian/Native Alaskans made up
less  than  five  percent  of  the  doctoral  degrees  granted.  These  statistics  are  very
discouraging  and  show  that  we  are  not  reaching  out  to  our  entire  population.
Indeed, the problem starts in the classroom, where many under-privileged youth
do  not  have  nearly  the  same  access  to  computers  and  the  Internet.  If  they  don’t
have  this  background  at  an  early  age,  its  not  surprising  that  they  don’t  pursue
the  field  in  higher  education  and  later  in  life.  What  are  we  doing  to  reach
women, minorities and the under-privileged in our society?

A1. DARPA agrees wholeheartedly that we need to get more Americans, and wider
set  of  Americans,  interested  in  computer  science  and  science  and  engineering.  The
lifeblood  of  a  place  like  DARPA  is  its  program  mangers,  and  it  takes  many  years
and  many  educational  hurdles  before  someone  can  be  hired  by  us.  One  of  our  big-
gest  challenges  is  constantly  finding  the  new  people  we  need,  people  with  great
ideas  and  a  passion  to  make  a  difference,  who  typically  also  have  a  doctorate  and
deep  experience  in  demanding  technical  positions.  You  cannot  just  conjure  up  that
kind of person when you need them.

So, if only from a self-interested point of view, DARPA needs more Americans en-
tering  the  educational  pipeline  for  technical  careers.  In  this  context,  I  should  men-
tion  our  Grand  Challenge.  The  whole  idea  behind  the  Grand  Challenge  is  to  reach
out to people who ordinarily do not work on problems for the Department of Defense
by  offering  a  large  prize  to  whomever  meets  the  challenge  first.  118  teams  applied
this year. Of the 40 teams remaining, 14 of them are from universities and one from
a high school. Young people from across the Nation have been excited by the Grand
Challenge (and probably the recent privately funded X–Prize) because that’s the na-
ture  of  prize  competitions.  The  goals  are  clear  and  the  competition  is  exciting,  so
they are like a high tech sporting event. Now, education is not DARPA’s area of ex-
pertise,  but  maybe  if  various  educational  organizations  held  prize  competitions  tai-
lored  to  various  levels  of  the  educational  process—university,  high  school,  even  ele-
mentary schools—such competitions could help lure people into technical careers by
showing them how much fun they can have.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

Responses by William A. Wulf, President, National Academy of Engineering

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chairman Sherwood L. Boehlert
Q1. What  kind  of  computer  science  research  isn’t  DARPA  supporting  that  you  think
it should? Is it a matter of more funding or are there programs that are of lower
priority that should be cut?

A1. There  are  two  dimensions  to  the  answer  of  this  question—(1)  the  topics  of  re-
search,  and  (2)  the  ‘‘style’’  of  the  support  for  that  research,  by  which  I  mean  the
level of funding, the duration of that funding, the degree of control exercised by the
funder,  etc.  The  current  DARPA  management  is,  I  believe,  failing  the  country  on
both dimensions.

Along both dimensions, there are many organizations that support essential incre-
mental  improvements—the  service  laboratories  and  service  R&D  support  organiza-
tions,  for  example.  There  is  now  no  DOD  organization  like  the  ‘‘old  DARPA,’’  how-
ever, that fills the role of discovery of breakthrough technologies.

Concerning  the  topics  of  research—as  I  noted  in  my  written  testimony,  there  is
a  fifteen  year  delay  between  discovery  of  basic  knowledge  and  its  appearance  in
product. Failure to fill this pipeline will not be immediately evident, but the future
consequences will be cataclysmic. I could name a long list of areas where filling the
pipeline is needed, but just as a sampler:

• As I have testified before, our basic model of computer security (perimeter de-
fense) is fatally flawed—we will never have secure computing systems so long
as  this  is  the  underlying  model!  We  need  a  breakthrough,  and  the  only  way
to  get  that  is  to  support  a  variety  of  radical  approaches—and  to  expect  most
of  them  to  fail!  The  short-term,  risk-averse  approach  being  currently  taken
by DARPA will not yield such a breakthrough.

• Our  ability  to  produce  reliable,  effective  software  seems  to  always  totter  on
the  brink  of  disaster—and  100+  million  dollar  examples  are  all  too  common
(e.g., the recent problem with the FBI TRILOGY system). It ought to be obvi-
ous  that  doing  just  ‘‘more  of  the  same’’  will  not  solve  the  problem;  a  break-
through  is  needed,  and,  as  above,  the  only  way  to  get  that  is  to  support  a
variety of approaches with a risky, long-term, basic emphasis.

• It is a bit more than slightly embarrassing that our current computer compo-
nents  are  individually  a  million  times  faster  than  our  brain  cells,  yet  com-
puters either cannot, or with great difficulty do what humans do easily. There
simply  must  be  a  model  of  computing,  especially  of  parallel  computing,  that
we do not understand and that, if we did, would produce computing architec-
tures and algorithms of immense power.

• The  use  of  computers  in  education  has  progressed  little  from  the  ‘‘automated
drill’’ model of the Plato system from the 1960’s. Yet we now know much more
about  the  way  that  people  learn,  physiologically  and  psychologically.  We  also
have  tacit  knowledge  about  how  emotion  interacts  with  learning,  and  how  to
evoke emotion to train, for example, first responders and troops in urban com-
bat zones.

I picked each of the examples above because they have a clear and compelling link
to the mission of the DOD. Security, reliable software, high performance computing
and  education/training  are  all  central  to  that  mission—but  there  are  undoubtedly
many  more  such  examples.  To  fail  to  ‘‘fill  the  pipeline’’  on  any  of  them  is  akin  to
criminal—yet the current DARPA is AWOL on all of them!

Concerning the ‘‘style’’ of support for topics such as those above—I think it is im-
portant to understand that they can’t be bought on a competitive market in the way
that  incremental  technology  improvements  can.  I  am  an  engineer,  former  CEO  of
an  engineering  company,  Director  of  another  engineering  company,  and  a  big  fan
of commercial development. I am also a skeptic of the academic belief that basic re-
search  is  the  source  of  all  new  ideas.  But,  that  said,  I  also  deeply  believe  that  a
program  of  long-term,  academic,  risky,  basic  research  is  essential  to  the  mission  of
the  DOD;  that  is  a  role  that  DARPA  used  to  play  but  is  no  longer  playing.  Not  in
the  near-term—but  in  the  10–15  year  time  frame—the  U.S.  is  endangered  by
DARPA’s current style of funding!
Q2. At  the  hearing,  Dr.  Tether  mentioned  several  times  that  his  agency’s  work  on
cognitive computing as an example of long-range research underway at DARPA.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

Is that the kind of long-range computer science research that you believe DARPA
should be doing? Why or why not?

A2. I  am  very  sorry,  but  I  am  not  sufficiently  acquainted  with  this  program  to  an-
swer.  My  schedule  since  the  hearing  in  May  has  been  such  that  I  have  not  been
able to inform myself about it. If the Committee wishes, I will be delighted to inform
myself  after  returning  from  Australia  in  late  July  and  submit  an  answer  at  that
time.
Q3. What  criteria  should  we  be  using  to  determine  if  federal  support  for  funda-
mental  research  in  computer  science  in  general  and  cyber  security  in  particular
is adequate?

A3. That  is,  of  course,  one  of  the  hardest  questions  to  answer  since  one  can  never
know with certainty whether the next incremental dollar will fund the breakthrough
that revolutionizes a field, or results in a technology with profound implications for
our quality of life.

At least at NSF, however, the success rate for proposals is probably a good surro-
gate. Historically NSF has funded about 30 percent of the proposals it receives. In-
formal  conversations  with  program  officers  at  NSF  suggests  that,  in  fact,  probably
50 percent of the proposals they receive are worthy of funding, so a 30 percent suc-
cess  rate  is  covering  the  really  outstanding  proposals.  If  the  success  rate  for  cyber
security were 30 percent, I would judge the funding to be adequate.

A  general  answer  for  mission  agencies  such  as  DOD  and  DOE  is  harder  to  give;
each such agency must think in terms of its own needs in various areas. In the case
of these two specific agencies, which are the most heavily dependent on high quality
security  and  spend  literally  billions  of  dollars  annually  on  largely  manual  systems,
it  is  hard  for  me  to  understand  why  they  aren’t  investing  more  on  basic  research
in this area.

Questions submitted by Representative Bart Gordon
Q1. The  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee  report  on  cyber  se-
curity  finds  that  the  academic  research  community  in  cyber  security  is  below
critical mass.

Q1a. To  what  extent  would  this  be  corrected  simply  by  increasing  the  amount  of  re-

search funding available?

Q1b. Are  there  other  impediments  to  bringing  more  researchers  to  this  field  aside

from the availability of research funding?

A1a,b. I am strongly in agreement with the PITAC conclusion, and there is no ques-
tion  that  additional  funding  would  help  increase  the  amount  of  research  done  and
hence increase the production of trained professionals in the area of cyber security.
The  fact  that  NSF  received  12  times  as  many  proposals  as  it  was  able  to  fund  in
its  recent  Cyber  Trust  Initiative  demonstrates  that  there  is  a  pent-up  demand  to
do research in this area. I have long pointed out that there are some deep and very
interesting  problems  in  cyber  security,  and  I  think  the  response  to  NSF’s  initiative
demonstrates that, given support, the CS community will be attracted to these prob-
lems.

But, as I have said before to this committee, at least as important as the amount
of funding is its stability—an assurance that there will be funds in the future. Aca-
demic  reputations  are  built  on  a  lifetime  of  research  and  so  the  best  researchers
choose  problem  areas  where  there  is  likely  to  be  funding  over  their  whole  research
career.

Finally,  the  current  tendency  to  classify  security  related  research  is  an  impedi-
ment  to  academic  research.  Speaking  as  one  who  has  done  cyber  security  research,
much of this classification is counterproductive. There is a saying in the cyber secu-
rity  research  community  that  ‘‘There  is  no  security  in  obscurity’’—  meaning  that  if
your  security  depends  on  hiding  information,  it  is  inevitable  that  information  will
leak  out  and  you  will  be  left  insecure.  That  is  why,  for  example,  all  cryptographic
techniques are public. So, while I believe that there are a few cases associated with
offensive  cyber  security  that  need  to  be  classified,  virtually  nothing  else  does—and
in fact classifying it will ultimately lead to less security.

In short, more funding would be helpful, but stable funding and an open approach
to  security  research  are  essential  to  bringing  more  academic  researchers  into  this
field.
Q2. In your written testimony you mentioned that a significant portion of the NSF’s
computer  science  directorate’s  budget  goes  to  fund  cyberinfrastructure,  which

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

108

largely supports research in fields other than computer science. This means that
less funding is available for research in computer science.
Do  you  think  this  organizational  arrangement  at  NSF  for  the  support  of
cyberinfrastructure  makes  sense,  or  should  the  cyberinfrastructure  be  managed
in a separate office and funded through a dedicated appropriations category?

for  what 

A2. In  the  spirit  of  full  disclosure  I  should  first  note  that  from  1988–1991  I  was
the  Assistant  Director  of  NSF  responsible 
is  now  called  the
cyberinfrastructure,  and  I  have  wrestled  with  this  question  off-and-on  for  17  years.
I  want  to  be  clear  that  the  fact  that  cyberinfrastructure  in  housed  in  the  Com-
puter and Information Science and Engineering (CISE) Directorate causes some con-
fusion,  but  in  fact  has  worked  quite  well.  The  confusion  results  from  a  simplistic
look at the NSF budget that leads some outside CS to assume that computer science
is  funded  much  better  than  it  actually  is.  A  similarly  simplistic  look  at  the  CISE
budget by some computer scientists leads them to assume that a lot of ‘‘their money’’
is  being  spent  on  cyberinfrastructure.  In  truth,  the  support  of  cyberinfrastructure
is strongly in the national interest, and if its management were moved out of CISE,
so would the resources to support it; that money would not become available for CS.
To repeat, the problem is one of confusion arising from simplistic analyses; it is not
a real problem of reduced funding of CS because of the infrastructure.

At  least  when  I  ran  CISE,  I  tolerated  this  confusion  because  I  believed  (and  still
believe) that both the users of the infrastructure and computer science research ben-
efited from the close and coordinated management of a research program on the in-
frastructure  and  its  use.  For  example,  we  quickly  learned  that  users  of  supercom-
puters  needed  to  be  able  to  visualize  the  results  of  their  computations,  which
spawned  a  very  fruitful  program  of  research  in  computer  graphics  with  wide  appli-
cation  but  that  specifically  was  of  great  benefit  to  the  supercomputer  users.  Thus
my first preference would be to maintain the current arrangement, but it would not
be  a  disaster  to  move  the  management  of  the  cyberinfrastructure  to  a  separate  of-
fice—however, if that were done, I would think very carefully about how to maintain
that  close  relationship  of  its  use  and  further  research  on  it.  What  we  now  call
cyberinfrastructure has evolved very rapidly in part because of that relationship.

Question submitted by Representative Sheila Jackson Lee
Q1. While  I  am  unsatisfied  by  the  status  of  computer  science  research  being  con-
ducted at the federal level, I am also disturbed by the lack of female and minor-
ity  representation  in  the  field  of  computer  science.  The  statistics  show  that
women  and  minorities  are  not  being  proportionally  represented  in  academia
when  it  comes  to  computer  science.  In  2003,  women  represented  barely  20  per-
cent  of  the  doctoral  degrees  granted.  The  same  statistics  show  that  in  2003  the
White male population made up about 70 percent of the doctoral degrees to U.S.
citizens  and  permanent  residents.  At  the  same  time,  Asian/Pacific  Islanders
made  up  about  20  percent  of  the  doctoral  degrees  granted,  but  black,  Hispanics
and  American  Indian/Native  Alaskans  made  up  less  than  five  percent  of  the
doctoral degrees granted. These statistics are discouraging and show that we are
not reaching out to our entire population. Indeed, the problem starts in the class-
room,  where  many  under-privileged  youth  do  not  have  this  background  at  an
early age, its not surprising that they don’t pursue the field in higher education
and later in life. What are we doing to reach women, minorities and the under-
privileged in our society?

A1. I  share  Representative  Jackson  Lee’s  concern.  Indeed  it  is  perhaps  even  worse
than she indicates. Taking engineering as a whole, not just computer science (which,
incidentally does a bit better than the rest of the physical sciences and engineering,
but  much  worse  than  the  life  sciences),  for  thirty  years  we  made  steady  progress
on the representation of women and minorities as a fraction of the graduating class.
One might argue that the progress should have been faster—but at least there was
steady progress. But then something happened in the early 90’s and the proportion
has  been  essentially  flat  since,  and  no  one  has  been  able  to  satisfactorily  explain
what happened.

I  have  attached  (Attachment  1)  an  analysis  by  a  joint  committee  of  the  Associa-
tion for Computing Machinery (ACM), the Institute for Electrical and Electronic En-
gineers  (IEEE),  and  the  Computing  Research  Association  (CRA)—the  ACM  and
IEEE are the two principal professional societies in computer science, and the CRA
is  an  organization  of  the  CS  departments  and  research  laboratories.  Although  this
list isn’t complete (it doesn’t mention the Academy of Engineering program on diver-
sity,  the  Anita  Borg  Institute  for  Women  and  Technology,  or  MentorNet,  just  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

109

mention three that I am involved in), I think it does demonstrate that the computer
science  community  broadly  shares  your  concerns  and  is  trying  to  do  something
about them.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment 1

110

Information on Coalition to Diversify Computing (CDC)

efforts

A JOINT ORGANIZATION OF THE ACM, CRA AND IEEE–CS1

PATRICIA TELLER, CHAIR,2 VALERIE E. TAYLOR, CHAIR-ELECT,3 J.S. HURLEY,

IMMEDIATE PAST-CHAIR4

Major  progress  in  computing  technologies  over  the  last  decade  has  been  accom-
panied  by  vast  improvements  in  computing  middleware,  hardware  and  networking.
An  unexpected  consequence  of  these  advancements  has  been  a  shortage  of  a  highly
trained  workforce  of  scientists  and  engineers  capable  of  understanding  and  imple-
menting the resources. The Coalition to Diversify Computing (CDC) seeks to address
the  shortfall  through  the  development  of  a  diverse  community  of  professionals  that
can  effectively  meet  the  computing  demands  of  an  evolving  society.  CDC  projects
target  students  and  faculty  with  the  expressed  intent  of  increasing  the  number  of
minorities successfully transitioning into computing-based careers in academia, fed-
eral labs and industry. Additional projects seek to increase the available pool of fac-
ulty  members  through  partnerships  and  mentoring.  Current  emphasis  is  placed  on
the  following  three  areas:  (1)  recruitment  of  minority  undergraduates  to  MS/Ph.D.
programs,  (2)  retention  of  minority  graduate  students  enrolled  in  MS/Ph.D.  pro-
grams, and (3) transition of minority MS/Ph.D. graduates into academia and indus-
try. Current projects include:

1. Richard  Tapia  Celebration  of  Diversity  in  Computing  Conference.  Next  con-
ference  (October  19–22,  2005  in  Albuquerque,  New  Mexico),  URL:  http://
www.ncsa.uiuc.edu/Conferences/Tapia2005/

2. Distributed Rap Sessions
3. CDC Database
4. Sending Students/Mentors to Technical Conferences
5. Collaborative Research Experiences for Undergraduates (CREU)
6. Workshop for Minority Junior Faculty

The diverse membership of CDC from areas of academia, industry and federal lab-
oratories  enables  a  variety  of  different  perspectives  and  approaches  to  be  utilized
in  achieving  the  above  stated  goals.  CDC  also  partners  with  a  number  of  organiza-
tions with similar missions to leverage resources to optimize outcomes.
CDC Programs

According  to  the  2003–2004  Taulbee  Survey,  in  2004  only  1.1  percent  of  the  doc-
torates  in  computer  engineering  and  computer  science  went  to  Hispanics,  1.5  per-
cent went to African-Americans, and none went to Native Americans or Alaskan Na-
tives.

The  number  in  the  pipeline  is  not  increasing  by  much,  either.  In  fall  2004,  1.3
percent  of  enrolled  Ph.D.  students  were  Hispanic,  1.8  percent  were  African-Amer-
ican, and only 0.2 percent were Native American.

‘‘Under-representation  of  our  communities  in  computing  is  an  unacceptable  loss
of  talent,  creativity,  and  achievement  for  the  Nation  and  the  world  and  we  must
all  work  to  change  this  situation,’’  says  Roscoe  C.  Giles  (Professor,  Department  of
Electrical  and  Computer  Engineering,  Boston  University  and  team  member  of  the
NCSA  Alliance  Steering  Committee).  Prof.  Giles  also  serves  as  Executive  Director,
Institute for African-American ECulture.

CDC focuses its efforts on programs that increase the visibility of minorities, and
on  providing  networking  opportunities  for  minority  researchers,  faculty,  and  stu-
dents.  The  CDC,  founded  in  1996,  is  a  program  of  the  Computer  Research  Associa-
tion  (CRA),  the  Institute  of  Electrical  and  Electronic  Engineering  (IEEE–CS),  the
Association  of  Computing  Machinery  (ACM),  and  The  National  Computational
Science Alliance (Alliance), a nationwide partnership of more than 50 academic, gov-
ernment  and  business  organizations  working  together  to  prototype  an  advanced
computational  infrastructure  for  the  new  century.  Started  in  1997,  the  Alliance  is

1 http://www.cdc-computing.org
2 pteller@cs.utep.edu
3 taylor@cs.tamu.edu
4 john.s.hurley@boeing.com

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

111

one of two national partnerships funded by the National Science Foundation’s Part-
nerships  for  Advanced  Computational  Infrastructure  (PACI)  program  and  receives
cost-sharing at partner institutions.
Information on CRA’s Committee on the Status of Women in Computing Re-

search (CRA–W) efforts

As  Rep.  Lee  correctly  points  out,  the  problem  of  different  levels  of  access  to  com-
puter technology begins before college. While this is certainly a problem with under-
privileged students, there are subtle social factors that affect pre-college girls in this
regard  as  well.  It  is  certainly  the  case  that  not  getting  computer  experience  and
course work in K–12 can affect initial interest in pursuing a computer degree in col-
lege.  Fortunately,  skills  acquired  in  high  school  math  and  science  courses—rather
than high school programming—are more important in preparing for computing re-
search.  Women  are  now  taking  math  and  science  courses  in  high  school  (with  the
exception  of  physics)  at  almost  the  same  rate  as  men,  so  they  are  not  coming  into
higher education totally unprepared to move into computing if their interest can be
engaged.  It  is  interesting  to  note  that  while  the  proportion  of  B.S.  degrees  granted
to  women  has  been  declining  since  1985  (NSF  data),  both  the  number  and  propor-
tion of graduate degrees (MS and Ph.D.) granted to women have generally increased
(albeit  slowly).  One  possible  interpretation  for  this  is  that  any  advantage  accrued
by  males  of  pre-college  computer  experience  is  more  significant  at  the  under-
graduate level than at the graduate level leading to research careers where women
are continuing to slowly make gains.

CRA–W  has  become  a  national  leader  in  efforts  to  increase  the  number  and  suc-
cess  of  women  in  computing  research  and  innovation.  CRA–W  is  an  action-based
committee,  implementing  projects  aimed  at  eliminating  barriers  to  the  full  partici-
pation  of  women  at  all  stages  of  the  research  pipeline  beginning  at  the  under-
graduate level. It is a group of very prominent, dedicated, senior women who volun-
teer  their  time  and  energy  to  design  and  manage  projects  and  to  secure  funding
needed to sustain those projects. CRA–W programs have had a direct impact on over
2,500 women and indirectly influenced thousands of others. We run a range of pro-
grams with the following aims:

1. To mentor individuals, by providing research experiences, information, access
to  role  models,  and  networking  opportunities  that  guide,  support,  and  en-
courage women in computing,

2. To  educate  and  influence  organizations  on  issues,  policies,  and  procedures

that promote the full participation of women in computing, and

3. To build a community for women researchers that provides visibility for their

accomplishments and reduces isolation.

CRA–W  has  recently  been  recognized  for  our  past  efforts.  In  2003,  CRA–W  was
awarded  the  Presidential  Award  for  Excellence  in  Science,  Mathematics  and  Engi-
neering  Mentoring  for  ‘‘significant  achievements  in  mentoring  women  across  edu-
cational  levels,’’  and  this  year,  it  was  awarded  the  National  Science  Board’s  Public
Service Award.
Programs for Undergraduates

CRA–W  programs  that  are  aimed  at  undergraduate  women  are  designed  to  show
them  what  a  career  in  computing  research  can  offer  (and  how  research  is  quali-
tatively  different  from  stereotypical  IT  programming  jobs).  The  programs  tend  to
focus  on  one-on-one  research-oriented  mentoring  to  encourage  women  to  go  on  to
graduate school in computer science and engineering.
• Distributed Mentoring Project (DMP): Since 1994, the DMP has matched out-
standing female undergraduates with female faculty mentors for a summer of re-
search  at  the  mentor’s  research  university.  Students  participate  in  a  research
project,  observe  graduate  life,  and  benefit  from  a  close  mentoring  relationship
with their advisors. They also gain the prior research experience and personal rec-
ommendation  letters  that  are  increasingly  important  factors  in  graduate  admis-
sion  decisions.  DMP  students  receive  support  for  transportation  to  the  host  uni-
versity,  a  weekly  stipend  for  the  10-week  project,  and  funding  to  attend  a  con-
ference with their mentor to present their work. The two evaluations of the DMP
by the Learning through Evaluation, Adaptation, and Dissemination (LEAD) Cen-
ter at the University of Wisconsin show that the program has been very effective:
52 percent of DMP participants who had graduated by 2001 had gone on to grad-
uate  school.  When  asked  what  was  most  influential  in  that  decision,  students
ranked their DMP experiences second—before career goals, technical interests, ad-
visor/mentor  at  home  institution,  and  influence  of  family  members—only  success

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

112

in undergraduate CS&E courses ranked higher. When this success rate was com-
pared  with  a  comparable  population  of  high-achieving  computer  science  women
undergraduates  (with  GPA’s  above  3.5),  it  was  found  that  only  2.5  percent  at-
tended  graduate  school.  55  percent  of  the  participants  were  students  from  four-
year  colleges  and  universities  who  had  no  other  exposure  to  graduate  level  re-
search.

• Collaborative  Research  Experiences  for  Undergraduates  (CREU):  Started
in 1998, the primary goal of this program, like DMP, is to provide undergraduates
with  research  experiences  that  will  increase  their  likelihood  of  continuing  on  to
graduate  school.  Originally,  the  program  focused  on  women,  but  in  2004  CRA–W
formed  an  alliance  with  the  Coalition  to  Diversify  Computing  and  expanded  the
program  to  include  all  under-represented  groups.  The  students,  all  of  whom  are
CS&E  majors,  work  on  research  projects  in  collaborative  teams  of  two  or  three
students at their home institution under the guidance of a faculty member during
the  academic  year.  Students  are  selected  on  a  competitive  basis  from  proposals
written  jointly  with  their  mentor.  CREU  provides  a  collaborative  experience  to
help combat the stereotype of computer scientists as lone hackers toiling away in
sterile  cubicles,  to  increase  students’  team  building  skills,  and  to  decrease  any
sense  of  isolation  they  may  feel  in  their  male-dominated  classes.  The  CREU  pro-
gram  has  grown  from  19  women  students  in  1998  to  65  students  in  2004,  with
six  students  on  minority-based  teams.  Initial  findings  from  an  evaluation  study
of the CREU program done by the LEAD Center for 1998–2001, conclude that the
program  has  served  as  a  vehicle  that  promoted  skills  building,  knowledge  build-
ing,  mentoring  relationships,  role  modeling,  and  enhanced  student  career  aspira-
tions.  The  program  appears  to  be  successful  in  encouraging  students  to  continue
on  to  graduate  school  and  the  students  themselves  are  enthusiastic  about  their
experiences.  Preliminary  results  found  that  32  percent  of  the  participants  re-
sponding  were  in  graduate  school.  21  percent  had  plans  to  pursue  a  Ph.D.  and
11  percent  were  receiving  an  MS  degree.  Another  32  percent  were  employed  but
still had plans to eventually return to graduate school in CS&E.

Plans  for  the  future  include  introducing  a  multi-disciplinary  CREU-like  pro-
gram  that  will  involve  students  and  mentors  from  both  computing  and  scientific
disciplines  that  rely  on  computing  in  a  collaborative  project.  This  will  expose
women scientists in other fields to computing research.

• Distinguished Lecture Series (DLS): The DLS aims to increase the number of
women  undergraduates  who  successfully  apply  to  graduate  school  in  CS&E  and
to  increase  the  visibility  of  distinguished  women  researchers  from  academia  and
industrial  research  labs.  Selected  sites  host  an  event  typically  consisting  of  a
lunch  with  the  visitors  for  women  faculty  and  students,  a  technical  talk  by  the
distinguished lecturer, and a panel discussion with women representing both aca-
demic  and  industrial  career  paths.  The  panels  also  include  current  women  grad-
uate students who give a ‘‘view from the trenches.’’ Even at research universities,
undergraduates  have  so  many  misconceptions  about  graduate  school  and  the  ca-
reer  choices  open  to  those  with  advanced  degrees  that  the  information  provided
by these panels can be invaluable.
Programs for Graduate Students

With small numbers of women entering graduate school, it is important to ensure
their success at navigating the challenges they will face. CRA–W programs for grad-
uate  students  aim  to  improve  their  graduate  school  experience  and  increase  the
chances for successful completion of their graduate degrees.
• Graduate Student Cohort Project: The Cohort Project aims to build a commu-
nity of female students from across the country as they enter graduate school. The
program  begins  with  a  two-day  mentoring  workshop  for  all  participants.  At  the
workshop,  a  number  of  prominent  senior  women  serve  as  role  models,  give  prac-
tical advice and information, and provide personal insights on the challenges and
rewards  of  their  careers.  As  envisioned,  established  cohorts  will  return  to  the
mentoring workshop at regular intervals to get advice on the later stages of grad-
uate  school  and  to  provide  peer  mentoring  to  the  newer  cohorts.  The  Cohort
Project  provides  increased  access  to  information,  a  range  of  role  models,  net-
working  skills  and  opportunities,  and  peer  support  among  students  at  the  same
stage of their graduate careers. This relatively new project held its first workshop
in February 2004 for 100 first-year graduate students, and held the second work-
shop  in  March  2005  for  288  first-  and  second-year  graduate  students.  Informal
feedback from participants was extremely positive. The design of the graduate co-
hort  project  allows  long-term  tracking  of  cohort  members  throughout  their  grad-
uate careers and this kind of evaluation study is in progress. Microsoft funded the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

113

2004 workshop for first group. Microsoft and Google jointly funded the 2005 work-
shop.

• Best  Practices  Report  on  Retaining  and  Recruiting  Women  in  CS&E
Graduate  Programs:  In  2000,  CRA–W  ran  an  NSF-sponsored  workshop  on  re-
cruiting and retaining women in CS&E graduate programs. Participants included
long-time  members  of  the  CS&E  academic  and  research  communities,  social  sci-
entists engaged in relevant research, and directors of successful retention efforts.
Their findings were reported in the Best Practices Report, which aimed to provide
practical  advice  to  faculty,  departments,  and  university  administrations.  It  in-
cluded  recommendations  in  four  categories:  increasing  the  number  of  women  en-
rolling  in  specific  departments;  increasing  the  number  of  women  in  CS&E  grad-
uate  programs  nationally;  improving  student-student  and  student-faculty  rela-
tions; and fostering a research life. The report has been widely distributed. It was
an  insert  in  the  September  2001  issue  of  Computing  Research  News  (circulation
3,500  research  faculty),  reprinted  for  the  2002  SIGCSE  Bulletin  Special  Issue  on
Women  in  Computing,  and  distributed  at  workshops  and  conferences.  It  is  also
available  on  the  web.  The  report  aimed  to  increase  awareness  of  issues  affecting
the  participation  of  women  in  CS&E,  give  well-meaning  faculty  a  list  of  specific
things that they can do to change their institution, and use the credibility of CRA
to get people involved at the departmental level.

Programs for Faculty Career Development

The  goal  of  CRA–W  programs  aimed  at  women  who  have  earned  their  Ph.D.  de-
grees  and  embarked  on  an  academic/research  career  is  to  continue  serving  their
mentoring  needs  until  they  become  established  leaders  in  their  fields  and  inspiring
role models for their women students.
• Career  Mentoring  Workshops:  CRA–W  has  sponsored  a  series  of  Career  Men-
toring Workshops for women since 1993. Women often find themselves a minority
at  their  workplace,  and  the  CRA–W  workshops  bring  them  together  with  women
already established in their fields. The established professionals provide practical
information, advice, and mentoring support to their younger colleagues. The work-
shops have speakers and panels on varying topics. Recently, the Mentoring Work-
shops  were  expanded  to  include  tracks  for  more  established  academics  and  to  in-
clude  panelists  from  industrial  and  government  labs  in  order  to  raise  awareness
about alternate career paths and provide mentors from outside of academia. Each
of the workshops has been held in conjunction with a major professional meeting,
providing  many  attendees  with  the  opportunity  to  attend  technical  talks  and
make contacts in their research areas. CRA–W runs a second version of the Men-
toring  Workshop  at  the  SIGCSE  (Special  Interest  Group  in  Computer  Science
Education)  Conference.  That  workshop  provides  information  on  building  success-
ful academic careers that focus on undergraduate teaching.

• Cohort  of  Associate  to  Professors  Project  (CAPP):  Less  than  10  percent  of
the  full  professors  in  CS&E  departments  are  women.  Yet,  they  provide  the  role
models  and  mentors  for  our  students.  CRA–W  is  attempting  to  address  the  prob-
lem  by  forming  and  mentoring  a  cohort  of  women  from  the  associate  professor
ranks.  The  cornerstone  of  the  project  is  the  involvement  of  15  senior  women,  ap-
pointed as CRA–W Distinguished Professors, who actively participate as role mod-
els,  mentors,  and  advisers.  The  project  hopes  to  accelerate  the  successful  pro-
motion  of  associate  professors  by  providing  them  with  mentoring,  leadership
training,  encouragement,  and  ongoing  peer-support  activities.  The  first  workshop
was held in April 2004 and the second occurred in June 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

114

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  F.  Thomson  Leighton,  Chief  Scientist  and  Co-founder,  Akamai  Tech-

nologies

Questions submitted by Chairman Sherwood L. Boehlert
Q1. What  kind  of  computer  science  research  isn’t  DARPA  supporting  that  you  think
it  should?  Is  it  just  a  matter  of  more  funding  or  are  there  programs  that  are
of a lower priority that should be cut?

A1. I  am  most  concerned  by  DARPA’s  reduction  of  support  for  university-led  re-
search  in  computer  science.  This  is  not  a  problem  limited  to  a  particular  research
area  within  the  discipline  per  se.  Rather,  it  is  a  trend  across  the  spectrum  of  com-
puter  science.  While  there  may  be  examples  of  areas,  such  as  the  cognitive  com-
puting effort mentioned during the hearing, where DARPA is still funding basic re-
search  in  computer  science,  university  funding  has  been  greatly  reduced  or  elimi-
nated in many important areas.

The  Defense  Science  Board  noted  this  trend  in  February  2005  in  their  examina-
tion  of  DOD’s  efforts  to  maintain  an  adequate  supply  of  High  Performance  Micro-
processors  (incidentally,  an  area 
in  which  DSB  concluded  DOD—primarily
DARPA—was  ‘‘no  longer  seriously  involved  in. . .research  to  enable  the  embedded
processing  proficiency  on  which  its  strategic  advantage  depends’’).  The  DSB  recog-
nized the crucial payoff gained by DOD—and ultimately the Nation—from DARPA’s
prior significant involvement in university-led IT R&D:

‘‘From  the  early  1960’s  through  the  1980’s,  one  tremendously  successful  aspect
of  the  DOD’s  funding  in  the  information  technology  space  came  from  DARPA’s
unique  approach  to  the  funding  of  Applied  Research  (6.2  funding),  which
hybridized  university  and  industry  research  through  a  process  that  envisioned
revolutionary  new  capabilities,  identified  barriers  to  their  realization,  focused
the  best  minds  in  the  field  on  new  approaches  to  overcome  those  barriers  and
fostered  rapid  commercialization  and  DOD  adoption.  The  hybridization  of  uni-
versity and industry researchers was a crucial element; it kept the best and the
brightest  in  the  university  sector  well  informed  of  defense  issues  and  the  uni-
versity researchers acted as useful ‘prods’ to the defense contractors, making it
impossible  for  them  to  dismiss  revolutionary  concepts  whose  feasibility  was
demonstrated  by  university-based  6.2  efforts  that  produced  convincing  ‘proof  of
concept’ prototypes.
Recently,  DARPA  has  further  limited  university  participation,  especially  as
prime contractors, in its Computer Science 6.2 programs, which were by far its
most  significant  investments  in  university  research  (vastly  outstripping  6.1
funding). These limitations have come in a number of ways, including non-fiscal
limitations, such as the classification of work in areas that were previously un-
classified,  precluding  university  submission  as  prime  contractors  on  certain  so-
licitations, and reducing the periods of performance to 18–24 months.’’

For FY 2005, DARPA reported to the National Coordination Office for IT Research
and  Development  that  it  planned  to  make  no  investment  in  the  High  Confidence
Software  and  Systems  research  area.  This  area  includes  several  important  topics,
such as cyber security R&D.

As Director Tether’s testimony before the Committee indicated, DARPA is funding
classified research efforts in the cyber security space. Because the work is classified,
however,  the  amount  and  nature  of  the  work  can’t  be  shown  in  the  NCO’s  budget
supplement. More importantly, the university research community is largely unable
to  participate  in  the  research,  and  constraints  on  the  dissemination  of  the  results
of  the  work  limit  the  community’s  ability  to  drive  further  innovation  based  on  it.
In its March 2005 review of federal cyber security R&D, the President’s Informa-
tion  Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC)  noted  that  this  trend  stands  to  dis-
advantage  both  the  civilian  and  military  sectors.  As  an  example,  PITAC  cited  the
potential  impact  of  the  increased  use  of  classification  on  DOD’s  planned  Global  In-
formation  Grid  (GIG)—a  multi-layered  network  to  link  weapons,  intelligence,  and
military personnel for ‘‘network enhanced’’ warfare:

‘‘The  Defense  Department  intends  the  most  sensitive  portions  of  the  GIG  to  be
self-contained,  reducing  the  military’s  potential  exposure  to  the  insecurities  as-
sociated with the public IT infrastructure. However, some less sensitive portions
of  the  GIG  are  expected  to  connect  to  the  Internet,  at  least  part  of  the  time.
Vulnerabilities  are  introduced  whenever  highly  sensitive  defense  networks  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

115

civilian  networks  intersect,  giving  both  communities  a  significant  stake  in  co-
operating  to  improve  the  security  of  the  civilian  IT  infrastructure.  Also,  eco-
nomic  realities  dictate  that  today’s  military  networks  and  tomorrow’s  GIG  use
civilian  commercial  hardware  and  software,  exposing  those  networks  to  the  se-
curity vulnerabilities of such products. Thus, the success of the GIG as a secure
IT  infrastructure  of  the  future—and  the  near-term  success  of  today’s  military
networks—depends  in  part  on  improvements  in  the  security  of  the  civilian  IT
infrastructure.  Yet  because  the  civilian  R&D  community  has  access  only  to  the
results  of  unclassified  research,  reduced  support  for  this  community  will  have
a  harmful  impact  on  its  ability  to  generate  the  fundamental  discoveries  upon
which future generations of security products and practices will be based.’’

PITAC  identified  10  specific  priority  areas,  listed  below,  in  computer  science  of
‘‘paramount  importance’’  to  securing  the  national  IT  infrastructure.  DARPA’s  sup-
port  for  unclassified  research  in  these  areas  would  likely  prove  enormously  bene-
ficial to DOD and the Nation:

1. Authentication Technologies
2. Secure Fundamental Protocols
3. Secure Software Engineering and Software Assurance
4. Holistic System Security
5. Monitoring and Detection
6. Mitigation and Recovery Methodologies
7. Cyber Forensics
8. Modeling and Testbeds for New Technologies
9. Metrics, Benchmarks and Best Practices
10. Research into Human and Organizational Aspects of IT Infrastructures.

There  are  other  areas  in  which  DARPA’s  efforts  are  under  supported  (or  absent
completely).  DARPA’s  unclassified  efforts  in  Software  Design  and  Productivity,  for
example,  have  also  been  discontinued,  according  to  the  FY  2005  plan  and  FY  2006
request. Low power computation models, improved mesh & grid computing methods,
easy-to-learn  and  use  HCI,  fault  tolerance  and  replication  for  portable  computing,
and federated database management and integration, are all example areas of com-
puting  research  where  advances  could  help  the  warfighter,  as  well  as  the  civilian
population, homeland defense and the economy.

DARPA’s mission is to support the warfighter and DOD future needs. DARPA re-
search  has,  in  the  past,  often  met  those  needs  by  ‘‘pushing  the  envelope’’  such  that
advances were adopted in the civilian sphere, thus making them available in quan-
tity, and at lower cost, to the military as ‘‘commodity’’ computing items. By not pur-
suing  research  in  this  realm,  or  by  classifying  it,  the  commoditization  and  the  syn-
ergy produced by mixing both university and industrial talent, are missing.

But as the DSB report alluded, DARPA’s key role in promoting innovation in IT—
innovation  that  has  honed  America’s  war  fighting  capability,  fueled  the  new  econ-
omy, and revolutionized health care and the conduct of the sciences—wasn’t just its
support for particular research areas. It was its unique approach (and commitment)
to developing communities of researchers in both industry and academia focused on
problems  in  computer  science.  DARPA  continues  to  maintain  a  focus  on  some  of
those important problems, but its growing failure to support the university elements
of  that  community  is  altering  the  innovation  ecosystem  in  an  increasingly  negative
way. And worse yet, no other mission agency has yet picked up the mantle, leaving
NSF to bear the bulk of support for university-led fundamental computer science re-
search.

In  summary,  I  do  not  believe  that  the  problem  necessarily  results  from  a  lack  of
money, but rather from a change in prioritization. Whereas overall funding for com-
puter  science  has  increased  over  the  last  several  years  at  DARPA,  DARPA  funding
for basic research at universities in computer science has dropped significantly.
Q2. At  the  hearing,  Dr.  Tether  mentioned  several  times  his  agency’s  work  on  cog-
nitive computing as an example of long-range research underway at DARPA. Is
that  the  kind  of  long-range  computer  science  research  that  you  believe  DARPA
should be doing? Why or why not?

A2. I  am  not  directly  familiar  with  DARPA’s  program  in  cognitive  computing,  but
I  do  believe  that  research  in  this  area  is  worthwhile.  However,  it  is  only  one  area
of computer science and will not address many needs of the warfighter and the Na-
tion.  For  example,  research  in  this  area  will  probably  not  be  relevant  to  the  area
of cyber security.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

116

Q3. What  criteria  should  we  be  using  to  determine  if  federal  support  for  funda-
mental  research  in  computer  science  in  general  and  cyber  security  in  particular
is adequate?

A3. ‘‘How  much  should  we  spend?’’  is  always  a  difficult  question  when  it  comes  to
funding  basic  research.  The  reason  is  that  the  benefit  derived  from  the  research
generally  is  not  realized  until  many  years  later.  And,  basic  research  is  a  high-risk
endeavor.  Not  every  idea  pans  out.  Indeed,  fundamental  research,  by  its  very  na-
ture,  should  be  expected  to  have  many  failures.  Risk-averse  research  simply  does
not  lead  to  fundamentally  new  ways  of  thinking  or  to  breakthroughs  in  the  most
important problems.

That said, there are measures that one can use to determine if the levels of fund-
ing  are  inadequate.  First,  the  success  rates  of  qualified  grant  proposals  can  be  ex-
amined  and  compared  across  disciplines.  As  was  noted  in  prior  testimony,  the  suc-
cess rate of qualified proposals in computer science at NSF lags far behind the NSF-
wide average. The success rate in the area of cyber security is even smaller, a factor
of  three  smaller  than  the  NSF-wide  average.  These  statistics  indicate  that  there  is
good research that is going unfunded in computer science and that the lack of fund-
ing in computer science is out of proportion with other disciplines.

Second,  one  can  look  at  the  historical  return  on  investment  for  research  expendi-
tures  in  a  particular  field.  As  was  noted  in  prior  testimony,  the  return  on  invest-
ment for academic computer science research over the last several decades has been
extraordinary. Not only has the research led to the creation of numerous billion-dol-
lar  industries,  but  it  has  led,  in  part,  to  our  nation’s  preeminence  in  technology  as
a  whole.  If  history  is  any  guide,  we  should  be  spending  far  greater  sums  on  funda-
mental research in computer science than we do today.

Third,  one  can  turn  to  experts  for  advice.  PITAC  was  one  such  body  of  experts
in  information  technology  and  they  have  made  it  very  clear  that  our  under-invest-
ment in basic cyber security research poses a significant threat to our national well
being.  PITAC  had  planned  to  study  the  adequacy  of  our  overall  investment  in  IT
R&D but their term has expired and no renewals have been announced.

Questions submitted by Representative Bart Gordon
Q1. What  efforts  are  now  being  made  and  what  mechanisms  exist  to  transition  the
results  of  federally  funded  cyber  security  research  to  commercial  products  and
methods, and do you have recommendations for additional federal efforts in this
area?

A1. As  was  noted  in  the  PITAC  report  ‘‘Cyber  Security:  A  Crisis  of  Prioritization,’’
‘‘current  cyber  security  technology  transfer  efforts  are  not  adequate  to  successfully
transition  federal  research  investments  into  civilian  sector  best  practices  and  prod-
ucts.’’

PITAC  recommended  that  ‘‘the  Federal  Government  should  strengthen  its  cyber
security  technology  transfer  partnership  with  the  private  sector.  Specifically,  the
Federal  Government  should  place  greater  emphasis  on  the  development  of  metrics,
models, data sets, and testbeds so that new products and best practices can be eval-
uated;  jointly  sponsor  with  the  private  sector  an  annual  interagency  conference  at
which  new  cyber  security  R&D  results  are  showcased;  fund  technology  transfer  ef-
forts  (in  cooperation  with  industry)  by  researchers  who  have  developed  promising
ideas  or  technologies;  and  encourage  federally  supported  graduate  students  and
postdoctoral  researchers  to  gain  experience  in  industry  as  researchers,  interns,  or
consultants.’’

In its discussion, PITAC noted that ‘‘technology transfer enables the results of fed-
erally supported R&D to be incorporated into products that are available for general
use. There has been a long and successful history of federally funded IT R&D being
transferred  into  products  and  best  practices  that  are  widely  adopted  in  the  private
sector.’’

‘‘The diffusion of federally supported IT R&D into products and practices benefits

both consumers and developers:

• Consumers have benefited from faster hardware, faster networks, better soft-
ware  that  is  easier  to  use,  and  more  frequent  time-  and  labor-saving  up-
grades.
• IT research often results in new ideas and prototypes that can be rapidly de-
veloped into new or improved commercial products. The developers of such in-
novations are free to carry their innovative ideas into the marketplace, bene-
fiting all consumers.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

117

‘‘Unlike  other  IT  products,  cyber  security’s  benefits  are  measured  by  the  absence
of  problems  in  IT  systems.  Because  the  market  for  these  benefits  has  historically
been small, interest is limited among both start-ups and large companies.’’

PITAC  believes  that,  ‘‘given  the  value  and  difficulty  of  technology  transfer,  the
Federal  Government  should  support  programs  to  transform  existing  and  future
cyber  security  research  results  into  commercial  products  or  operational  best  prac-
tices. Specifically, the Federal Government should:

that new products and best practices can be evaluated.

• Strengthen  the  development  of  metrics,  models,  data  sets,  and  testbeds  so
• Jointly  sponsor  with  the  private  sector  an  annual  interagency  conference  at
which  new  cyber  security  R&D  results,  especially  those  conducted  or  spon-
sored by the Federal Government, are showcased.
• Require  grant  proposals  to  describe  the  potential  practical  utility  of  their  re-
search  results  and  have  the  coordinating  body  identified  in  Recommendation
4  of  the  PITAC  report  collect  and  publish  these  descriptions.  (While  funda-
mental research is usually undertaken without any direct transition path en-
visioned,  cyber  security  research  is  often  undertaken  in  the  context  of  recog-
nized  problems,  and  documenting  logical  connections  with  real  world  prob-
lems is worthwhile.)
• Establish  a  fund  to  support  technology  transfer  efforts  by  researchers  who
have developed promising ideas or technologies. This fund could also help re-
searchers cooperate with industry to bring products or enhancements rapidly
to market.
• Establish  and  maintain  a  national  database  of  results  from  federally  funded
cyber  security  research,  allowing  vendors  to  identify  ideas  that  can  be  incor-
porated into commercial products.
• Encourage  federally  supported  graduate  students  and  postdoctoral  research-
• Encourage  agency  investment  in  technology  transfer  of  cyber  security  R&D
results  through  the  Small  Business  Innovation  Research  (SBIR)  and  Small
Business  Technology  Transfer  (SBTT)  programs  of  the  Federal  Government.
‘‘The  Federal  Government  and  the  private  sector,  by  working  together,  can  effec-
tively  and  efficiently  transfer  federally  funded  cyber  security  research  results  into
commercial products and build an innovative cyber security workforce, and by doing
so can help our society realize the potential benefits of this research.’’
Q2. The  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee  report  on  cyber  se-
curity  finds  that  the  academic  research  community  in  cyber  security  research  is
below critical mass.

ers to gain experience in industry as researchers, interns, or consultants.

Q2a. To  what  extent  would  this  be  corrected  simply  by  increasing  the  amount  of  re-

search funding available?

Q2b. Are  there  other  impediments  to  bringing  more  researchers  to  this  field  aside

from the availability of research funding?

A2a,b. As  PITAC  notes  in  its  report,  increasing  the  level  of  funding  for  basic  re-
search  in  cyber  security  is  required  to  increase  the  size  of  the  academic  research
community  in  cyber  security.  But  it  is  not  sufficient.  The  long-term  stability  of  the
funding is also important, and it is critical that the university research not be clas-
sified.

I do not mean to imply that all cyber security research should be unclassified. In-
deed,  classified  research  in  the  area  of  cyber  security  is  certainly  a  worthwhile  en-
deavor. However, if most or all research in cyber security is classified, then univer-
sity researchers (with whom much of our nation’s networking and computer science
expertise  resides)  will  not  be  able  to  contribute  to  the  discovery  of  the  break-
throughs  that  are  so  badly  needed  in  this  area.  Moreover,  the  technology  transfer
needed  to  convert  breakthroughs  into  products  and  best  practices  will  also  be  seri-
ously impeded.

Questions submitted by Representative Sheila Jackson Lee
Q1. While  I  am  unsatisfied  by  the  status  of  computer  science  research  being  con-
ducted on the federal level, I am also disturbed by the lack of female and minor-
ity  representation  in  the  field  of  computer  science.  The  statistics  show  that
women  and  minorities  are  not  being  proportionally  represented  in  academia
when  it  comes  to  computer  science.  In  2003,  women  represented  barely  over  20

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

118

percent  of  the  computer  science  doctoral  degrees  granted.  The  same  statistics
show  that  in  2003,  the  White  population  made  up  about  70  percent  of  the  doc-
toral  degrees  granted  to  U.S.  citizens  and  permanent  residents.  At  the  same
time,  Asian/Pacific  Islanders  made  up  about  20  percent  of  the  doctoral  degrees
granted, but Blacks, Hispanics, and American Indian/Native Alaskans made up
less  than  five  percent  of  the  doctoral  degrees  granted.  These  statistics  are  very
discouraging  and  show  that  we  are  not  reaching  out  to  our  entire  population.
Indeed, the problem starts in the classroom, where many under-privileged youth
do  not  have  nearly  the  same  access  to  computers  and  the  Internet.  If  they  don’t
have  this  background  at  an  early  age,  its  not  surprising  that  they  don’t  pursue
the  field  in  higher  education  and  later  in  life.  What  are  we  doing  to  reach
women, minorities, and the under-privileged in our society?

A1. Although  I  am  painfully  aware  of  lack  of  female  and  minority  representation
in  the  field  of  computer  science  (as  well  as  related  fields  such  as  mathematics),  I
do not have sufficient expertise to provide a good answer to this question.

I do know that National Science Foundation’s CISE Directorate is continually ex-
perimenting  with  innovative  programs  to  improve  this  situation,  including  the  new
‘Broadening  Participation  in  Computing’  program  (http://www.nsf.gov/pubs/2005/
nsf05562/nsf05562.htm).  Ensuring  continued  and  increased  funding  for  this  pro-
gram and others like it is important.

In  addition,  two  years  ago,  computer  scientists  established  the  National  Center
for Women in Technology (http://www.ncwit.org) to coordinate a number of national
efforts  aimed  at  increasing  the  participation  of  women  and  minorities  in  the  field.
Q2. Your  committee’s  report  on  cyber  security  recommends  an  increase  to  NSF’s
budget  for  cyber  security  research  to  $90  million  per  year  and  ‘‘substantial’’  in-
creases in civilian cyber security R&D at DARPA and the Department of Home-
land Security.

Q2a. Why is there a recommendation for a specific increase for NSF, but not for the

other agencies?

Q2b. Did  your  committee  consider  the  need  for  funding  increases  at  NIST  or  other

federal agencies?

A2a,b. NSF  is  the  only  agency  for  which  we  had  enough  credible  data  on  research
funding  in  order  to  make  a  specific  recommendation  for  funding  levels.  That  said,
a  comparable  amount  of  funding  for  basic  non-classified  research  at  DARPA  and
DHS  would  certainly  be  in  the  Nation’s  interest.  As  was  noted  in  prior  testimony,
DARPA has shifted a significant amount of funding away from universities in cyber
security in favor of more directed and/or classified work, and DHS (which is tasked
with the Nation’s cyber security) spends only a tiny fraction of its large S&T budget
on cyber security. The failure of the Department of Homeland Security to invest sig-
nificantly  in  cyber  security  R&D  was  of  particular  concern  to  PITAC.  DHS  has  an
overall  Science  &  Technology  budget  of  roughly  $1.3  billion  dollars,  of  which  $18
million  dollars  is  devoted  to  cyber  security.  For  FY06,  the  DHS  budget  decreases
this  amount  to  $17  million.  Of  these  amounts,  less  than  $2M  is  devoted  to  basic
research.

NIST,  NIJ,  DHS,  DOE  and  other  agencies  should  all  re-examine  the  role  they
play  in  cyber  security  research.  It  is  probably  in  the  Nation’s  interest  to  increase
funding  at  each  of  these  agencies.  However,  without  better  data,  a  clear  under-
standing of how the money would be spent at those agencies, and some kind of na-
tional  strategy,  the  committee  was  unable  to  formulate  specific  recommendations—
especially at a time when there are such large federal deficits.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(119)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

120

JOINT STATEMENT OF THE COMPUTING RESEARCH COMMUNITY

Thank  you,  Chairman  Boehlert  and  Ranking  Member  Gordon,  for  convening  this
hearing  and  for  your  committee’s  continued  support  of  information  technology  re-
search  and  development.  The  American  Society  for  Information  Science  and  Tech-
nology  (ASIS&T),  Coalition  for  Academic  Scientific  Computing  (CASC),  Computing
Research  Association  (CRA),  Electrical  and  Computer  Engineering  Department
Heads  Association  (ECEDHA),  Society  for  Industrial  and  Applied  Mathematics
(SIAM), and U.S. Public Policy Committee of the Association for Computing Machin-
ery  (USACM)  join  in  endorsing  this  testimony  because  we  believe  the  health  of  the
computing research enterprise to be crucial to the Nation’s future economic competi-
tiveness, our national defense and homeland security, the health of our citizens, and
further discovery in the sciences.

The United States, in both the public and private sectors, has done a remarkable
job  in  forging  a  leadership  role  in  information  technology,  due  in  large  part  to  a
healthy  fundamental  computing  research  enterprise.  That  leadership  role  has  paid
great  dividends  to  the  country  and  the  world.  However,  we  are  concerned  that  the
U.S.  is  in  danger  of  ceding  leadership  if  current  trends  continue.  Fortunately,  the
U.S. remains in good position to reverse those trends if we act soon.

Our  testimony  examines  how  the  U.S.  came  to  assume  its  dominant  position  in
IT  and  the  benefits  that  role  conveys  to  the  Nation.  We  also  examine  why  the
changing  landscape  for  federal  support  of  computing  research  imperils  U.S.  leader-
ship  in  IT,  and  in  turn,  U.S.  economic  performance  in  the  coming  decades.  Finally,
we outline what we believe should be done to shore up that leadership.

We commend the Committee for its interest in this topic and hope this ‘‘view from
the community’’ provides you a valuable perspective on the critical importance of IT
on national prosperity, and how changes to the federal research portfolio impact the
IT sector.
The Impact of New Technologies

The  importance  of  computing  research  and  computational  science  in  enabling  the
new economy is well documented. The resulting advances in information technology
have  led  to  significant  improvements  in  product  design,  development  and  distribu-
tion  for  American  industry,  provided  instant  communications  for  people  worldwide,
and  enabled  new  scientific  disciplines  such  as  bioinformatics  and  nanotechnology
that show great promise in improving a whole range of health, security, and commu-
nications  technologies.  Federal  Reserve  Board  Chairman  Alan  Greenspan  has  said
that  the  growing  use  of  information  technology  has  been  the  distinguishing  feature
of this ‘‘pivotal period in American economic history.’’ Recent analysis suggests that
the  remarkable  growth  the  U.S.  experienced  between  1995  and  2000  was  spurred
by  an  increase  in  productivity  enabled  almost  completely  by  factors  related  to  IT.
‘‘IT  drove  the  U.S.  productivity  revival  [from  1995–2000],’’  according  to  Harvard
economist Dale Jorgenson.

Information  technology  has  also  changed  the  conduct  of  research.  Innovations  in
computing  technologies  are  enabling  scientific  discovery  across  every  scientific  dis-
cipline—from  mapping  the  human  brain  to  modeling  climatic  change.  Researchers,
faced  with  research  problems  that  are  ever  more  complex  and  interdisciplinary  in
nature, are using IT to collaborate across the globe, simulate experiments, visualize
large and complex data sets, and collect and manage massive amounts of data.
The  Information  Technology  Ecosystem  that  Gives  Birth  to  New  Tech-

nologies

A significant reason for this dramatic advance in IT and the subsequent increase
in  innovation  and  productivity  is  the  ‘‘extraordinarily  productive  interplay  of  feder-
ally  funded  university  research,  federally  and  privately  funded  industrial  research,
and  entrepreneurial  companies  founded  and  staffed  by  people  who  moved  back  and
forth between universities and industry,’’ according to a 1995 report by the National
Research Council. That report, and a subsequent 1999 report by the President’s In-
formation  Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC),  emphasized  the  ‘‘spectacular’’
return on the federal investment in long-term IT research and development.

The  1995  NRC  report,  Evolving  the  High  Performance  Computing  and  Commu-
nications  Initiative  to  Support  the  Nation’s  Information  Infrastructure,  included  a
compelling graphic illustrating this spectacular return. The graphic was updated in
2002 and is included with this testimony. (See Figure 1.)

It is worth a moment to consider the graphic. The graphic charts the development
of  technologies  from  their  origins  in  industrial  and  federally-supported  university
R&D,  to  the  introduction  of  the  first  commercial  products,  through  the  creation  of
billion-dollar  industries  and  markets.  The  original  1995  report  identified  nine  of
these  multi-billion-dollar  IT  industries  (the  categories  on  the  left  side  of  the  graph-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

121

ic). Seven years later, the number of examples had grown to 19—multi-billion-dollar
industries that are transforming our lives and driving our economy.

The  graphic  also  illustrates  the  dynamic  interplay  between  federally-supported
university-based  research  and  industrial  R&D  efforts.  In  some  cases,  such  as  re-
duced  instruction  set  computing  (RISC)  processors  (a  chip  architecture  that  forms
the basis for processors used by Sun, IBM, HP, and Apple, and has significantly in-
fluenced all microprocessor design) and RAID disk servers (‘‘redundant arrays of in-
expensive  disks’’),  the  initial  ideas  came  from  industry,  but  government-supported
university  research  was  necessary  to  advance  the  technology.  In  other  cases,  such
as  timesharing,  graphical  user  interfaces,  and  the  Internet,  the  ideas  originated  in
the  universities  long  before  they  matured  to  a  point  where  subsequent  research  by
industry helped move the technologies towards commercialization. In each example,
the  industry/university  research  relationship  has  been  complementary.  University
research,  focused  as  it  is  on  fundamental  questions  and  long-term  problems,  does
not  supplant  industry  research  and  development.  And  industry,  which  contributed
$190  billion  in  2002  (down  from  $198  billion  in  2001)  in  overall  R&D  geared  pri-
marily towards short-term development, does not supplant university research.

This  is  an  important  point  that  bears  some  development.  The  great  majority  of
industry-based  research  and  development  is  of  a  fundamentally  different  character
than university-based research. Industry-based research and development is, by ne-
cessity,  much  shorter  term  than  the  fundamental  research  performed  in  univer-
sities.  It  tends  to  be  focused  on  product  and  process  development,  areas  which  will
have  more  immediate  impact  on  business  profitability.  Industry  generally  avoids
long-term  research  because  it  entails  risk  in  a  couple  of  unappealing  ways.  First,
it is hard to predict the outcome of fundamental research. The value of the research
may  surface  in  unanticipated  areas.  Second,  fundamental  research,  because  it  is
published  openly,  provides  broad  value  to  all  players  in  the  marketplace.  It  is  dif-
ficult  for  any  one  company  to  ‘‘protect’’  the  fundamental  knowledge  gleaned  from
long-term  research  and  capitalize  on  it  without  all  players  in  the  marketplace  hav-
ing a chance to incorporate the new knowledge into their thinking.

Those companies that do make significant fundamental research investments tend
to  be  the  largest  companies  in  the  sector.  Their  dominant  position  in  the  market
ensures  that  they  benefit  from  any  market-wide  improvement  in  technology  basic
research  might  bring.  But,  even  with  that  advantage,  the  investment  of  companies
like  Microsoft  and  Intel  in  fundamental  research  remains  a  small  percentage  of
their  overall  IT  R&D  investment  (in  Microsoft’s  case,  it’s  estimated  at  around  five
percent of the company’s R&D budget), and many companies of equivalent size (Ora-
cle, Dell, Cisco) don’t invest in long-term R&D at all.

The  chart  also  illustrates  one  other  important  characteristic  of  the  IT  R&D  eco-
system—it is very interdependent. Note that the arrows that show the flow of people
and  ideas  move  not  only  between  industry,  university  and  commercial  sectors,  but
between subfields as well, sometimes in unanticipated ways. Developments in Inter-
net-working  technologies  led  to  the  development  of  the  Internet  and  World  Wide
Web (and the rise of Yahoo and Google), but also to developments in Local Area Net-
working  and  Workstations.  Work  on  timesharing  and  client  and  server  computing
in  the  1960s  led  to  the  development  of  e-mail  and  instant  messaging.  In  addition,
this  interdependence  increasingly  includes  subfields  beyond  traditional  IT,  helping
enable  whole  new  disciplines 
opto-electronics,  and
nanotechnology.

like  bioinformatics, 

Perhaps  the  most  noteworthy  aspect  of  the  graphic  is  its  illustration  of  the  long
incubation  period  for  these  technologies  between  the  time  they  were  conceived  and
first  researched  to  the  time  they  arrived  in  the  market  as  commercial  products.  In
nearly every case, that lag time is measured in decades. This is the clearest illustra-
tion of the results of a sustained, robust commitment to long-term, fundamental re-
search.  The  innovation  that  creates  the  technologies  that  drive  the  new  economy
today is the fruit of investments the federal government made in basic research 10,
15, 30 years ago. Essentially every aspect of information technology upon which we
rely  today—the  Internet,  web  browsers,  public  key  cryptography  for  secure  credit
card  transactions,  parallel  database  systems,  high-performance  computer  graphics,
portable  communications  such  as  cell  phones,  broadband  last  mile. . .essentially
every  billion-dollar  sub-market—is  a  product  of  this  commitment,  and  bears  the
stamp of federally-supported research.

One important aspect of federally-supported university research that is only hint-
ed  at  in  the  flow  of  arrows  on  this  complex  graphic  is  that  it  produces  people—re-
searchers and practitioners—as well as ideas. This is especially important given the
current  outlook  for  IT  jobs  in  the  coming  decade.  Despite  current  concerns  about
offshoring  and  the  end  of  the  IT  boom  times,  the  U.S.  Bureau  of  Labor  Statistics
this year released projections that continue to show a huge projected shortfall in IT

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

122

workers over the next 10 years. As Figure 2 illustrates, the vast majority of the en-
tire  projected  workforce  shortfall  in  all  of  science  and  engineering  is  in  information
technology.  These  are  jobs  that  require  a  Bachelor’s  level  education  or  greater.  In
addition to people, university research also produces tangible products, such as free
software  and  programming  tools,  which  are  heavily  relied  upon  in  the  commercial
and  defense  sectors.  Continued  support  of  university  research  is  therefore  crucially
important in keeping the fires of innovation lit here in the U.S.

But the impact of IT research on enabling of innovation resonates far beyond just
the IT sector. IT has played an essential—many argue the essential—role in the eco-
nomic  growth  of  the  U.S.  in  the  past  20  years.  Most  of  the  actual  economic  value
of IT does not come directly from fundamental discoveries in electronics, computers,
software,  communications,  or  algorithms—these  are  inputs  to  larger  processes  of
product and service innovation, most of which happens in the private sector and in
competitive markets. Nevertheless, the seeds of this economic growth are in the fun-
damental  discoveries,  most  of  which  are  pre-competitive  and  occur  in  the  Nation’s
universities and research laboratories. The economic growth would not happen with-
out these discoveries. Our concern is on the precarious state of research that primes
the pump of economic growth, and that puts the U.S. in jeopardy.
The Changing Landscape for Computing

The  landscape  for  computing  research  funding  has  changed  significantly  since
PITAC began its review of the federal IT R&D effort in 1997. Since the early 1960s,
the  federal  agencies  arguably  most  responsible  for  supporting  computing  research,
the  development  of  the  field  and  much  of  the  innovation  that  has  resulted  are  the
National  Science  Foundation,  the  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency,  and
the  Department  of  Energy.  At  the  time  PITAC  began  its  review,  NSF  and  DARPA
bore a leading and nearly equal share of the overall federal investment in IT R&D.
In  FY  1998,  DARPA  funding  constituted  30  percent  of  federal  IT  R&D  spending,
compared to NSF’s 27 percent share.

However,  as  the  overall  investment  has  increased,  DARPA’s  share  of  the  re-
search—both  as  a  percentage  of  the  overall  effort  and  in  absolute  dollars—has  de-
clined.  While  NSF’s  $795  million  investment  in  IT  R&D  in  FY  2005  represents  35
percent  of  overall  federal  IT  R&D  (an  increase  in  its  total  share  since  FY  1998),
DARPA’s $143 million in FY 2005 represents just six percent of the overall IT R&D
budget, a significant decrease in its share since FY 1998.

We  are  concerned  about  DARPA’s  diminished  role  in  supporting  computing  re-
search and the impact that it will have on the field, DARPA’s mission, and the Na-
tion as a whole. Central to these concerns is the idea that the field—and hence, the
Nation—benefited  greatly  by  having  different  approaches  to  funding  computing  re-
search  represented  by  the  NSF  model  and  the  DARPA  model.  While  NSF  has  pri-
marily  focused  on  support  for  individual  investigators  at  a  wide  range  of  institu-
tions—and  support  for  computing 
infrastructure  at  America’s  universities—
DARPA’s  approach  has  varied  over  the  years.  Historically,  DARPA  program  man-
agers  could  fund  individual  researchers,  or  even  ‘‘centers  of  excellence’’—typically
university research centers—with useful and critically important flexibility. DARPA
program  managers  had  great  discretion  in  funding  projects  they  believed  to  be
promising.  In  this  way,  DARPA  was  able  to  create  and  nourish  communities  of  re-
searchers  to  focus  on  problems  of  particular  interest  to  the  agency  and  to  the  De-
partment of Defense, with great success.

The  combination  of  the  different  approaches  has  proven  enormously  beneficial  to
the  Nation,  we  argue,  and  to  DARPA’s  overall  mission  of  assuring  that  the  U.S.
maintains  ‘‘a  lead  in  applying  state-of-the-art  technology  for  military  capabilities
and [preventing] technological surprise from her adversaries.’’ DARPA-supported re-
search in computing over a period of over four decades, beginning in the 1960s, has
laid  down  the  foundations  for  the  modern  microprocessor,  the  Internet,  the  graph-
ical  user  interface,  single-user  workstations,  and  a  whole  host  of  other  innovations
that  have  not  only  made  the  U.S.  military  the  lethal  and  effective  fighting  force  it
is  today,  but  have  driven  the  new  economy  and  enabled  a  whole  range  of  new  sci-
entific disciplines.

However,  through  a  series  of  policy  changes,  including  the  use  of  ‘‘go/no-go’’  deci-
sions  applied  to  critical  research  at  12  to  18  month  intervals  and  the  increasing
classification  of  research  sponsored  by  the  agency,1 DARPA  has  shifted  much  of  its

1 There  are,  of  course,  important  reasons  for  classifying  federal  research,  especially  when  it
is  clear  that  the  research  might  reveal  our  defense  capabilities  or  vulnerabilities.  However,  it
should  also  be  understood  that  there  are  real  costs—including  that  the  research  is  unavailable
for  public  dissemination  and  scrutiny,  and  that  many  university  researchers,  arguably  some  of
the  best  minds  in  the  country,  are  no  longer  able  to  contribute  to  the  work.  In  the  case  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

123

focus  in  IT  R&D  from  pushing  the  leading  edge  of  computing  research  to  ‘‘bridging
the gap’’ between basic research and deployable technologies—in essence relying pri-
marily  on  other  agencies  such  as  NSF  and  Department  of  Energy’s  Office  of
Science—to fund the basic research needed to advance the field.

These  changes  at  DARPA  have  discouraged  university  participation  in  research,
effectively  reducing  DARPA  ‘‘mindshare’’—the  percentage  of  people  working  on
DARPA  problems—at  the  Nation’s  universities.  This  is  borne  out  by  a  review  of
DARPA’s support for IT R&D at universities. While DARPA’s overall funding for IT
R&D  across  the  agency  increased  from  $543  million  in  FY  2001  to  $586  million  in
FY  2004  (in  unadjusted  dollars),  DARPA  IT  research  funding  for  universities
dropped by nearly half—from $214 million in FY 2001 to $123 million in FY 2004—
according to numbers the agency provided in response to questions from the Senate
Armed Services Committee.

The  research  community  is  not  alone  in  noting  the  potential  impact.  A  DOD  De-
fense Science Board Task Force report on High Performance Microprocessors in Feb-
ruary  2005,  noted  that  DOD—primarily  DARPA—‘‘is  no  longer  perceived  as  being
seriously  involved  in—or  even  taking  steps  to  ensure  that  others  are  conducting—
research  to  enable  the  embedded  processing  proficiency  on  which  its  strategic  ad-
vantage depends. This withdrawal has created a vacuum where no part of the U.S.
Government is able to exert leadership, especially with respect to the revolutionary
component of the research portfolio.’’ The report continues in a remarkable footnote:
This  development  is  partly  explained  by  historic  circumstances.  Since  World
War II, the DOD has been the primary supporter of research in university Elec-
trical  Engineering  and  Computer  Science  (EECS)  departments,  with  NSF  con-
tributing some funds towards basic research. From the early 1960’s through the
1980’s, one tremendously successful aspect of the DOD’s funding in the informa-
tion  technology  space  came  from  DARPA’s  unique  approach  to  the  funding  of
Applied  Research  (6.2  funding),  which  hybridized  university  and  industry  re-
search through a process that envisioned revolutionary new capabilities, identi-
fied barriers to their realization, focused the best minds in the field on new ap-
proaches  to  overcome  those  barriers  and  fostered  rapid  commercialization  and
DOD  adoption.  The  hybridization  of  university  and  industry  researchers  was  a
crucial  element;  it  kept  the  best  and  the  brightest  in  the  university  sector  well
informed  of  defense  issues  and  the  university  researchers  acted  as  useful
‘‘prods’’ to the defense contractors, making it impossible for them to dismiss rev-
olutionary  concepts  whose  feasibility  was  demonstrated  by  university-based  6.2
efforts  that  produced  convincing  ‘‘proof  of  concept’’  prototypes.  As  EECS  grew
in  scale  and  its  scope  extended  beyond  DOD  applications,  a  ‘‘success  disaster’’
ensued in that EECS essentially ‘‘outgrew’’ the ability of the DOD to be its pri-
mary source of directional influence, let alone funding. Furthermore, DOD never
developed a strategy to deal with this transition. With pressures to fund devel-
opments are unique to the Defense (e.g., military aircraft, tanks, artillery, etc.),
the DOD withdrew its EECS research leadership. Recently, DARPA has further
limited university participation, especially as prime contractors, in its Computer
Science 6.2 programs, which were by far its most significant investments in uni-
versity  research  (vastly  outstripping  6.1  funding).  These  limitations  have  come
in  a  number  of  ways,  including  non-fiscal  limitations,  such  as  the  classification
of  work  in  areas  that  were  previously  unclassified,  precluding  university  sub-
mission  as  prime  contractors  on  certain  solicitations,  and  reducing  the  periods
of performance to 18–24 months.
High  Performance  Microchip  Supply,  Defense  Science  Board,  February  2005,
Appendix D, p. 87–88.

Unfortunately,  the  other  mission  agencies  have  not  yet  stepped  in  to  fill  the  gap
created  by  DARPA’s  withdrawal.  As  PITAC  members  Edward  Lazowska  and  Dave
Patterson  noted  in  a  recent  Science  Magazine  editorial,  the  Department  of  Home-
land Security spends less than two percent of its Science and Technology budget on
cyber  security,  and  only  a  small  fraction  of  that  on  research.  NASA  is  downsizing
computational  science,  and  IT  research  budgets  at  the  Department  of  Energy  and
the  National  Institutes  of  Health  are  slated  for  cuts  in  the  President’s  FY  2006
budget.  In  effect,  the  national  commitment  to  fundamental  research  in  IT  has
waned. Ironically, this began at about the same time the economists began to under-
stand the huge benefit that such research provided for economic growth.

DARPA’s cyber security research, there is another significant cost to bear as well. The military
(and the government overall) has a huge dependence on our nation’s commercial infrastructure,
but classifying the research in information security means that it is largely unavailable for use
in protecting this commercial infrastructure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

124

This  fact,  combined  with  an  overall  growth  in  the  number  of  researchers  in  the
field  and  an  increase  in  the  breadth  of  the  discipline,  has  placed  a  significant  bur-
den  for  funding  basic  IT  R&D  on  NSF.  The  agency  reports  that  in  FY  2004,  NSF
supported  86  percent  of  federal  obligations  for  basic  research  in  computer  science
at academic institutions—and the agency’s Computing and Information Science and
Engineering  directorate  (CISE)  is  beginning  to  show  the  strain.  In  FY  2004,  the
funding rate for competitive awards in CISE fell to a decadal low of 16 percent, low-
est of any directorate at NSF and well below the NSF average. Programs in critical
areas  like  information  security  and  assurance  are  experiencing  even  lower  success
rates—NSF’s CyberTrust program reported an 8.2 percent success rate for FY 2004.
Other  fundamental  areas,  where  long-term  advances  are  critical  to  broad  research
advances, are also suffering neglect. In particular, computational science, which was
the  raison  d’etre  for  the  entire  Federal  High-Performance  Computing  and  Commu-
nications (HPCC) Program, has become an expanding area for all sciences, however,
it  has  been  without  any  focal  point  in  the  overall  Federal  HPPC  Program  (now  re-
named as NITRD). Moreover, even at NSF, support for mathematics and computing
sciences—which  underlie  the  health  of  computing  research—has  been  declining  in
real  terms  since  FY  2004.  Such  budget  and  program  management  decisions,  we
argue, are harmful to the field and to the Nation as a whole.

To be clear, our concern is not just with the impact of changes at a single agency.
Rather,  our  concern  is  that  the  total  level  of  national  investment  in  fundamental
IT  research  rise  to  the  need  that  our  economy  requires  in  an  increasingly  competi-
tive world.

As Lazowska and Patterson note: ‘‘At a time when global competitors are gaining
the  capacity  and  commitment  to  challenge  U.S.  high-tech  leadership,  this  changed
landscape  threatens  to  derail  the  extraordinarily  productive  interplay  of  academia,
government,  and  industry  in  IT.  Given  the  importance  of  IT  in  enabling  the  new
economy  and  in  opening  new  areas  of  scientific  discovery,  we  simply  cannot  afford
to cede leadership.’’
Maintaining Leadership

The  U.S.  still  has  the  world’s  strongest  capability  in  fundamental  research  in  IT,
and the most experience in how to leverage that capability toward economic growth.
This  is  a  robust  system  that  can  take  stresses  from  decreased  funding  for  a  short
time  as  we  determine  our  strategy.  But  we  run  a  grave  risk  in  letting  the  uncer-
tainty  about  funding  for  fundamental  IT  research  go  on  too  long.  The  first  causal-
ities  are  the  brilliant  young  people,  many  of  them  from  other  countries,  who  come
to  the  U.S.  to  learn  from  and  contribute  to  our  global  lead  in  this  area.  Already,
tightened visa rules and a perception of a more hostile environment in the U.S. en-
cumber  our  ability  to  attract  many  of  these  brilliant  minds.  Without  support,  they
will  go  to  Canada,  Europe,  Australia  and  other  countries  that  are  actively  courting
them.  Those  other  countries  know  the  value  the  U.S.  has  realized  from  its  system
of fundamental research—and want it for themselves. Even with their own economic
difficulties, those countries are increasing their investments in such research.

The  U.S.  took  a  critical  step  some  years  ago  in  doubling  the  Nation’s  investment
in  health  research,  and,  at  the  urging  of  your  committee,  agreeing  to  double  its  in-
vestment in other areas of research, including IT research. We believe that was the
right  decision.  The  current  delays  in  that  process  of  doubling  are  understandable,
but  the  costs  of  delaying  too  long  are  very  high.  We  taught  the  rest  of  the  world
how to grow from such investment and they learned the lesson well.

That  federal  investment  helps  fuel  the  innovation  that  insures  the  U.S.  remains
the  world  leader  in  business,  that  we  have  the  strongest  possible  defense,  and  that
we continue to find ways to live longer, healthier lives. To keep the fires of innova-
tion  lit,  we  should  continue  to  boost  funding  levels  for  fundamental  IT  R&D.  We
should insure that NSF, DARPA, and the Department of Energy have broad, strong,
sustained research programs in IT independent of special initiatives. And we should
work to maintain the special qualities of federally-supported university research.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

125

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

126

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

127

Appendix A

What others are saying:
Council  on  Competitiveness,  Innovate  America  report  on  the  National  Innovation

Initiative, released December, 2004. Available online at: http://www.compete.org

To Out-Compete Is to Out-Compute
Few areas of technology hold more promise for stimulating innovation and pro-
pelling  competitiveness  than  high  performance  computing.  Along  with  theory
and  experimentation,  modeling  and  simulation  with  high  performance  com-
puters  has  become  the  third  leg  of  science  and  path  to  competitive  advantage.
There’s  now  in  vivo,  in  vitro  and  in  silica.  A  recent  survey  by  the  Council  on
Competitiveness of U.S. chief technology and chief information officers revealed
that nearly 100 percent consider high performance computing tools essential to
their  business  survival.  And  they  are  realizing  a  range  of  strategic  competitive
benefits from using this technology, such as shortened product development cy-
cles  and  faster  time  to  market  (in  some  cases  more  than  50  percent  faster),  all
of which improve a company’s bottom line.
But we are only beginning to reap the potential innovation and competitive ben-
efits that use of this technology promises. With dramatically more powerful sys-
tems,  companies  can  extract  trillions  of  dollars  in  excess  cost  through  business
enterprise  transformation.  We  can  revolutionize  manufacturing  through  ad-
vanced modeling and simulation of the entire process from raw resource to fin-
ished  product.  We  can  dramatically  accelerate  the  drug  discovery  process,  and
substantially increase oil recovery rates by modeling entire oil fields. By shrink-
ing ‘‘time to insight’’ and ‘‘time to solution’’ through the use of high performance
computing, companies in virtually every sector will be able to accelerate the in-
novative process in ways simply not seen in the past, resulting in new capabili-
ties  and  revolutionary  products  and  services  that  capture  and  cement  global
market  share.  As  Robert  Bishop,  CEO  of  Silicon  Graphics,  notes,  ‘‘In  the  21st
century, to out-compete is to out-compute.’’ [Page 47]
Because  of  the  IT  revolution—especially  in  software—a  major  component  of
manufacturing  is  service-based.  As  the  U.S.  Congress  Office  of  Technology  As-
sessment  noted:  ‘‘Software  is. . .a  marriage  of  manufacture  and  service,  since
it has the character of both a good (it can be stored and shipped) and a service
(computer  programs  are  not  immutably  fixed).’’  But,  we  classify  software  as  a
service, not a manufacture. Consider how it is being applied:

• Manufacturers  like  Xerox  are  installing  service  capabilities  in  their  ma-
chines—diagnostic  software  that  is  capable  of  signaling  to  the  manufac-
turer when a part is nearing the end of its useful life, before the problem
is ever visible to the customer.
• In  1985,  when  Ford  Motor  Company  wanted  safety  data  on  its  vehicles,
it  spent  $60,000  to  slam  a  vehicle  into  a  wall.  Today,  that  frontal  crash
is  performed  virtually  on  high  performance  computers—at  a  cost  of
around $10.
• To design the 777, Boeing developed a software program that allowed its
engineers  to  ‘‘fly’’  in  a  computerized  prototype  of  the  aircraft  and  iterate
the design in virtual space.
• Wal-Mart  has  installed  miniature  tracking  devices  on  its  products,  ena-

bling computerized inventory tracking and controls. [Page 15–16]
Goal No. 1 Revitalize Frontier and Multi-disciplinary Research
Nowhere  is  the  need  for  new  multi-disciplinary  approaches  clearer  than  in  the
area  of  emerging  ‘‘services  science’’—the  melding  together  of  the  more  estab-
lished  fields  of  computer  science,  operations  research,  industrial  engineering,
mathematics,  management  sciences,  decision  sciences,  social  sciences  and  legal
sciences  that  may  transform  entire  enterprises  and  drive  innovation  at  the
intersection of business and technology expertise. [Page 30–31]
A 21st Century Infrastructure
In  the  late  19th  and  20th  centuries,  the  United  States  pioneered  the  world’s
most advanced infrastructure in transportation (railroads, highways, air travel),
telecommunications, energy, water and waste management.
Even the Internet, the marvel of modern communications, needs an upgrade. In
1985,  the  Internet  connected  2,000  computers.  Today,  there  are  more  than  233
million Internet hosts and more than 812 million users. The Internet of the fu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

128

ture  must  be  able  to  connect  billions  of  information  appliances,  like  computers,
portable devices, wireless modems, GPS locators and sensors. The current infra-
structure  was  not  designed  to  support  this  explosion  of  users  and  devices—and
much more investment will be needed to transform the technology and support
innovation. [Page 50]

Task  Force  on  the  Future  of  American  Innovation,  The  Knowledge  Economy:  Is
The United States Losing Its Competitive Edge?, released February, 2005. Available
on-line at http://futureofinnovation.org

Federal support of science and engineering research in universities and national
laboratories has been key to America’s prosperity for more than half a century.
A  robust  educational  system  to  support  and  train  the  best  U.S.  scientists  and
engineers and to attract outstanding students from other nations is essential for
producing  a  world-class  workforce  and  enabling  the  R&D  enterprise  it  under-
pins. But in recent years federal investments in the physical sciences, math and
engineering have not kept pace with the demands of a knowledge economy, de-
clining  sharply  as  a  percentage  of  the  gross  domestic  product.  This  has  placed
future innovation and our economic competitiveness at risk.
It  is  essential  that  we  act  now;  otherwise  our  global  leadership  will  dwindle,
and  the  talent  pool  required  to  support  our  high-tech  economy  will  evaporate.
[Page 1–2]

U.S.  Commission  on  National  Security/21st  Century  (Hart-Rudman  Committee),
Road  Map  for  National  Security:  Imperative  for  Change.  Phase  III,  January  2001.
Available online at: http://govinfo.library.unt.edu/nssg/PhaseIIIFR.pdf

. . .[T]he  U.S.  Government  has  seriously  underfunded  basic  scientific  research
in recent years. . . [T]he inadequacies of our systems of research and education
pose  a  greater  threat  to  U.S.  national  security  over  the  next  quarter  century
than any potential conventional war that we might imagine. American national
leadership  must  understand  these  deficiencies  as  threats  to  national  security.
If  we  do  not  invest  heavily  and  wisely  in  rebuilding  these  two  core  strengths,
America  will  be  incapable  of  maintaining  its  global  position  long  into  the  21st
century. [Page ix]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00132 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

129

About the Endorsing Organizations

American  Society  for  Information  Science  and  Technology 
(http://
www.asist.org)—Since 1937, the American Society for Information Science and Tech-
nology  (ASIS&T)  has  been  the  society  for  information  professionals  leading  the
search  for  new  and  better  theories,  techniques,  and  technologies  to  improve  access
to information.

ASIS&T  brings  together  diverse  streams  of  knowledge,  focusing  what  might  be
disparate approaches into novel solutions to common problems. ASIS&T bridges the
gaps not only between disciplines but also between the research that drives and the
practices that sustain new developments.

ASIS&T  counts  among  its  membership  some  4,000  information  specialists  from
such fields as computer science, linguistics, management, librarianship, engineering,
law,  medicine,  chemistry,  and  education;  individuals  who  share  a  common  interest
in improving the ways society stores, retrieves, analyzes, manages, archives and dis-
seminates information, coming together for mutual benefit.
Coalition  for  Academic  Scientific  Computing  (http://www.casc.org)—CASC  is
a  nonprofit  organization  of  supercomputing  centers,  research  universities  and  fed-
eral  laboratories  that  offer  leading  edge  hardware,  software,  and  expertise  in  high-
performance  computing  resources  and 
‘‘advanced  visualization  environments.’’
Founded in 1989, CASC has grown into a national association representing 42 cen-
ters and programs in 28 states.

Coalition  members  complement  traditional  methods  of  laboratory  and  theoretical
investigation  by  using  high-performance  computers  to  simulate  natural  phenomena
and environmental threats, handle and analyze data and create images—all at per-
formance  levels  not  available  from  smaller  computers.  By  applying  advanced  tech-
nology,  CASC  members  help  extend  the  state-of-the-art  to  achieve  the  scientific,
technical,  and  information  management  breakthroughs  that  will  keep  the  U.S.  in
the forefront of the 21st century information technology revolution.
Computing  Research  Association  (http://www.cra.org)—The  Computing  Re-
search  Association  (CRA)  is  an  association  of  more  than  200  North  American  aca-
demic  departments  of  computer  science,  computer  engineering,  and  related  fields;
laboratories  and  centers  in  industry,  government,  and  academia  engaging  in  basic
computing research; and affiliated professional societies.

CRA’s mission is to strengthen research and advanced education in the computing
fields, expand opportunities for women and minorities, and improve public and pol-
icy-maker understanding of the importance of computing and computing research in
our society.
Electrical and Computer Engineering Department Heads Association (http:/
/www.ecedha.org)—The  Electrical  and  Computer  Engineering  Department  Heads
Association  is  composed  of  heads  or  chairs  of  departments  offering  accredited  pro-
grams in electrical and/or computer engineering.

The purposes of ECEDHA are threefold: help advance the field, help members ex-
change  ideas,  and  improve  communication  with  the  profession,  industry,  govern-
ment, and others.

ECEDHA  membership  is  open  to  the  official  leaders  (whether  called  head,  chair,
or  some  other  title)  of  U.S.  university  departments  offering  ABET-accredited  elec-
trical and/or computer engineering (or similarly named) programs. Of about 300 de-
partments  offering  such  programs,  almost  90  percent  are  currently  represented  in
ECEDHA.
Society for Industrial and Applied Mathematics (http://www.siam.org)—SIAM
has  grown  from  a  membership  of  few  hundred  in  the  early  1950s  to  over  10,000
members  today.  SIAM  members  are  applied  and  computational  mathematicians,
computer  scientists,  numerical  analysts,  engineers,  statisticians,  and  mathematics
educators.  They  work  in  industrial  and  service  organizations,  universities,  colleges,
and government agencies and laboratories all over the world. In addition, SIAM has
over 400 institutional members-colleges, universities, corporations, and research or-
ganizations.
U.S.  Public  Policy  Committee  of  the  Association  for  Computing  Machinery
(http://www.acm.org/usacm)—USACM  is  the  U.S.  Public  Policy  Committee  of  the
Association for Computing Machinery, which is widely recognized as the premier or-
ganization  for  computing  professionals,  delivering  resources  that  advance  the  com-
puting  as  a  science  and  a  profession,  enabling  professional  development,  and  pro-
moting  policies  and  research  that  benefit  society.  ACM  is  the  world’s  first  edu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00133 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

130

cational  and  scientific  computing  society  with  almost  80,000  members  worldwide.
USACM  members  include  leading  computer  scientists,  engineers,  and  other  profes-
sionals from industry, academia, and government.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 13:53 Oct 04, 2005 Jkt 020999 PO 00000 Frm 00134 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\051205\20999 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

